Mississippi, session 2026, HB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-67-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-1. (1)  This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Individual On-Site Wastewater Disposal System Law." (2) It is the purpose of the Legislature through this chapter to protect human health and the environment while providing for reasonable use of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems.  The Legislature finds that continued installation and operation of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in a faulty or improper manner, in a manner that lacks essential maintenance for the system, or in areas where unsuitable soil and population density adversely affect the efficiency and functioning of these systems, has a detrimental effect on the public health and welfare and the environment through contamination of land, groundwater and surface waters.  The Legislature, therefore, expresses a general preference for the installation and operation of centralized wastewater treatment systems in Mississippi, where feasible.  The Legislature recognizes, however, that individual on-site wastewater treatment and disposal systems help meet the needs of the state's citizens, especially in rural locations, and can be rendered ecologically safe and protective of the public health if the systems are designed, installed, constructed, maintained and operated properly.  It is the intent of the Legislature to allow the continued installation, use and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in a manner that will not jeopardize public health and welfare or the environment. SECTION 2.  Section 41-67-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-2. For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Advanced treatment system" means an individual on-site wastewater treatment system that complies with Section 41-67-10. (b) "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Health. (c) "Centralized wastewater treatment system" means a wastewater collection and treatment system that consists of collection sewers and a centralized treatment facility other than an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (d) "Certified installer" means any person who has met the requirements of Section 41-67-25. (e) "Certified manufacturer" means any person registered with the department who holds a written certification issued by the department allowing the manufacturer to sell on-site wastewater products in the state. (f) "Certified professional evaluator" means any person who has met the requirements of Section 41-67-37 or a licensed professional engineer. (g) "Certified pumper" means any person registered with the department who holds a written certification issued by the department allowing the person to engage in the removal and disposal of sludge, grease and waste and who has met the requirements of Section 41-67-39. (h) "Cluster system" means a wastewater collection and treatment system under some form of common or private ownership and management that provides treatment and dispersal/discharge of wastewater from two (2) or more homes or buildings but less than a subdivision. (i) "Conventional system" means an individual on-site wastewater disposal system consisting of a septic tank and subsurface disposal field. (j) "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (k) "Decentralized wastewater treatment system" means any commercial wastewater treatment for fewer than ten (10) lots. (l) "Effluent" means sewage, water, or other liquid, partially or completely treated or in its natural state, flowing out of a septic tank, advanced treatment system, or other treatment system or system component by the department. (m) "Final approval" means an issuance of a document from the department stating that a determination has been made by the department that the individual on-site wastewater disposal system recommended/designed has been installed and fulfills all requirements under this chapter or any variance that has been granted by the department. (n) "Generator" means any person whose act or process produces sewage or other material suitable for disposal in an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (o) "Individual on-site wastewater disposal system" means a sewage treatment and effluent disposal system that does not discharge into waters of the state, that serves only one (1) legal tract, that accepts only residential waste and similar waste streams maintained on the property of the generator, and that is designed and installed in accordance with this law and regulations of the board. (p) "Notice of intent" means notification by an applicant to the department prior to construction and submission of all required information, which is used by the department to initiate the process to evaluate the property for the suitability of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (q) "Performance-based system" means an individual on-site wastewater disposal system designed to meet standards established to designate a level of treatment of wastewater that an individual on-site wastewater disposal system must meet, including, but not limited to, biochemical oxygen demand, total suspended solids, nutrient reduction and fecal coliform. (r) "Permit/recommendation" means that a person has filed a notice of intent with the department and the department has made a determination of the suitability of the property for the use of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (s) "Person" means any individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, public or private corporation (including a government corporation), partnership, association, state, or any agency or institution thereof, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state or any interstate body, and includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or the United States or any officer or employee thereof. (t) "Plot plan" means a property drawing reflecting property lines, site features (such as ponds, wells, etc.), dwellings and any other intended uses of the property therein including encumbrances. (u)  "Property of the generator" means land owned by or under permanent legal easement or lease to the generator. (v) "Qualified homeowner maintenance provider" means the current owner of a specific residence where that homeowner resides and where the homeowner has met the requirements of the rules and regulations of the department to provide maintenance for his or her system. (w) "Licensed professional engineer" means any person who has met the requirements under Section 73-13-23(1) and who has been issued a certificate of registration as a professional engineer. (x) "Septage" means the liquid, solid, and semisolid material that results from wastewater pretreatment in a septic tank, portable toilet, or grease trap, which must be pumped, hauled, treated and disposed of properly. (y) "Subdivision" means any tract or combination of adjacent tracts of land that is subdivided into ten (10) or more tracts, sites or parcels for the purpose of commercial or residential development. SECTION 3.  Section 41-67-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-3. (1)  The board and/or the department shall have the following duties and responsibilities: (a) To exercise general supervision over the design, installation, operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, decentralized wastewater treatment systems and cluster systems; (b) To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate rules and regulations, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to, to grant exemptions from and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the duties of the board under this chapter to protect the public health.  The board may grant variances from rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, including requirements for buffer zones, or from setbacks required under Section 41-67-7 where the granting of a variance shall not subject the public to unreasonable health risks or jeopardize environmental resources; (c) To provide or deny certification for persons engaging in the business for hire of the installation, operation or maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems and persons engaging in the removal and disposal of the sludge and liquid waste from those systems; (d) To suspend or revoke certifications issued to persons engaging in the business for hire of the installation, operation or maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems or persons engaging in the removal and disposal of the sludge and liquid waste from those systems, when it is determined the person has violated this chapter or applicable rules and regulations; (e) To require the submission of information deemed necessary by the department to determine the suitability of individual lots for individual on-site wastewater disposal systems for the purpose of commercial or residential development; and (f) To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate rules and regulations, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, as necessary to determine the suitability of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in subdivisions. (2) To assure the effective and efficient administration of this chapter, the board shall adopt rules governing the design, construction or installation, operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, including rules concerning the: (a) Review and approval of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in accordance with Section 41-67-6; (b) Certification of installers; (c) Certification of pumpers; (d) Certification of manufacturers; (e) Certification of professional evaluators; and (f) Creation of regulations that authorize the original and any subsequent homeowner to be trained by certified installers as defined in Section 41-67-25(2) or other factory representatives in order to educate the homeowner with the necessary knowledge to provide maintenance to the homeowner's system; no fees shall be charged to the homeowner for such training, thus allowing the homeowner to meet the requirements of Section 41-67-7(5). (3) In addition, the board shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for individual on-site wastewater disposal systems for single family residential generators and rules concerning the operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems designed to meet those standards.  The performance standards shall be consistent with the federal Clean Water Act, maintaining the wastes on the property of the generator and protection of the public health.  Rules for the operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems designed to meet performance standards shall include rules concerning the following: (a) A standard application form and requirements for supporting documentation; (b) Application review; (c) Approval or denial of authorization for proposed systems; (d) Requirements, as deemed appropriate by the board, for annual renewal of authorization; (e) Enforcement of the requirements and conditions of authorization; and (f) Inspection, monitoring, sampling and reporting on the performance of the system. Any system proposed for authorization in accordance with performance standards must be designed and certified by a licensed professional engineer in the State of Mississippi and must be authorized by the department before installation. (4) To the extent practicable, all rules and regulations adopted under this chapter shall give maximum flexibility to persons installing individual on-site wastewater disposal systems and all options consistent with the federal Clean Water Act, consistent with maintaining the wastes on the property of the generator and consistent with protection of the public health.  In addition, all rules and regulations, to the extent practicable, shall encourage the use of economically feasible systems, including all techniques and technologies for individual on-site wastewater disposal. (5) All regulations shall be applied uniformly in all areas of the state and shall take into consideration and make provision for different types of soil in the state when performing soil and site evaluations. SECTION 4.  Section 41-67-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-4. (1)  The department shall determine the feasibility of establishing centralized wastewater treatment systems upon the submission by the developer of a preliminary design and feasibility study prepared by a licensed professional engineer.  The developer may request and obtain a hearing before the board if the developer is dissatisfied with the department's determination of feasibility.  The determination that a centralized wastewater treatment system must be established shall be made without regard to whether the establishment of a centralized wastewater treatment system is authorized by law or is subject to approval by one or more state or local government or public bodies.  Whenever a developer requests a determination of feasibility, the department must make the determination within thirty (30) days after receipt of the preliminary design and feasibility study from the developer.  The department shall state in writing the reasons for its determination.  If the department does not make a determination within thirty (30) days, all sites within the subdivision shall be approved, if a certified installer attests or a department environmentalist determines that each site can be adequately served by an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (2) Where subdivisions are proposed that are composed of fewer than thirty-five (35) building sites, and no centralized wastewater treatment system is available, the department may waive the requirement for a feasibility study.  If the feasibility study is waived, all sites within the subdivision shall be approved, if a certified installer attests or a department environmentalist determines that each site can be adequately served by an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (3) No feasibility study or centralized wastewater treatment system shall be required for subdivisions designed, laid out, platted or partially constructed before July 1, 1988, or for any subdivision that was platted and recorded during the period from July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1996. (4) "Feasibility study" means a written evaluation and analysis of the potential of a proposed project that is based on investigation and research by a licensed professional engineer to give cost comparison between centralized or decentralized treatment and disposal and individual on-site wastewater disposal systems. SECTION 5.  Section 41-67-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-5. (1)  No owner, lessee or developer shall construct or place any mobile, modular or permanently constructed residence, building or facility, which may require the installation of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system, without having first submitted a notice of intent to the department.  Upon receipt of a notice of intent, the department shall provide the owner, lessee or developer with complete information on individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, including, but not limited to, applicable rules and regulations regarding the design,  installation, operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems and known requirements of lending institutions for approval of the systems. (2) No public utility supplying water shall make connection to any dwelling, house, mobile home or residence without the prior written approval of the department certifying that the plan for the sewage treatment and disposal system at the location of the property complies with this chapter.  Connections of water utilities may be made during construction if the department has approved a plan for a sewage treatment and disposal system and the owner of the property has agreed to have the system inspected and approved by the department before the use or occupancy of the property. (3)  The department shall furnish to the county tax assessor or collector, upon request, the name and address of the person submitting a notice of intent and the section, township and range of the lot or tract of land on which the individual on-site wastewater disposal system will be installed. SECTION 6.  Section 41-67-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-6. (1)  Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a certified professional evaluator or licensed professional engineer from providing services relating to the design of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system to comply with this chapter, except for performance-based systems as specified in Section 41-67-3(3).  A certified professional evaluator or licensed professional engineer shall notify the department in writing of those services being provided, including the type of treatment, the type of disposal, and the property address for the treatment and disposal system. Construction or installation shall not begin before authorization by the department.  The department shall respond within ten (10) business days with authorization that the certified professional evaluator or licensed professional engineer fulfills the requirements of the law. (2) Within five (5) working days following receipt of the notice of intent and plot plan by an owner, lessee or developer of any lot or tract of land, the department shall conduct a soil and site evaluation, except in cases where a certified professional evaluator or licensed professional engineer provides services relating to the design, construction or installation of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system to comply with this chapter.  All regulations shall be applied uniformly in all areas of the state and shall take into consideration and make provision for different types of soil in the state when performing soil and site evaluations.  Within ten (10) additional working days, the department shall make recommendations to the owner, lessee or developer of the type or types of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems suitable for installation on the lot or tract, unless there are conditions requiring further investigation that are revealed in the initial evaluation.  In making recommendations on the type or types of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems suitable for installation on a lot or tract, personnel of the department shall use best professional judgment based on rules and regulations adopted by the board, considering the type or types of systems which are installed and functioning on lots or tracts near the subject lot or tract.  To the extent practicable, the recommendations shall give the owner, lessee or developer maximum flexibility and all options consistent with the federal Clean Water Act, consistent with maintaining the wastes on the property of the generator and consistent with protection of the public health.  The system or systems recommended shall be environmentally sound and cost-effective.  The department, a licensed professional engineer or a certified professional evaluator shall provide complete information, including all applicable requirements and regulations on all systems recommended.  The owner, lessee or developer shall have the right to choose among systems.  The department shall provide the owner, lessee or developer with a permit/recommendation that specifies all types of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems that are suitable for installation on the lot or tract. (3) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of a request for determination of suitability of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in a subdivision, the department shall advise the developer in writing either that all necessary information needed for determination of suitability has been received or state the additional information needed by the department for determination of suitability. (4) Whenever a developer requests a determination of suitability of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in a subdivision, the department must make the determination within thirty (30) days after receipt of all necessary information needed for the determination of suitability from the developer. The department shall state in writing the reasons for its determination. (5) (a)  The certified installer shall notify the department at least twenty-four (24) hours before beginning installation of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system and, at that time, schedule a time for inspection of the system with the appropriate county department of health. (b) A certified installer, or designated agent thereof, shall not cover his work with soil or other surface material unless the installer has received authorization to cover the system after an inspection by a department environmentalist, or unless a department environmentalist does not arrive for inspection within thirty (30) minutes of the designated and agreed upon time, in which case a certified installer, or designated agent thereof, may submit an affidavit of proper installation to the department for final approval. (6) A person may not design, construct or install, or cause to be designed, constructed or installed an individual on-site wastewater disposal system that does not comply with this chapter and rules and regulations of the board. (7) Any lot or tract that is two (2) acres or larger shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter and regulations of the department relating to approval of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems by the department, and shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 41-67-5(2), provided that: (a) All wastewater is contained on the lot or tract; (b) No watercourse, as defined in Section 51-3-3(h), of Mississippi or the United States is impacted; and (c) The person who installed the individual on-site wastewater disposal system provides the department with a signed affidavit attesting that the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) are met. SECTION 7.  Section 41-67-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-7. (1)  Approval of the design, construction or installation of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system by the department is required, except as otherwise provided in Section 41-67-6(7). Upon completion of installation of the system, the department shall approve the design, construction or installation of that system, as requested, if the system is designed, constructed and installed, as the case may be, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the board.  Whenever a person requests approval of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system and has met the requirements in subsection (3) of this section, the department must approve or disapprove the request within five (5) working days.  If the department disapproves the request, the department shall state in writing the reasons for the disapproval.  If the department does not respond to the request within ten (10) calendar days, the request for approval of the individual on-site wastewater disposal system shall be deemed approved. (2) Individual on-site wastewater disposal systems shall be considered acceptable, provided the following requirements are met: (a) Centralized wastewater treatment systems are not available or feasible; (b) The existing disposal systems in the area are functioning satisfactorily; (c) Soil types, soil texture, seasonal water tables and other limiting factors are satisfactory for underground absorption; (d) Any private water supply is located at a higher elevation or it must be properly protected, and at least fifty (50) feet from the individual on-site wastewater disposal system and at least one hundred (100) feet from the disposal field of the system; and (e) The systems meet applicable water quality requirements of Section 41-67-10. (3) After construction or installation of the individual on-site wastewater disposal system, the property owner or his agent shall provide a final approval request containing the following to the department: (a) A signed affidavit from the installer that the system was installed in compliance with all requirements, regulations and permit conditions applicable to the system installed; and (b) For any advanced treatment system, an affidavit from the property owner agreeing to a continuing maintenance agreement on the installed system at the end of the required manufacturer's maintenance agreement. (4) If any person or certified installer fails to obtain final approval or submit an affidavit of proper installation to the department in the installation of the system, the board, after due notice and hearing, may levy an administrative fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  Each wastewater system installed not in compliance with this chapter or applicable rules and regulations of the board may be considered a separate offense. (5) The property owner, if not a qualified homeowner maintenance provider, shall keep a continuing maintenance agreement with a certified installer on all advanced treatment systems in perpetuity.  Any person violating this subsection shall be subject to the penalties and damages as provided in Section 41-67-28(5). SECTION 8.  Section 41-67-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-9. (1)  All existing individual on-site wastewater disposal systems on July 1, 2014, shall be grandfathered in until a valid complaint is registered with a county department of health or until a property owner requests an inspection by the department. (2) All existing individual on-site wastewater disposal systems shall be considered acceptable provided the following requirements are met: (a) The existing individual on-site wastewater disposal system and all treated effluent is contained on the property of the generator; (b) No evidence that any insufficiently treated effluent is leaving the property of the generator or has been seeping to the surface of the ground; (c) Centralized wastewater treatment systems are not available; (d) If a private water supply well is present, the well should be located at a higher elevation than the disposal system and is protected from surface contamination by a concrete slab of a thickness of at least four (4) inches extending at least two (2) feet in all directions from the well casing; and (e) If an advanced treatment system is used, the property owner shall be required to contact an authorized representative of a certified manufacturer of the specific advanced treatment system to provide a continuous maintenance agreement or provide the property owner training to become a qualified homeowner maintenance provider. (3) Owners of property on which an existing individual on-site wastewater disposal system does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall be required by the department to meet Section 41-67-6 or Section 41-67-21. SECTION 9.  Section 41-67-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-10. (1)  Advanced treatment systems may be installed only if they have been tested and are listed by an American National Standards Institute (ANSI) third-party certifying program at the time of installation.  Advanced treatment systems shall be in compliance with standards for a Class I system as defined by the most current revision of American National Standards Institute/National Sanitation Foundation (ANSI/NSF) International Standard Number 40, which are incorporated by reference.  An approved ANSI third-party certifying program shall comply with the following provisions for systems which it has certified to be installed in Mississippi: (a) Be accredited by the American National Standards Institute; (b) Have established procedures which send representatives to distributors in Mississippi on a recurring basis to conduct evaluations to assure that distributors of certified advanced treatment systems are providing proper maintenance, have sufficient replacement parts available and are maintaining service records; (c) Notify the department of the results of monitoring visits to manufacturers and distributors within sixty (60) days of the conclusion of the monitoring; and (d) Submit completion reports on testing and any other information as the department may require for its review. (2) All manufacturers of advanced treatment systems certified in Mississippi shall provide technical training staff to the department as needed. SECTION 10.  Section 41-67-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-11. (1)  Individual on-site wastewater disposal systems may be approved in an area where individual on-site wastewater disposal systems otherwise would not be approved because of the availability or feasibility of connection to a centralized wastewater treatment system only after a contract has been awarded or other definite commitments as are deemed sufficient to the department are formalized for the construction of a centralized wastewater treatment system that upon completion will adequately serve the property.  Individual on-site wastewater disposal systems shall only be approved when the centralized wastewater treatment system will be completed and available for use within thirty-six (36) months.  The department may approve the installation of a system under these circumstances only if the system will comply with the requirements of Section 41-67-5(1) and comply with all construction requirements of the department.  The  system may be installed only after the developer has signed a written agreement with the centralized wastewater treatment provider stating that the developer will connect to the centralized wastewater treatment system when it becomes available, and the provider of the centralized wastewater treatment system being constructed certifies that the centralized wastewater treatment system will have adequate capacity to accept the sewage to be produced by the individual on-site wastewater disposal systems.  The developer shall install an internal sewage collection system from each lot to the connection point to the centralized wastewater treatment system as he develops the streets of the subdivision.  Upon completion of the construction of the centralized wastewater treatment system, all individual on-site wastewater disposal systems shall be abandoned and all residences, buildings or facilities connected to the centralized wastewater treatment system. (2) The department may approve the use of a sewage holding tank for the purpose of providing sewage services.  The department shall require the proper abandonment and removal of the sewage holding tank and connection to a centralized wastewater treatment system when that system is available, or the usage is no longer needed. SECTION 11.  Section 41-67-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-12. (1)  The department shall assess fees in the following amounts for the following purposes: (a) A fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) shall be levied for soil and site evaluation and recommendation of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems.  The department may increase the amount of the fee authorized in this paragraph (a) not more than two (2) times during the period from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2020, with the percentage of each increase being not more than five percent (5%) of the amount of the fee in effect at the time of the increase. (b) A fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) shall be levied once every three (3) years for the certification of installers and pumpers. (c) A fee of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) shall be levied once every three (3) years for the registration of manufacturers. Any increase in the fee charged by the department under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. (2) In the discretion of the board, a person shall be liable for a penalty equal to one and one-half (1-1/2) times the amount of the fee due and payable for failure to pay the fee on or before the date due, plus any amount necessary to reimburse the cost of collection. (3) No fee authorized under this section shall be assessed by the department for state agencies or institutions, including, without limitation, foster homes licensed by the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. SECTION 12.  Section 41-67-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-15. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the authority of a municipality or board of supervisors to adopt similar ordinances which may be, in whole or in part, more restrictive than this chapter, and in those cases the more restrictive ordinances will govern.  The department shall not approve any system that does not comply with an ordinance adopted by a municipality or board of supervisors under the authority of this section. SECTION 13.  Section 41-67-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-19. Each authorized agent of the department implementing this chapter shall demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that the person: (a) Is competent to review and provide any requested approval of design and installation of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, as well as the operation, repair or maintenance of those systems, to make soil permeability tests or soil and site evaluations, and to conduct inspections of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted under this chapter; and (b) Has successfully completed the department's certification training program. SECTION 14.  Section 41-67-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-21. (1)  The department shall require a property owner and/or lessee to repair a malfunctioning individual on-site wastewater disposal system on the owner's or lessee's property before the thirtieth day after the date on which the owner or lessee is notified by the department of the malfunctioning system. (2) The property owner and/or lessee shall take adequate measures as soon as practicable to abate an immediate health hazard. (3) If an existing residential individual on-site wastewater disposal system is malfunctioning, the system shall be repaired to reduce the volume of effluent, to adequately treat the effluent and to the greatest extent possible, to confine the discharge to the property of the generator.  If repairs are made to significantly upgrade the existing individual on-site wastewater disposal system, the department shall approve the system, if requested. (4) The property owner or lessee may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day the individual on-site wastewater disposal system remains unrepaired after the thirty-day period specified in subsection (1) of this section. (5) The board may assess the property owner or lessee of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system authorized under Section 41-67-3(3) a civil penalty not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day the system fails to meet the performance standards of that system after the thirty-day period specified in subsection (1) of this section. (6) All penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited in the State General Fund. (7) Appeals from the imposition of civil penalty under this section may be taken as provided in Section 41-67-29. SECTION 15.  Section 41-67-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-23. The department or its authorized representative may enter onto property and make inspections of any individual on-site wastewater disposal system as necessary to ensure that the system is in compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter.  The department shall give reasonable notice to any property owner, lessee or occupant prior to entry onto the property.  The owner, lessee, owner's representative, or occupant of the property on which the system is located shall give the department or its authorized representative reasonable access to the property at reasonable times to make necessary inspections. SECTION 16.  Section 41-67-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-25. (1)  A person may not operate as an installer of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems unless that person is currently certified by the department. A person who installs an individual on-site wastewater disposal system on his own property for his primary residence is not considered an installer for purposes of this subsection. (2) An installer of advanced treatment systems or products must be a factory-trained and authorized representative.  The manufacturer must furnish documentation to the department certifying the satisfactory completion of factory training and the establishment of the installer as an authorized manufacturer's representative. (3) The department shall issue a certification to an installer if the installer: (a) Completes an application form that complies with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the board; (b) Satisfactorily completes the training program for installation and maintenance provided by the department; (c) Pays the certification fee once every three (3) years, which shall be an amount not greater than One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00); any increase in the fee charged by the department under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65; and (d) Provides proof of having a valid general business liability insurance policy in effect with liability limits of at least Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per occurrence and at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in total aggregate amount. (4) Each installer shall furnish proof of certification to a property owner, lessee, the owner's representative or occupant of the property on which an individual on-site wastewater disposal system is to be designed, constructed, repaired or installed by that installer and to the department or its authorized representative, if requested. (5) The department shall provide for renewal of certifications once every three (3) years. (6) (a)  An installer's certification may be suspended or revoked by the department after notice and hearing if the installer violates this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted under this chapter. (b) The installer may appeal a suspension or revocation under this section as provided by law. (7) The department shall disseminate to the public an official list of certified installers. (8) If any person is operating in the state as an installer without certification by the board, the board, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. (9) The department shall provide for renewal of installer certifications to be applied for at the local department offices. SECTION 17.  Section 41-67-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-27. A person may not operate a business in or do business in the State of Mississippi as a manufacturer of components used in an individual on-site wastewater disposal system without holding a valid manufacturer's registration issued by the department.  If any person is operating in the state as a manufacturer without certification by the department, the department, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. SECTION 18.  Section 41-67-28, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-28. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person who shall knowingly violate this chapter or any rule or regulation or written order of the board in pursuance thereof is, upon conviction, guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in Section 41-3-59. (2) Each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation. (3) (a)  In addition to all other statutory and common law rights, remedies and defenses, any person who purchases an individual on-site wastewater disposal system and suffers any ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal, may bring an action at law in the court having jurisdiction in the county in which the installer or manufacturer has the principal place of business, where the act allegedly occurred, to recover any loss of money or damages for the loss of any property resulting from any of the following: (i) Improper installation of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system due to faulty workmanship; (ii) Failure of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system to operate properly due to failure to install the system in accordance with any requirements of the manufacturer or in compliance with any rules and regulations of the board; or (iii) Failure of an individual on-site wastewater disposal system to operate properly due to installation. (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit any class action or suit, but every private action must be maintained in the name of and for the sole use and benefit of the individual person. (4) A person who violates this chapter thereby causing a discharge off the property of the generator shall be liable to the party aggrieved or damaged by that violation for the actual damages and additional punitive damages equal to a maximum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the actual damages proven by the aggrieved party, to be taxed by the court where the suit is heard on an original action, by appeal or otherwise and recovered by a suit at law in any court of competent jurisdiction.  In addition, the court may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.  Before filing suit, the party aggrieved or damaged must give thirty (30) days' written notice of its intent to file suit to the alleged violator. (5) (a)  Any person who violates Section 41-67-7(5) or 41-67-11(2) may be assessed an administrative fine in the amount of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and the public water system may discontinue service to that property owner until the failure to comply with Section 41-67-7(5) or 41-67-11(2) has been corrected. (b) All violators shall be given thirty (30) days' notice before any adverse action. (c) Any violator shall have the right to appeal an adverse determination through the procedures set out in Section 41-67-29. SECTION 19.  Section 41-67-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-29. Any person who is aggrieved by any final decision of the board may appeal that final decision to the chancery court of the county of the situs in whole or in part of the subject matter.  The appellant shall give a cost bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the state in a sum to be fixed by the board or the court and to be filed with and approved by the clerk of the court.  The aggrieved party may, within thirty (30) days following a final decision of the board, petition the chancery court for an appeal with supersedeas and the chancellor shall grant a hearing on the petition.  Upon good cause shown the chancellor may grant the appeal with supersedeas.  The appellant shall be required to post a bond with sufficient sureties according to law in an amount to be determined by the chancellor.  The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing of appeals and the chancellor may hear the appeal in termtime or in vacation at any place in his district.  The appeal shall have precedence over all civil cases, except election contests.  The chancery court shall review all questions of law and of fact and may enter a final order or remand the matter to the board for appropriate action as may be indicated or necessary under the circumstances.  Appeals may be taken from the chancery court to the Supreme Court in the manner as now required by law, but if a supersedeas is desired by the party appealing to the chancery court, that party may apply therefor to the chancellor, who shall award a writ of supersedeas, without additional bond, if in the chancellor's judgment material damage is not likely to result.  If material damage is likely to result, the chancellor shall require a supersedeas bond as deemed proper, which shall be liable to the state for any damage. SECTION 20.  Section 41-67-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-33. (1)  The department shall adopt and use procedures for conducting reviews requested by any person aggrieved by the disapproval or requirements for an on-site wastewater disposal system as provided by the department in written form under Section 41-67-6.  The procedures shall include that the person may request review by submitting a written request of review to the Director of the Office of Environmental Health.  The request for review shall identify the matter contested and state the person's name, mailing address and home and daytime phone numbers.  Within ten (10) business days of the receipt of the request for review, the department shall issue in writing a ruling and determination to the person and if any corrections are necessary to any form previously issued by the department, then new forms shall be submitted to the person. (2)  Property owners may apply for a variance from the department by submitting a report for a proposed system to the department from a licensed professional engineer that the proposed wastewater treatment system will properly treat and maintain wastewater on the property and proof that the licensed professional engineer has errors and omissions insurance.  The department shall grant the variance but still have authority for final approval to inspect that the system is installed as designed.  All forms from the department relating to allowed wastewater systems shall include the variance option. (3) Any person aggrieved by the ruling issued by the Director of the Office of Environmental Health may apply for a hearing.  Any hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer designated by the department.  At the hearing, the hearing officer may conduct reasonable questioning of persons who make relevant factual allegations concerning the proposal.  The hearing officer shall require that all persons be sworn in before they may offer any testimony at the hearing, and the hearing officer is authorized to administer oaths.  Any person so choosing may be represented by counsel at the hearing.  A record of the hearing shall be made, which shall consist of a transcript of all testimony received, all documents and other material introduced, the staff report and recommendation, and any other material as the hearing officer considers relevant.  He shall make a recommendation within a reasonable period of time after the hearing is closed and after he has had an opportunity to review, study and analyze the evidence presented during the hearing.  The completed record shall be certified to the State Health Officer, who shall consider only the record in making his decision, and shall not consider any evidence or material that is not included.  All final decisions regarding the disapproval or requirements for an on-site wastewater disposal system shall be made by the State Health Officer. The State Health Officer shall make his written findings and issue his order after reviewing the record, not to exceed thirty (30) days following his receipt of the record. SECTION 21.  Section 41-67-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-37. (1)  A person may not operate as a certified professional evaluator in this state unless that person is currently certified by the department or is a licensed professional engineer. (2) A person must meet one (1) of the following requirements, in addition to the additional requirements set forth in other sections of this chapter and rules and regulations of the board, in order to be eligible to become a certified professional evaluator: (a) Be a professional geologist registered in the State of Mississippi; (b) Be a professional soil classifier licensed in the State of Mississippi; or (c) Be a person who possesses a demonstrable, adequate and appropriate record of professional experience and/or training as determined by the department. (3) The department shall issue a certification to a certified professional evaluator if the certified professional evaluator: (a) Completes an application form that complies with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter; (b) Satisfactorily completes the certified professional evaluator training program provided by the department; (c) Pays the certification fee once every three (3) years; any increase in the fee charged by the department under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65; and (d) Provides proof of having an errors and omissions policy or surety in effect with liability limits of at least Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per occurrence and at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in total aggregate amount. (4) Each certified professional evaluator shall furnish proof of certification to a property owner or the owner's representative of the property before performing a site evaluation of the property on which an individual on-site wastewater disposal system is to be designed, constructed, repaired or installed by the certified professional evaluator and to the department or its authorized representative, if requested. (5) The department shall provide for renewal of certifications once every three (3) years. (6) The department shall disseminate to the public an official list of certified professional evaluators. (7) If any person who is not a licensed professional engineer operates in the state as a certified professional evaluator without certification by the department, the department, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. SECTION 22.  Section 41-67-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-39. (1)  A person may not be engaged in the business of removing and disposing of the sludge and liquid waste (septage) from individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in this state unless that person has a valid certificate issued by the department. (2) The department shall issue a certificate to a pumper if the pumper: (a) Completes an application form that complies with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter; (b) Satisfactorily completes the certified pumper training program provided by the department; (c) Satisfactorily complies with the requirements of his/her pumping and hauling equipment; (d) Provides documentation of a disposal site approved by the Department of Environmental Quality, Office of Pollution Control; (e) Pays the license fee once every three (3) years; any increase in the fee charged by the department under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65; and (f) Provides proof of having a valid general business liability insurance policy in effect with liability limits of at least Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per occurrence and at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in total aggregate amount. (3) Each pumper or designated agent thereof, upon request, shall furnish proof of certification to an individual before entering a contract with that individual for the removing and disposing of the sludge and liquid waste (septage) from an individual on-site wastewater disposal system. (4) The department shall disseminate to the public an official list of certified pumpers. (5) If any person operates in the state as a certified pumper without a license by the board, the board, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. (6) The department may suspend or revoke a pumper certification if the pumper disposes of septage or other liquid waste in an unpermitted or unapproved site and/or violates this chapter or rules and regulations under this chapter. (7) A municipal wastewater treatment facility may make a site available for certified pumpers to dispose of septic or other liquid waste. (8) The department shall provide for renewal of certifications once every three (3) years. (9)  The department must provide for renewal pumper certifications to be applied for at the local department offices. SECTION 23.  Section 41-67-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-41. (1)  There is created the Wastewater Advisory Council for the purpose of advising the department regarding individual on-site wastewater disposal systems.  The advisory council shall be composed of the following: (a) One (1) appointee of the State Health Officer; (b) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the State Board of Health; (c) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the State Board of Health that represents a Mississippi Aerobic Treatment Unit (ATU) manufacturer; (d) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the State Board of Health that represents a certified installer; (e) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the State Board of Health that represents a septic tank or aggregate disposal manufacturer; (f) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality; (g) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Office of Pollution Control; (h) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission; (i) One (1) appointee of the Director of the Mississippi State Board of Registered Professional Geologists; (j) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Department of the Mississippi State University School of Civil and Environmental Engineering Companies; (k) The federally appointed Mississippi State Soil Scientist, or his designee; (l) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the American Council of Engineering Companies; (m) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Home Builders Association of Mississippi; (n) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Engineering Society; (o) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Manufactured Housing Association; (p) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Rural Water Association; (q) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; (r) One (1) appointee of the President of the Mississippi Pumpers Association; (s) One (1) appointee of the President of the Mississippi Water and Pollution Control Operators Association, Inc.; (t) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Realtors; and (u) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League. (2) The members of the advisory council shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from its membership. (3) The terms of appointments for each member shall be for a period of two (2) years. (4) The advisory council shall have quarterly meetings, with at least one (1) of those meetings taking place between forty-five (45) and sixty (60) days before the meeting of the board. (5) The department shall staff all advisory council meetings and record minutes of those meetings. SECTION 24.  Section 41-67-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-101.  (1)  There is created the Wastewater Advisory Board for the purpose of advising the Department of Health regarding individual on-site wastewater disposal systems.  The advisory board shall be composed of the following: (a) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the American Council of Engineering; (b) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Office of Pollution Control; (c) One (1) appointee of the State Health Officer; (d) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Home Builders Association of Mississippi; (e) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Mississippi State Board of Health that represents a Mississippi ATU manufacturer; (f) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Engineering Society; (g) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Manufactured Housing Association; (h) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Mississippi State Board of Health that represents a certified installer; (i) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Mississippi State Board of Health that represents a septic tank or aggregate disposal manufacturer; (j) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Rural Water Association; (k) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; (l) One (1) appointee of the President of the Mississippi Pumpers Association; (m) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission; (n) One (1) appointee of the President of the Mississippi Water and Pollution Control Operators Association, Inc.; (o) The federally appointed Mississippi State Soil Scientist, or his designee; (p) One (1) appointee of the Director of the Mississippi State Board of Registered Professional Geologists; (q) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality; (r) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Mississippi State Board of Health; (s) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Realtors; (t) One (1) appointee of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League; and (u) One (1) appointee of the Chairman of the Department of the Mississippi State University School of Civil and Environmental Engineering. (2) The members of the advisory committee shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from its membership. (3) The terms of appointments for each member shall be for a period of two (2) years. (4) The advisory committee shall have quarterly meetings, with at least one (1) of those meetings taking place between forty-five (45) and sixty (60) days before the meeting of the Mississippi State Board of Health. (5) The Mississippi Department of Health shall staff all advisory committee meetings and record minutes of those meetings. SECTION 25.  Section 11-27-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 11-27-81. The right of immediate possession pursuant to Sections 11-27-81 through 11-27-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, may be exercised only: (a) By the State Highway Commission for the acquisition of highway rights-of-way only; (b) By any county or municipality for the purpose of acquiring rights-of-way to connect existing roads and streets to highways constructed or to be constructed by the State Highway Commission; (c) By any county or municipality for the purpose of acquiring rights-of-way for widening existing roads and streets of such county or municipality; provided, however, that said rights-of-way shall not displace a property owner from his dwelling or place of business; (d) By the boards of supervisors of any county of this state for the acquisition of highway or road rights-of-way in connection with a state-aid project designated and approved in accordance with Sections 65-9-1 through 65-9-31, Mississippi Code of 1972; (e) By any county, municipality or county utility authority created under the Mississippi Gulf Region Utility Act, Section 49-17-701 et seq., for the purpose of acquiring rights-of-way for water, sewer, drainage and other public utility purposes; provided, however, that such acquisition shall not displace a property owner from his dwelling or place of business.  A county utility authority should prioritize utilizing easements within ten (10) feet of an existing right-of-way when economically feasible.  A county utility authority may not exercise the right to immediate possession under this paragraph after July 1, 2013.  Provisions of this paragraph (e) shall not apply to House District 109; (f) By any county authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain under Section 19-7-41 for the purpose of acquiring land for construction of a federal correctional facility or other federal penal institution; (g) By the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority for the purpose of acquiring land, property and rights-of-way for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 or any facility related to the project as provided in Section 57-75-11(e)(ii); (h) By the boards of supervisors of any county of this state for the purpose of constructing dams or low-water control structures on lakes or bodies of water under the provisions of Section 19-5-92; (i) By the board of supervisors of any county of this state for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way for any project the board of supervisors, by a duly adopted resolution, determines to be related to a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv).  The board of supervisors of a county may not exercise the right to immediate possession under this paragraph (i) after July 1, 2003; (j) By a regional economic development alliance created under Section 57-64-1 et seq., for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way within the project area and necessary for any project such an alliance, by a duly adopted resolution, determines to be related to a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi).  An alliance may not exercise the right to immediate possession under this paragraph (j) after July 1, 2012; (k) By the board of supervisors of any county of this state for the purpose of acquiring or clearing title to real property, property and/or rights-of-way within the project site and necessary for any project such board of supervisors, by a duly adopted resolution, determines to be related to a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii).  A county may not exercise the right to immediate possession under this paragraph (k) after July 1, 2012; or (l) By any public agency, as defined in Section 57-75-37(7)(a)(ii), for the purpose of acquiring land, property or interests therein, including, but not limited to, easements or rights-of-way for public highways and roads, and for public water utilities, public wastewater and wastewater treatment utilities, public drainage utilities and other public utility purposes in connection with a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii). SECTION 26.  Section 49-2-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-2-131. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022." (2) There is hereby established within the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program under which municipalities, counties and certain public utilities not regulated by the Public Service Commission may apply until February 1, 2023, for reimbursable grants to make necessary investments in water, wastewater, and stormwater infrastructure to be funded by the Legislature utilizing Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds made available under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA).  Such grants shall be made available to municipalities and counties to be matched with the Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded or to be awarded to them under ARPA on a one-to-one matching basis.  Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds that a county transfers to a municipality or that a county or municipality transfers to a public utility not regulated by the Public Service Commission are eligible on a one-to-one matching basis.  Municipalities that received less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the total allocation of Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds are eligible for a two-to-one match only on the Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded or to be awarded to them under ARPA.  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality shall only accept two (2) rounds of submissions under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program.  The second round of submissions shall be the final round.  The dollar amount for professional fees that can be allocated as a part of a county's, municipality's or public utility's matching share is not to exceed four percent (4%) of the total project cost. (3) For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a) "MCWI Grant Program" means the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program. (b) "ARPA" means the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which amends Title VI of the Social Security Act. (c) "State Recovery Funds" means Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 602 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (d) "Local Recovery Funds" means Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds awarded through Section 603 of Title VI of the Social Security Act amended by Section 9901 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2. (e) "Department" means the Department of Environmental Quality. (f) "Professional fees" means fees for the services of attorneys and engineering, surveying, and environmental studies. (g) "Project" means the infrastructure improvements defined in an application that (i) complies with all requirements of ARPA, and (ii) is eligible for a grant award under this section. (4) (a)  On or before July 1, 2022, the Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the MCWI Grant Program prescribed under this section, including application procedures and deadlines. The department is exempt from compliance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law in fulfilling the requirements of this section. (b) The Department of Health shall advise the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality regarding all such rules and regulations as related to the federal Safe Drinking Water Act. (5) Funding under the MCWI Grant Program shall be allocated to projects certified by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality as eligible for federal funding, including, but not be limited to, the following: (a) Construction of publicly owned treatment works; (b) Projects pursuant to the implementation of a nonpoint source pollution management program established under the Clean Water Act (CWA); (c) Decentralized wastewater treatment systems that treat municipal wastewater or domestic sewage; (d) Management and treatment of stormwater or subsurface drainage water; (e) Water conservation, efficiency, or reuse measures; (f) Development and implementation of a conservation and management plan under the CWA; (g) Watershed projects meeting the criteria set forth in the CWA; (h) Energy consumption reduction for publicly owned treatment works; (i) Reuse or recycling of wastewater, stormwater, or subsurface drainage water; (j) Facilities to improve drinking water quality; (k) Transmission and distribution, including improvements of water pressure or prevention of contamination in infrastructure and lead service line replacements; (l) New sources to replace contaminated drinking water or increase drought resilience, including aquifer storage and recovery system for water storage; (m) Storage of drinking water, such as to prevent contaminants or equalize water demands; (n) Purchase of water systems and interconnection of systems; (o) New community water systems; (p) Culvert repair, resizing, and removal, replacement of storm sewers, and additional types of stormwater infrastructure; (q) Dam and reservoir rehabilitation, if the primary purpose of dam or reservoir is for drinking water supply and project is necessary for the provision of drinking water; (r) Broad set of lead remediation projects eligible under EPA grant programs authorized by the Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation (WIIN) Act; and (s) Any eligible drinking water, wastewater or stormwater project through ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury. (6) The governing authority of a municipality, county or public utility that is not regulated by the Public Service Commission may submit an application for grant funds under this section if the applicant is an operator-member of Mississippi 811, Inc., as defined in Section 77-13-3.  Applicants shall certify to the department that each expenditure of the funds awarded to them under this section is in compliance with ARPA guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations and other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, by the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the State Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds.  Subsequent submissions will be due by the dates established by the department. (7) An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes. Each application for grant funds shall include the following at a minimum:  (a) applicant contact information; (b) project description and type of project; (c) project map; (d) estimate of population affected by the project; (e) disadvantaged community criteria (population, median household income, unemployment, current water/sewer rates); (f) estimated project cost; (g) list of match funds of direct Coronavirus Local Fiscal Recovery Funds received and to be received from the federal government, a certification that such funds have been or will be used for the project detailed in the application, and documentation of commitment; (h) estimated project schedule and readiness to proceed; (i) engineering services agreement; (j) engineering reports; and (k) information about status of obtaining any required permits. (8) The department must apply a system for use in ranking the grant applications received, unless the Legislature funds all eligible grant requests under the program.  When applying the ranking system, the department shall apply a greater weight to projects that have approved engineering/design, plans and permits if the department has deemed the project is ready to begin construction within six (6) months.  Projects that are included on the municipal or county engineer's approved list and provide applicable supporting documentation shall receive additional consideration awarded to the application.  The ranking system shall include the following factors, at a minimum:  (a) the environmental impact of the proposed project; (b) the proposed project's ability to address noncompliance with state/federal requirements; (c) the extent to which the project promotes economic development; (d) the number of people served by the project and the number of communities the project serves; (e) impacts of the proposed project on disadvantaged/overburdened communities; (f) the grant applicant's prior efforts to secure funding to address the proposed project's objectives; (g) the grant applicant's proposed contribution of other funds or in-kind cost-sharing to the proposed project; (h) the grant applicant's long-term plans for the financial and physical operation and maintenance of the project; (i) the grant applicant's capacity to initiate construction in a timely manner and complete the proposed project by the deadline specified by the United States Department of Treasury rules for ARPA funds; (j) the extent to which the project benefits multiple political subdivisions in a regional manner; (k) the project's ability to enhance public service infrastructure, including transportation and emergency access; and (l) any other factors as determined by the department. (9)  The grant program shall include a specific emphasis on addressing the needs of an economically disadvantaged community, including providing safe, reliable drinking water in areas that lack infrastructure, providing sewage treatment capacity in unsewered areas and providing regional development of infrastructure to serve multiple communities. (10) Applications shall be reviewed and scored as they are received, unless the Legislature funds all eligible grant requests under the program.  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality shall certify whether each project submitted is a "necessary investment" in water, wastewater, or stormwater infrastructure as defined in the American Rescue Plan Act and all applicable guidance issued by the United States Department of the Treasury.  The Department of Environmental Quality shall review the lists of recommended water infrastructure projects and issue its list of recommended projects to the Mississippi Department of Health for its advice.  Grant agreements shall be executed between the recipient and the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.  All final awards shall be determined at the discretion of the executive director of the department.  Any funds awarded to the City of Jackson under this section shall be deposited in the Capital City Water/Sewer Projects Fund of the State Treasury.  Funds shall be obligated to a grantee upon the execution of a grant agreement between the department and the approved applicant.  Funds shall be made available to a grantee when the department obtains the necessary support for reimbursement.  The department is authorized to conduct additional rounds of grants as needed; however, in the first round no more than forty percent (40%) of the total funds appropriated for each grant program may be awarded by the department, and the remaining funds may be awarded in the final round which shall occur no later than six (6) months from the previous round.  To ensure equitable treatment between the categories of projects, no less than twenty percent (20%) awarded under this section shall be allocated to each of the three (3) categories of drinking water projects, wastewater projects and stormwater projects.  In the final round, any funds not requested may be allocated to any category. (11) Grant funds shall be used prospectively; however, grant funds may be used to reimburse expenses incurred before the enactment of this program if the costs are adequately documented and comply with applicable ARPA guidelines.  An applicant must agree to obtain all necessary state and federal permits and follow all state bidding and contracting laws and fiscally sound practices in the administration of the funds. (12) (a)  Monies must be disbursed under this section in compliance with the guidelines, guidance, rules, regulations or other criteria, as may be amended from time to time, of the United States Department of the Treasury regarding the use of monies from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund, established by the American Rescue Plan of 2021. (b) The use of funds allocated under this program shall be subject to audit by the United States Department of the Treasury's Office of Inspector General and the Mississippi Office of the State Auditor.  Each person receiving funds under these programs found to be fully or partially noncompliant with the requirements in this section shall return to the state all or a portion of the funds received. (13) The department shall submit to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, House and Senate Appropriations Chairmen, and the Legislative Budget Office quarterly reports and annual reports that are due by the dates established in the Compliance and Reporting Guidance by the United States Department of Treasury.  The reports shall contain the applications received, the score of the applications, the amount of grant funds awarded to each applicant, the amount of grant funds expended by each applicant, and status of each applicant's project.  The score of the applications is not required if the award was provided in the final round of grants and the Legislature provided the total amount of funds for all eligible grant requests. (14) Grant funds shall be available under this section through December 31, 2026, or on the date of the fund expenditure deadline provided by the federal government, whichever occurs later.  Each grant recipient shall certify for any project for which a grant is awarded that if the project is not completed by December 31, 2026, and the United States Congress does not enact an extension of the deadline on the availability of ARPA funds, then the grant recipient will complete the project through other funds. (15) The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality may retain an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the total funds allocated to the program to defray administrative costs. (16) The department shall be exempt from provisions of the Public Procurement Review Board for any requirements of personal or professional service contracts or the pre-approval of the solicitation for such contracts used in the execution of its responsibilities under this section.  This subsection shall stand repealed on January 1, 2026. (17) The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027. SECTION 27.  Section 49-17-745, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-745. (1)  The county authority shall have the power, duty and responsibility to exercise general supervision over the design, construction, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems. (2) The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the design, construction or installation, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems. (3) The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the use of decentralized treatment systems, individual on-site wastewater treatment systems and centralized wastewater treatment systems. (4) The county authority shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for water, wastewater and storm water systems and the operation and maintenance of the same.  Such rules and regulations shall include the implementation of a standard application form for the installation, operation and maintenance of such systems; application review; approval or denial procedures for any proposed system; inspection, monitoring and reporting guidelines; and enforcement procedures. (5) (a)  Before a building or development which requires the installation of a water, wastewater or storm water system is constructed, the system must be submitted to the county authority for certification that the system complies with the county authority requirements for such system. (b) Before approving or renewing a water, wastewater or storm water related permit for a system within a county authority, the state agency must require certification that the system complies with the requirements of the county authority. (6) Any system of any municipality, public agency or other persons which contracts with a county authority, shall be subject to the terms of that contract and the terms of this act. (7) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 51-39-1 et seq., the county authority shall have the full power to adopt rules and regulations and to construct, maintain and operate facilities for the control of storm water quality and quantity.  In addition, the provisions of Section 51-33-1 et seq. relating to drainage districts and flood control districts do not apply to the county authority. (8) The county authority may control and operate the local retail water, wastewater or storm water services and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same service in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area. SECTION 28.  Section 97-25-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-25-59. (1)  Definition of "critical infrastructure facility."  As used in this act, unless otherwise defined, "critical infrastructure facility" means: (a) Any portion of an oil, gas, carbon dioxide, hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline or tank that is buried or enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier obviously designed to exclude intruders, or clearly marked with a sign or signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders and indicating that entry is forbidden without authorization. (b) One (1) of the following, if enclosed by a fence or other physical barrier obviously designed to exclude intruders, or if clearly marked with a sign or signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders and indicating that entry is forbidden without authorization: (i) A chemical or polymer manufacturing facility; (ii) A telecommunications central switching office; (iii) Wireless or other telecommunications infrastructure, including cell towers, communication towers, telephone poles and lines, cable headend or fiber-optic lines, other than those connecting to individual residences; (iv) A transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or television station, a governmental law enforcement or emergency services radio system, or electric utility; (v) A petroleum refinery; (vi) A liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility or compressed gas liquids plant or storage facility; (vii) A natural gas compressor station; (viii) A hydrocarbon processing plant, including a plant used in the processing, treatment or fractionation of oil, natural gas or natural gas liquids; (ix) A natural gas distribution utility facility, including transmission facilities, pipeline interconnections, a city gate or town border station, metering stations, piping, a regulator station or a natural gas storage facility; (x) A crude oil or refined products storage and distribution facility, including storage tanks, valve sites, pipeline interconnections, pump stations, metering stations, pipelines, or piping and truck loading or offloading facilities; (xi) An above-ground or underground mining facility; (xii) An electrical power generating facility, substation, switching station, communication facility, electrical control center or electric power lines and associated equipment infrastructure other than those connections to individual residences; (xiii) A data center or supercomputing center that has an average constant draw of at least one (1) megawatt of electricity; (xiv) A commercial airport, trucking terminal or other freight transportation facility, including a railroad switching yard, railroad facility or railroad track; (xv) Any reservoir that supplies water for industrial or municipal supplies or irrigation for multiple users or an irrigation district; or (xvi) A water intake structure, water treatment facility, wastewater treatment plant, pump station or water lines and associated equipment infrastructure other than those connections to individual residences. (c) Any site where the construction or improvement of any facility or structure referenced in this section is occurring. (2) Impeding critical infrastructure.  (a)  A person is guilty of impeding critical infrastructure if he or she intentionally or knowingly impedes the operations of a critical infrastructure facility in a manner not otherwise authorized by law. (b) Impeding critical infrastructure is: (i) A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if the impediment causes damage or economic loss, the cost of which is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); (ii) A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than seven (7) years, a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the impediment causes damage or economic loss, the cost of which is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more. (c) If a series of damage or loss results from a single continuing course of conduct, a single violation of this section may be charged and penalties imposed based on the aggregate cost of the damage or loss. (d) An organization that aids, abets, solicits, compensates, hires, conspires with, commands or procures a person to commit the crime of impeding critical infrastructure is subject to a fine not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), provided that the organization acted with the intent that the crime of impeding critical infrastructure be completed.  A critical infrastructure facility may maintain a civil action against an organization for damages suffered as a consequence of a violation of this subsection, including damages for lost profits, whether or not any fine is imposed pursuant to this subsection. (e) No person shall be liable for a violation of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection if the person: (i) Owns or legally occupies the land upon which the critical infrastructure facility is located and is engaged in conduct that is not inconsistent with the operation of the critical infrastructure facility or that is authorized by an agreement; (ii) Is lawfully engaged in any regulatory or legal process to which the critical infrastructure facility is subject; or (iii) Is engaged in conduct arising out of a bona fide dispute about access to land. (f) As used in this subsection, "impede" means: (i) To block the operation of or prevent legal access to a critical infrastructure facility or the construction site of a permitted critical infrastructure facility; or (ii) To damage, destroy, deface or tamper with the equipment of a critical infrastructure facility, whether completed or under construction. (3) Critical infrastructure trespass.  (a)  A person is guilty of critical infrastructure trespass if he or she enters or remains on or in a critical infrastructure facility or the construction site of a permitted critical infrastructure facility knowing he is not authorized to do so, or by means of false, forged, altered or counterfeit identification, or after having been notified to depart or not to trespass.  For purposes of this subsection, notice is given by: (i) Personal communication to the person by the owner or occupant, or his agent, or by a peace officer; (ii) Posting of signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders; or (iii) The presence of fencing or other physical barrier designed to exclude intruders. (b) Critical infrastructure trespass is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. (c) No person shall be liable for a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection if that person: (i) Owns or legally occupies the land upon which the facility is located and is engaged in conduct that is not inconsistent with the operation of the critical infrastructure facility or that is authorized by an agreement; or (ii) Is lawfully engaged in any regulatory or legal process to which the critical infrastructure facility is subject. (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit: (a) Public demonstrations or other expressions of free speech or free association to the extent such activity is protected under the United States or Mississippi Constitutions; (b) Lawful commercial or recreational activities conducted in the open or unconfined areas around a pipeline, including, but not limited to, fishing, hunting, boating and birdwatching; or (c) The lawful exercise of the right of ownership by an owner of real property, including use, enjoyment and disposition within the limits and under the conditions established by law. SECTION 29.  Section 17-25-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-25-13. (1)  For purposes of this section: (a) "Water sewer association" means any corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, that provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps, or stores raw or potable water to, or for the benefit of, members of the general public or commercial, industrial and other users; and (b) "Water sewer system" means any entity that provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps or stores raw or potable water to or for the benefit of members of the general public and commercial, industrial, and other users, including, without limitation, the following entities that perform such activities: (i) Municipalities; (ii) Counties; and (iii) Water sewer associations. (2)  (a)  When a person is delinquent on the payment of an undisputed bill for water sewer service provided by a water sewer system within this state, moves into another area of this state, and applies for or receives water from another water sewer system, if the person's former water sewer system establishes that there is no dispute that the delinquent amount is properly due and owed by that particular individual in that amount, the new water sewer system shall refuse to provide water sewer service to the delinquent person until such person provides proof of curing the delinquency. (b) This subsection shall not apply to a delinquency that has been disputed by the person in writing, unless the delinquency has been reduced to a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. (3)  No provision of this section shall apply to a water sewer system that is regulated by the Mississippi Public Service Commission as a "public utility" as defined in Section 77-3-3. SECTION 30.  Section 17-25-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-25-29. In addition to the rights prescribed in Section 79-11-177, a member of a member-owned rural water association or system, incorporated under Chapter 11, Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall have the right to attend regularly scheduled board meetings of the association or system.  Further, if a meeting pertains to the election of board members for the association or system, then the association or system shall provide written notice of the meeting by mail at least fifteen (15) days in advance of the meeting at which the election will occur.  The written notice shall also be included on any association's or system's invoice or statement that is submitted to the member within thirty (30) days of the meeting. SECTION 31.  Section 19-5-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-131. (1)  The boards of supervisors of any county in the State are hereby authorized to directly allocate Local Fiscal Recovery Funds made available under the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 to rural water associations, water supply districts, regional utility districts or regional utility authorities, and all other publicly constituted bodies which supply water, sewer, or storm water services to the people of the county for the purposes of funding water and sewer infrastructure projects. (2) The boards of supervisors are further authorized to directly allocate such funds to incorporated municipalities for the purposes of funding water, sewer and storm water infrastructure projects. (3) If the recipient association, district, authority or municipality serves customers in two (2) or more counties, the majority of water meters for the association, district, authority or municipality must be located in the county allocating such funds. SECTION 32.  Section 19-5-167, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-167. (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the powers of each district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of five (5) members to be appointed by the board of supervisors.  Upon their initial appointment, one (1) of the commissioners shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; one (1) for a term of two (2) years; one (1) for a term of three (3) years; one (1) for a term of four (4) years; and one (1) for a term of five (5) years; thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed and shall hold office for a term of five (5) years.  Any vacancy occurring on a board of commissioners shall be filled by the board of supervisors at any regular meeting of the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors shall have the authority to fill all unexpired terms of any commissioner or commissioners.  Notwithstanding the appointive authority herein granted to the board of supervisors, its legal and actual responsibilities, authority and function, subsequent to the creation of any district, shall be specifically limited to the appointive function and responsibilities outlined in Sections 19-5-179, 19-5-189 and 19-5-191, except that with fire protection districts, the board of supervisors shall have authority for dissolving, redefining and reconfiguring of such districts as may be appropriate to ensure the most appropriate and efficient fire protection coverage for the county's citizens.  The operation, management, abolition or dissolution of such district, and all other matters in connection therewith, shall be vested solely and only in the board of commissioners to the specific exclusion of the board of supervisors, and the abolition, dissolution or termination of any district shall be accomplished only by unanimous resolution of the board of commissioners, except that with fire protection districts, the board of supervisors shall have authority for the dissolving, redefining and reconfiguring of such districts when determined appropriate.  However, if any area within the boundaries of a fire protection district created under Section 19-5-151 et seq., is annexed by a municipality, a reduction of the boundaries of the district to exclude such annexed area may be accomplished by the adoption of a resolution by a majority vote of the board of commissioners of that fire protection district.  The county board of supervisors which has a fire protection district created under Section 19-5-151 et seq., may dissolve, redefine and reconfigure such district and, under Section 19-5-215 et seq., may create a fire protection grading district consisting of the same boundaries as the previously existing fire protection district or having amended boundaries as determined appropriate by the board of supervisors.  Petition and election requirements of Sections 19-5-217 through 19-5-227 shall not apply where the board of supervisors dissolves a fire protection district and creates a fire protection grading district under this section.  Except as otherwise provided herein, such board of supervisors or commissioners shall have no power, jurisdiction or authority to abolish, dissolve or terminate any district while the district has any outstanding indebtedness of any kind or character, unless arrangements are made for the assumption of any outstanding indebtedness by the subsequent district or by the county.   If a fire protection district is dissolved in accordance with this subsection, the board of supervisors may continue to levy the same millage as was being levied within the boundaries of the previous fire protection district before its dissolution provided that a fire protection grading district is created, in accordance with Section 19-5-215 et seq. (2) The board of supervisors of the incorporating county may consolidate such fire protection districts for administrative purposes.  The board of supervisors shall conduct a public hearing to determine the public's interest.  Following such a hearing, the board may create a consolidated commission consisting of the participating districts for administrative purposes.  Such districts then shall dissolve their respective boards of commissioners, transferring all records to the consolidated board of commissioners.  A consolidated board of commissioners consisting of not less than five (5) members shall be appointed with equal representation from each participating district.  Any commissioners appointed to a consolidated fire protection district commission must comply with eligibility requirements as authorized in Section 19-5-171.  In the event that a consolidated fire protection district commission consists of an even number of members, the chairman elected as authorized by Section 19-5-169 shall vote only in the event of a tie.  General powers and duties of commissioners and commissions and other related matters as defined in Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall apply to the entire area contained in the consolidating fire protection districts as described in the resolutions incorporating the fire protection districts as well as to subsequent annexations. (3) If the creation of the district is initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), the powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners selected in the following manner: (a) Upon creation of the district, the board of directors of the former nonprofit, nonshare corporation shall serve as the board of commissioners of the newly created water district for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.  The initial commissioners shall be subject to the requirements of Section 19-5-171, except the requirement for executing a bond.  If an initial commissioner fails to meet a requirement of Section 19-5-171 as provided in this section, the board of supervisors shall appoint a member to fill that vacancy on the board of commissioners. (b) In the resolution creating a district initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), the board of supervisors shall direct the existing board of directors of the rural water association to create within the district five (5) posts from which commissioners shall be elected.  The board of supervisors shall designate the positions to be elected from each post as Post 1, Post 2, Post 3, Post 4 and Post 5.  Post 5 shall be an at-large post composed of the entire district. Within sixty (60) days following creation of the district, the board of supervisors shall call an election.  Such election shall be held and conducted by the election commissioners in accordance with the general laws governing elections.  The election commissioners shall determine which of the qualified electors of the county reside within the district and only those electors shall be entitled to vote in the election.  Notice of the election setting forth the time, place or places and the purpose of the election shall be published by the clerk of the board of supervisors in the manner provided in Section 19-5-155. The initial elected commissioners shall be elected to a term of office expiring on December 31 of the year in which the next succeeding general election for statewide officials is held.  After the initial term of office, commissioners shall be elected to four-year terms.  Vacancies shall be filled by the procedure set forth in Section 23-15-839. (4) For any water and sewer district located within the corporate limits of a municipality that was incorporated on or after January 2012, the powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of five (5) members, each to be appointed by the governing authority of such municipality, one (1) member to be appointed from each municipal ward in the city.  Each commissioner shall be appointed and shall hold office for a term of five (5) years.  Any vacancy occurring on the board of commissioners shall be filled by the governing authority of the municipality at any regular meeting.  Appointments to fill vacancies in unexpired terms of office shall be for the remaining unexpired term of office for such position. SECTION 33.  Section 19-5-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-175. Districts created under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall have the powers enumerated in the resolution of the board of supervisors creating such districts but shall be limited to the conducting and operating of a water supply system, a sewer system, a garbage and waste collection and disposal system, a fire protection system, a combined water and fire protection system, a combined water and sewer system, a combined water and garbage and waste collection and disposal system, or a combined water, sewer, garbage and waste collection and disposal and fire protection system; and to carry out such purpose or purposes, such districts shall have the power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, consolidate, maintain and operate such system or systems, and to contract with any municipality, person, firm or corporation for such services and for a supply and distribution of water, for collection, transportation, treatment and/or disposal of sewage and for services required incident to the operation and maintenance of such systems.  As long as any such district continues to furnish any of the services which it was authorized to furnish in and by the resolution by which it was created, it shall be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish such services within such district.  However, if the board of commissioners of such district and the board of supervisors unanimously agree, the county may contract directly with any fire protection services provider, in which case the board of supervisors may distribute directly to the fire protection services provider any or all of the funds that otherwise would be distributed to the fire protection district. Any district created pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be vested with all the powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purpose for which such district is created.  No enumeration of powers herein shall be construed to impair or limit any general grant of power herein contained nor to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those enumerated.  Such districts are empowered to do all acts necessary, proper or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted under such sections. SECTION 34.  Section 21-25-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-25-51. (1)  It is the purpose of Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59 to permit the governing authorities of any municipality and a rural water association operating within the corporate limits of the municipality to make the most efficient use of their powers in upgrading their respective water systems for the purpose of improving local fire protection by enabling them to cooperate and to contract with each other on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby provide services and facilities in a manner that will accord best with geographic, economic, population and other factors influencing the needs and development of the fire protection of local communities. (2) The governing authorities of any municipality may enter into an interlocal agreement with any rural water association operating within the corporate limits of the municipality for the purpose of constructing, new construction or upgrading the water system of the municipality or the water association, or both, for the purpose of improving the fire protection of the municipality. SECTION 35.  Section 21-25-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-25-53. (1)  No interlocal agreement made under Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59 shall be entered into by any municipality or rural water association without the approval by resolution on the minutes of the governing authorities of the municipality and the rural water association. (2) No power, authority and responsibility may be exercised under Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59 by the governing authorities of any municipality or rural water association which it would not have authority to exercise otherwise pursuant to the law controlling such municipality or association. (3) Any power, authority or responsibility exercised or capable of being exercised by the governing authorities of any municipality of this state may be exercised and carried out jointly with the governing authorities of any rural water association. SECTION 36.  Section 21-25-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-25-55. Any agreement made under the provisions of Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59 shall specify the following: (a) Its duration. (b) Its purpose or purposes. (c) The precise organization, composition, nature and powers of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby; the specific citation of statutory authority vested in each of the governing authorities of the municipality and rural water association which are to be a party to the agreement. (d) The manner of financing, staffing and supplying the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefore; provided, that the treasurer and the disbursing officer of either the municipality or the association, or both, shall be designated in the agreement to receive, disburse and account for all funds of the joint undertaking as a part of the duties of the officer or officers. (e) The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination or amendment of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination or amendment. (f) The provision for administration, through a joint board or other appropriate means, of the joint or cooperative undertaking in the event that the agreement does not or may not establish a separate administrative body or legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking.  In the case of a joint board, both the governing authorities of the municipality and the rural water association shall be represented. (g) The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking in the event that the agreement does not or may not establish a separate administrative body or legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking. (h) Any other necessary and proper matters. SECTION 37.  Section 21-25-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-25-57. The governing authorities of any municipality entering into an interlocal agreement with a rural water association operating within the corporate limits of the municipality pursuant to Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59 may incur bonded and floating indebtedness, including general obligation indebtedness as authorized by Sections 21-33-301 through 21-33-329 and may appropriate funds for the purpose and in the manner prescribed by law without regard to whether the activities and improvements authorized under Section 21-25-51 to be financed by such debt or appropriation are within or without the corporate limits of the municipality.  The governing authorities of the municipality may sell, lease, grant or otherwise supply goods and services to the rural water association which is a party to the interlocal agreement or the administrative body or legal entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking. SECTION 38.  Section 21-25-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-25-59. After a water system has been constructed or upgraded pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21-25-51 through 21-25-59, the municipality which reimbursed or paid a rural water system for the cost of such construction or upgrading shall not be charged with the costs of such construction or upgrade upon its purchase of the water system.  The price of such newly constructed or upgraded water system shall be reduced by an amount equal to the costs paid by the municipality to the rural water system for such construction or upgrading of the water system. SECTION 39.  Section 21-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-7. (1)  (a)  The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to erect, purchase, maintain and operate waterworks, and to regulate the same, and to prescribe the rates at which water shall be supplied to the users.  The rates at which water, wastewater, and sewer services shall be supplied shall be just and reasonable based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the systems, and rates may not be unreasonably preferential, prejudicial or discriminatory but shall be sufficient, equitable and consistent in application to each class of users.  While a municipality may set different rates for different classifications of users, a municipality shall not discriminate in setting rates among members of the same classification.  The municipal governing authorities shall make a finding on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the system.  A municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received which is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (b) The governing authorities of a municipality shall establish and maintain rates and charges in equitable proportion to the use of the services and benefits rendered by the waterworks systems and water treatment facilities serving the municipal area.  From time to time the governing authorities shall adjust such rates, to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such works, facilities and systems and all of the municipality's obligations under any contract or bond resolution with respect thereto.  The calculation of a user's bill shall be limited to the actual amount of volumetric usage, plus those fees reasonable and necessary for the cost of capital expenses, system operation and maintenance, and debt service. (c) If a user's meter is tampered with, unreadable, or otherwise out-of-order, a municipality may render an estimated bill to that user for a period not to exceed six (6) months.  In such circumstance, an estimated bill shall be based upon the prior average measured usage of the user or a similar user of the same classification. (i) Only in the event a municipality is unable to meet the requirement of billing based solely on volumetric usage, such municipality may bill based on a flat fee rate where such municipality has established flat fee billing as its usual and customary billing practice prior to July 1, 2023, and where such municipality is actively billing based upon a flat fee rate as of July 1,2023. In such circumstances, flat fee billing may be utilized until such time as the municipality implements upgrades to its system to provide for volumetric billing.  In such circumstance, the municipality may set different flat fee rates for different classifications of users, but the municipality shall not discriminate in setting flat fee rates among members of the same classification, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (ii) The governing authorities of the municipality shall make a finding annually on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based upon the actual cost to operate and maintain the system as determined under Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality, or based on the assessed value of the property, to provide such services. (d) Notice of any change in the rate or rate structure at which services are supplied shall be posted on all bills sent to users at least one (1) month prior to the effective date of the rate change.  Notice shall also be posted to the municipality's online web page or bill payment platform, if the municipality has an online web page or bill payment platform. (e) Nothing in this statute shall be construed as prohibiting a user or governing authority of any municipality from applying for and receiving any federally or privately subsidized payment assistance, grant or other funds. (f) The governing authority of a municipality may provide for the calculation of a user's bill by a method other than volumetric usage only in exchange for consideration as part of, or in connection with, an incentive contract or other form of benefit or assistance related to the user's location, expansion, or maintenance of its commercial or industrial operation within the municipality, so long as such rate is equitable, fair, and nondiscriminatory, and the municipality shall not charge such user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (2) The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to acquire by purchase, donation or condemnation, in the name of the municipality, suitable grounds, within or without the corporate limits, upon which to erect waterworks, and also the right-of-way to and from such works and the right-of-way for laying water pipes within the corporate limits, and from such waterworks to the municipality, and to extend such right-of-way from time to time.  The governing authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the maintenance and operation of waterworks.  The authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the erection and maintenance of waterworks for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, fixing water rates in the contract subject to municipal regulations.  A contract for the erection or purchase of waterworks shall not, however, be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  A contract for maintenance under which the person who will perform such maintenance is wholly or partially responsible for fixing water rates shall not be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  It shall be unlawful for any municipally owned waterworks to supply water free of charge, or in any amount less than the fixed charges, to any person, firm or corporation, except as is expressly authorized by law. SECTION 40.  Section 21-27-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-75. (1)  The governing authorities of a municipality are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to enter into an interlocal agreement with a rural water association operating within the corporate limits of the municipality that requires the association to terminate the water service of any of its customers who are thirty (30) days or more delinquent in the payment of charges for sewer services provided by the municipality. (2) Any agreement entered into under this section shall at a minimum: (a) Require the municipality to notify the association of any customer of the association who also has sewer service provided by the municipality who is thirty (30) days or more delinquent in the payment of sewer charges by a method agreeable to the municipality and the association; (b) Provide that upon receipt of a notification the association shall terminate the water service of the named customer; (c) Provide that upon satisfaction of the delinquency and any fees connected with the delinquency and the termination of water service, the association shall restart the water service of the customer; (d) Provide that the municipality shall save and hold harmless the association against any and all claims based on the disconnection of water or sewer service and any other damages resulting from any action taken by the association under an interlocal agreement entered into under this section. (3) Upon entering into an interlocal agreement under this section, the association is authorized to terminate the water service of any customer delinquent in the payment of sewer charges to the municipality pursuant to the terms of the interlocal agreement. SECTION 41.  Section 27-104-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-104-7.  (1)  (a)  There is created the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall be reconstituted on January 1, 2018, and shall be composed of the following members: (i) Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; (ii) Two (2) individuals appointed by the Lieutenant Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; and (iii) The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, serving as an ex officio and nonvoting member. (b) The initial terms of each appointee shall be as follows: (i) One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; (ii) One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020; (iii) One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2021; (iv) One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; and (v) One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020. After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members' terms shall be for a period of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term, and until such time as the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. (c) When appointing members to the Public Procurement Review Board, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall take into consideration persons who possess at least five (5) years of management experience in general business, health care or finance for an organization, corporation or other public or private entity. Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who receives any grants, procurements or contracts that are subject to approval under this section shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who is a principal of the source providing a personal or professional service shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board if the principal owns or controls a greater than five percent (5%) interest or has an ownership value of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the source's business, whichever is smaller.  No member shall be an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi while serving as a voting member on the Public Procurement Review Board. (d) Members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be entitled to per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and travel reimbursement as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (e) The members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall elect a chair from among the membership, and he or she shall preside over the meetings of the board.  The board shall annually elect a vice chair, who shall serve in the absence of the chair.  No business shall be transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the board.  Three (3) members shall be a quorum.  No action shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the board and signed by the chair.  Necessary clerical and administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Minutes shall be kept of the proceedings of each meeting, copies of which shall be filed on a monthly basis with the chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2) The Public Procurement Review Board shall have the following powers and responsibilities: (a) Approve all purchasing regulations governing the purchase or lease by any agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, of commodities and equipment, except computer equipment acquired pursuant to Sections 25-53-1 through 25-53-29; (b) Adopt regulations governing the approval of contracts let for the construction and maintenance of state buildings and other state facilities as well as related contracts for architectural and engineering services. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to such contracts involving buildings and other facilities of state institutions of higher learning which are self-administered as provided under this paragraph (b) or Section 37-101-15(m); (c) Adopt regulations governing any lease or rental agreement by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  These regulations shall require each agency requesting to lease such space to provide the following information that shall be published by the Department of Finance and Administration on its website: the agency to lease the space; the terms of the lease; the approximate square feet to be leased; the use for the space; a description of a suitable space; the general location desired for the leased space; the contact information for a person from the agency; the deadline date for the agency to have received a lease proposal; any other specific terms or conditions of the agency; and any other information deemed appropriate by the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Public Procurement Review Board.  The information shall be provided sufficiently in advance of the time the space is needed to allow the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration to review and preapprove the lease before the time for advertisement begins; (d) Adopt, in its discretion, regulations to set aside at least five percent (5%) of anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the department and shall be subject to all bid requirements.  Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder; however, if no minority bid is available or if the minority bid is more than two percent (2%) higher than the lowest bid, then bids shall be accepted and awarded to the lowest and best bidder.  However, the provisions in this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the rejection of a bid when only one (1) bid is received.  Such rejection shall be placed in the minutes.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (i) Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (ii) Hispanic:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (iii) Asian-American:  having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (iv) American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original people of North America; or (v) Female; (e) In consultation with and approval by the Chairs of the Senate and House Public Property Committees, approve leases, for a term not to exceed eighteen (18) months, entered into by state agencies for the purpose of providing parking arrangements for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building; (f) (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, promulgate rules and regulations governing the solicitation and selection of contractual services personnel, including personal and professional services contracts for any form of consulting, policy analysis, public relations, marketing, public affairs, legislative advocacy services or any other contract that the board deems appropriate for oversight, with the exception of: 1. Any personal service contracts entered into by any agency that employs only nonstate service employees as defined in Section 25-9-107(c); 2. Any personal service contracts entered into for computer or information technology-related services governed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; 3. Any personal service contracts entered into by the individual state institutions of higher learning; 4. Any personal service contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation; 5. Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services through June 30, 2019, which the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services determines would be useful in establishing and operating the Department of Child Protection Services; 6. Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Child Protection Services through June 30, 2019; 7. Any contracts for entertainers and/or performers at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds entered into by the Mississippi Fair Commission; 8. Any contracts entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration when procuring aircraft maintenance, parts, equipment and/or services; 9. Any contract entered into by the Department of Public Safety for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for use by the Office of Forensics Laboratories; 10. Any personal or professional service contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Health or the Department of Revenue solely in connection with their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act from February 2, 2022, through June 30, 2026; 11. Any contract for attorney, accountant, actuary auditor, architect, engineer, anatomical pathologist, or utility rate expert services; 12. Any personal service contracts approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and entered into by the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility through June 30, 2022; 13. Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the State Department of Health in carrying out its responsibilities under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program through June 30, 2026; 14. And any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022, through June 30, 2026; 15. Any personal or professional services contract entered into by an agency for the design, operation or maintenance of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contracts arising from the use of this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency; 16. Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under Section 49-2-13(l).  This item 16 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028; and 17. Any contract entered into by the State Department of Health for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for the use by the Public Health Laboratory. Any such rules and regulations shall provide for maintaining continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures as required under Section 7-7-3(6)(d).  Any rules and regulation changes related to personal and professional services contracts that the Public Procurement Review Board may propose shall be submitted to the Chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairs of the Appropriation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives at least fifteen (15) days before the board votes on the proposed changes, and those rules and regulation changes, if adopted, shall be promulgated in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. (ii) From and after July 1, 2024, the Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate rules and regulations that require the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority, with assistance to be provided from these entities.  Any powers that have been conferred upon agencies in order to comply with the provisions of this section for personal and professional services solicitations shall be conferred upon the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  The Department of Finance and Administration shall make any submissions that are required to be made by other agencies to the Public Procurement Review Board for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027; (g) Approve all personal and professional services contracts involving the expenditures of funds in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and in subsection (8); (h) Develop mandatory standards with respect to contractual services personnel that require invitations for public bid, requests for proposals, record keeping and financial responsibility of contractors.  The Public Procurement Review Board shall, unless exempted under this paragraph (h) or under paragraph (i) or (o) of this subsection (2), require the agency involved to submit the procurement to a competitive procurement process, and may reserve the right to reject any or all resulting procurements; (i) Prescribe certain circumstances by which agency heads may enter into contracts for personal and professional services without receiving prior approval from the Public Procurement Review Board.  The Public Procurement Review Board may establish a preapproved list of providers of various personal and professional services for set prices with which state agencies may contract without bidding or prior approval from the board; (i) Agency requirements may be fulfilled by procuring services performed incident to the state's own programs.  The agency head shall determine in writing whether the price represents a fair market value for the services.  When the procurements are made from other governmental entities, the private sector need not be solicited; however, these contracts shall still be submitted for approval to the Public Procurement Review Board. (ii) Contracts between two (2) state agencies, both under Public Procurement Review Board purview, shall not require Public Procurement Review Board approval. However, the contracts shall still be entered into the enterprise resource planning system; (j) Provide standards for the issuance of requests for proposals, the evaluation of proposals received, consideration of costs and quality of services proposed, contract negotiations, the administrative monitoring of contract performance by the agency and successful steps in terminating a contract; (k) Present recommendations for governmental privatization and to evaluate privatization proposals submitted by any state agency; (l) Authorize personal and professional service contracts to be effective for more than one (1) year provided a funding condition is included in any such multiple year contract, except the State Board of Education, which shall have the authority to enter into contractual agreements for student assessment for a period up to ten (10) years.  The State Board of Education shall procure these services in accordance with the Public Procurement Review Board procurement regulations; (m) Request the State Auditor to conduct a performance audit on any personal or professional service contract; (n) Prepare an annual report to the Legislature concerning the issuance of personal and professional services contracts during the previous year, collecting any necessary information from state agencies in making such report; (o) Develop and implement the following standards and procedures for the approval of any sole source contract for personal and professional services regardless of the value of the procurement: (i) For the purposes of this paragraph (o), the term "sole source" means only one (1) source is available that can provide the required personal or professional service. (ii) An agency that has been issued a binding, valid court order mandating that a particular source or provider must be used for the required service must include a copy of the applicable court order in all future sole source contract reviews for the particular personal or professional service referenced in the court order. (iii) Any agency alleging to have a sole source for any personal or professional service, other than those exempted under paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and subsection (8), shall publish on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165, for at least fourteen (14) days, the terms of the proposed contract for those services.  In addition, the publication shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: 1. The personal or professional service offered in the contract; 2. An explanation of why the personal or professional service is the only one that can meet the needs of the agency; 3. An explanation of why the source is the only person or entity that can provide the required personal or professional service; 4. An explanation of why the amount to be expended for the personal or professional service is reasonable; and 5. The efforts that the agency went through to obtain the best possible price for the personal or professional service. (iv) If any person or entity objects and proposes that the personal or professional service published under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (o) is not a sole source service and can be provided by another person or entity, then the objecting person or entity shall notify the Public Procurement Review Board and the agency that published the proposed sole source contract with a detailed explanation of why the personal or professional service is not a sole source service. (v) 1.  If the agency determines after review that the personal or professional service in the proposed sole source contract can be provided by another person or entity, then the agency must withdraw the sole source contract publication from the procurement portal website and submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process. 2. If the agency determines after review that there is only one (1) source for the required personal or professional service, then the agency may appeal to the Public Procurement Review Board.  The agency has the burden of proving that the personal or professional service is only provided by one (1) source. 3. If the Public Procurement Review Board has any reasonable doubt as to whether the personal or professional service can only be provided by one (1) source, then the agency must submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process.  No action taken by the Public Procurement Review Board in this appeal process shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members of the Public Procurement Review Board present and voting. (vi) The Public Procurement Review Board shall prepare and submit a quarterly report to the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees that details the sole source contracts presented to the Public Procurement Review Board and the reasons that the Public Procurement Review Board approved or rejected each contract.  These quarterly reports shall also include the documentation and memoranda required in subsection (4) of this section.  An agency that submitted a sole source contract shall be prepared to explain the sole source contract to each committee by December 15 of each year upon request by the committee; (p) Assess any fines and administrative penalties provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. (3) All submissions shall be made sufficiently in advance of each monthly meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board as prescribed by the Public Procurement Review Board.  If the Public Procurement Review Board rejects any contract submitted for review or approval, the Public Procurement Review Board shall clearly set out the reasons for its action, including, but not limited to, the policy that the agency has violated in its submitted contract and any corrective actions that the agency may take to amend the contract to comply with the rules and regulations of the Public Procurement Review Board. (4) All sole source contracts for personal and professional services awarded by state agencies, other than those exempted under Section 27-104-7(2)(f) and (8), whether approved by an agency head or the Public Procurement Review Board, shall contain in the procurement file a written determination for the approval, using a request form furnished by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The written determination shall document the basis for the determination, including any market analysis conducted in order to ensure that the service required was practicably available from only one (1) source.  A memorandum shall accompany the request form and address the following four (4) points: (a) Explanation of why this service is the only service that can meet the needs of the purchasing agency; (b) Explanation of why this vendor is the only practicably available source from which to obtain this service; (c) Explanation of why the price is considered reasonable; and (d) Description of the efforts that were made to conduct a noncompetitive negotiation to get the best possible price for the taxpayers. (5) In conjunction with the State Personnel Board, the Public Procurement Review Board shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations to define the allowable legal relationship between contract employees and the contracting departments, agencies and institutions of state government under the jurisdiction of the State Personnel Board, in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for federal employment tax purposes.  Under these regulations, the usual common law rules are applicable to determine and require that such worker is an independent contractor and not an employee, requiring evidence of lawful behavioral control, lawful financial control and lawful relationship of the parties.  Any state department, agency or institution shall only be authorized to contract for personnel services in compliance with those regulations. (6) No member of the Public Procurement Review Board shall use his or her official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment, or otherwise, the purchase of commodities, the contracting for personal or professional services, or the contracting for public construction under this chapter. (7) Notwithstanding any other laws or rules to the contrary, the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not be applicable to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport. (8) Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System to enter into any personal or professional services contracts directly related to their constitutional obligation to manage the trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts.  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the State Treasurer to enter into any personal or professional services contracts involving the management of trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. (9) Through December 31, 2026, the provisions of this section related to rental agreements or leasing of real property for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the Office of Workforce Development created in Section 37-153-7. SECTION 42.  Section 31-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 31-7-9. (1)  (a)  The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt purchasing regulations governing the purchase by any agency of any commodity or commodities and establishing standards and specifications for a commodity or commodities and the maximum fair prices of a commodity or commodities, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board.  It shall have the power to amend, add to or eliminate purchasing regulations.  The adoption of, amendment, addition to or elimination of purchasing regulations shall be based upon a determination by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management with the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, that such action is reasonable and practicable and advantageous to promote efficiency and economy in the purchase of commodities by the agencies of the state.  Upon the adoption of any purchasing regulation, or an amendment, addition or elimination therein, copies of same shall be furnished to the State Auditor and to all agencies affected thereby.  Thereafter, and except as otherwise may be provided in subsection (2) of this section, no agency of the state shall purchase any commodities covered by existing purchasing regulations unless such commodities be in conformity with the standards and specifications set forth in the purchasing regulations and unless the price thereof does not exceed the maximum fair price established by such purchasing regulations.  The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall furnish to any county or municipality or other local public agency of the state requesting same, copies of purchasing regulations adopted by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management and any amendments, changes or eliminations of same that may be made from time to time. (b) The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management may adopt purchasing regulations governing the use of credit cards, procurement cards and purchasing club membership cards to be used by state agencies, governing authorities of counties and municipalities, school districts and the Chickasawhay Natural Gas District.  Use of the cards shall be in strict compliance with the regulations promulgated by the office.  Any amounts due on the cards shall incur interest charges as set forth in Section 31-7-305 and shall not be considered debt. (c) Pursuant to the provision of Section 37-61-33(2), the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to issue procurement cards or credentials for a digital solution to all public school district classroom teachers, charter school teachers, full- or part-time gifted or special education teachers and other necessary direct support personnel at the beginning of the school year, but no later than August 1 of each year, for the purchase of instructional supplies using Educational Enhancement Funds.  The cards will be issued in equal amounts per teacher determined by the total number of qualifying personnel and the then current state appropriation for classroom instructional supplies under the Education Enhancement Fund.  All purchases shall be in accordance with state law and teachers are responsible for verification of capital asset requirements when pooling monies to purchase equipment.  The cards will expire on a predetermined date at the end of each school year, but not before April 1 of each year.  All unexpended amounts will be carried forward, to be combined with the following year's instructional supply fund allocation, and reallocated for the following year.  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to loan any start-up funds at the beginning of the school year to fund this procurement system for instructional supplies with loan repayment being made from sales tax receipts earmarked for the Education Enhancement Fund. (d) In a sale of goods or services, the seller shall not impose a surcharge on a buyer who uses a state-issued credit card, procurement card, travel card, or fuel card.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall have exclusive jurisdiction to enforce and adopt rules relating to this paragraph.  Any rules adopted under this paragraph shall be consistent with federal laws and regulations governing credit card transactions described by this paragraph. This paragraph does not create a cause of action against an individual for a violation of this paragraph. (2) The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, purchasing regulations governing the purchase of unmarked vehicles to be used by the Bureau of Narcotics and Department of Public Safety in official investigations pursuant to Section 25-1-87.  Such regulations shall ensure that purchases of such vehicles shall be at a fair price and shall take into consideration the peculiar needs of the Bureau of Narcotics and Department of Public Safety in undercover operations. (3) The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, regulations governing the certification process for certified purchasing offices, including the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, which shall be required of all purchasing agents at state agencies.  Such regulations shall require entities desiring to be classified as certified purchasing offices to submit applications and applicable documents on an annual basis, and in the case of a state agency purchasing office, to have one hundred percent (100%) participation and completion by purchasing agents in the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, at which time the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management may provide the governing entity with a certification valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance.  The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall set a fee in an amount that recovers its costs to administer the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, which shall be assessed to the participating state agencies. (4) The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt purchasing regulations authorizing rural water associations to purchase at the state contract price afforded to agencies and governing authorities under this chapter. SECTION 43.  Section 41-3-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-3-16. (1)  (a)  There is established a local governments and rural water systems improvements revolving loan and grant program to be administered by the State Department of Health, referred to in this section as "department," for the purpose of assisting counties, incorporated municipalities, the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, other districts and other water organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under either federal or state law, in making improvements to their water systems, including construction of new water systems or expansion or repair of existing water systems.  Loan and grant proceeds may be used by the recipient for planning, professional services, acquisition of interests in land, acquisition of personal property, construction, construction-related services, maintenance, and any other reasonable use which the board, in its discretion, may allow. For purposes of this section, "water systems" has the same meaning as the term "public water system" under Section 41-26-3. (b) (i)  There is created a board to be known as the "Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Improvements Board," referred to in this section as "board," to be composed of the following nine (9) members:  the State Health Officer, or his designee, who shall serve as chairman of the board; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League, or his designee; the Executive Director of the American Council of Engineering Companies of Mississippi, or his designee; the State Director of the United States Department of Agriculture, Rural Development, or his designee; and a manager of a rural water system. The Governor shall appoint a manager of a rural water system from a list of candidates provided by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Rural Water Association.  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Rural Water Association shall provide the Governor a list of candidates which shall contain a minimum of three (3) candidates for each appointment. (ii) Nonappointed members of the board may designate another representative of their agency or association to serve as an alternate. (iii) The gubernatorial appointee shall serve a term concurrent with the term of the Governor and until a successor is appointed and qualified.  No member, officer or employee of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Rural Water Association shall be eligible for appointment. (c) The department, if requested by the board, shall furnish the board with facilities and staff as needed to administer this section.  The department may contract, upon approval by the board, for those facilities and staff needed to administer this section, including routine management, as it deems necessary. The board may advertise for or solicit proposals from public or private sources, or both, for administration of this section or any services required for administration of this section or any portion thereof.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the board endeavor to ensure that the costs of administration of this section are as low as possible in order to provide the water consumers of Mississippi safe drinking water at affordable prices. (d) Members of the board may not receive any salary, compensation or per diem for the performance of their duties under this section. (2) (a)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the "Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Improvements Revolving Loan Fund," referred to in this section as "revolving fund," which fund shall consist of those monies as provided in Sections 6 and 13 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  The revolving fund may receive appropriations, bond proceeds, grants, gifts, donations or funds from any source, public or private.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the revolving fund shall be credited with all repayments of principal and interest derived from loans made from the revolving fund.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the monies in the revolving fund may be expended only in amounts appropriated by the Legislature, and the different amounts specifically provided for the loan program and the grant program shall be so designated. Except as otherwise provided in this section, monies in the fund may only be expended for the grant program from the amount designated for such program. The revolving fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the revolving fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the revolving fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the revolving fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  Any monies in the fund may be used to match any federal funds that are available for the same or related purposes for which funds are used and expended under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  Any federal funds shall be used and expended only in accordance with federal laws, rules and regulations governing the expenditure of those funds. No person shall use any monies from the revolving fund for the acquisition of real property or any interest in real property unless that property is integral to the project funded under this section and the purchase is made from a willing seller.  No county, incorporated municipality or district shall acquire any real property or any interest in any real property for a project funded through the revolving fund by condemnation.  The board's application of Sections 43-37-1 through 43-37-13 shall be no more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage and effect than federal property acquisition laws and regulations. (b) There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the "Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Emergency Loan Fund," hereinafter referred to as "emergency fund," which fund shall consist of those monies as provided in Sections 6 and 13 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995. The emergency fund may receive appropriations, bond proceeds, grants, gifts, donations or funds from any source, public or private.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the emergency fund shall be credited with all repayments of principal and interest derived from loans made from the emergency fund.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the monies in the emergency fund may be expended only in amounts appropriated by the Legislature.  The emergency fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in this section and Section 6 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the emergency fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund.  Any interest earned on amounts in the emergency fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the emergency fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under this section and Section 6 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995. (c) The board created in subsection (1) shall establish loan and grant programs by which loans and grants may be made available to counties, incorporated municipalities, districts or other water organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under either federal or state law, to assist those counties, incorporated municipalities, districts or water organizations in making water systems improvements, including the construction of new water systems or expansion or repair of existing water systems.  Any entity eligible under this section may receive either a loan or a grant, or both.  No grant awarded under the program established in this section may be made using funds from the loan program.  Grants may be awarded only when the Legislature specifically appropriates funds for that particular purpose.  The interest rate on those loans may vary from time to time and from loan to loan, and will be at or below market interest rates as determined by the board.  The board shall act as quickly as is practicable and prudent in deciding on any loan request that it receives.  Loans from the revolving fund or emergency fund may be made to counties, incorporated municipalities, districts or other water organizations that have been granted tax-exempt status under either federal or state law, as set forth in a loan agreement in amounts not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of eligible project costs as established by the board.  The board may require county, municipal, district or other water organization participation or funding from other sources, or otherwise limit the percentage of costs covered by loans from the revolving fund or the emergency fund.  The board may establish a maximum amount for any loan from the revolving fund or emergency fund in order to provide for broad and equitable participation in the programs. (d) A county that receives a loan from the revolving fund or the emergency fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement to which it may be entitled under Section 27-33-77, as may be required to meet the repayment schedule contained in the loan agreement.  An incorporated municipality that receives a loan from the revolving fund or the emergency fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the sales tax revenue distribution to which it may be entitled under Section 27-65-75, as may be required to meet the repayment schedule contained in the loan agreement.  All recipients of such loans shall establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan.  Before any county or incorporated municipality shall receive any loan, it shall have executed with the Department of Revenue and the board a loan agreement evidencing that loan. The loan agreement shall not be construed to prohibit any recipient from prepaying any part or all of the funds received.  The repayment schedule in each loan agreement shall provide for (i) monthly payments, (ii) semiannual payments, or (iii) other periodic payments, the annual total of which shall not exceed the annual total for any other year of the loan by more than fifteen percent (15%).  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the loan agreement shall provide for the repayment of all funds received from the revolving fund within not more than fifteen (15) years or a term as otherwise allowed by the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, and all funds received from the emergency fund within not more than five (5) years from the date of project completion, and any repayment shall commence not later than one (1) year after project completion.  The Department of Revenue shall withhold semiannually from counties and monthly from incorporated municipalities from the amount to be remitted to the county or municipality, a sum equal to the next repayment as provided in the loan agreement. (e) Any county, incorporated municipality, district or other water organization desiring to construct a project approved by the board which receives a loan from the state for that purpose but which is not eligible to pledge for repayment under the provisions of paragraph (d) of this subsection shall repay that loan by making payments each month to the State Treasurer through the Department of Finance and Administration for and on behalf of the board according to Section 7-7-15, to be credited to either the revolving fund or the emergency fund, whichever is appropriate, in lieu of pledging homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement or sales tax revenue distribution. Loan repayments shall be according to a repayment schedule contained in each loan agreement as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection. (f) Any district created pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 that receives a loan from the revolving fund or the emergency fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the revenues received by that district pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, as may be required to meet the repayment schedule contained in the loan agreement. (g) The State Auditor, upon request of the board, shall audit the receipts and expenditures of a county, an incorporated municipality, district or other water organization whose loan repayments appear to be in arrears, and if the Auditor finds that the county, incorporated municipality, district or other water organization is in arrears in those repayments, the Auditor shall immediately notify the chairman of the board who may take any action as may be necessary to enforce the terms of the loan agreement, including liquidation and enforcement of the security given for repayment of the loan, and the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration who shall withhold all future payments to the county of homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursements under Section 27-33-77 and all sums allocated to the county or the incorporated municipality under Section 27-65-75 until such time as the county or the incorporated municipality is again current in its loan repayments as certified by the board. (h) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all monies deposited in the revolving fund or the emergency fund, including loan repayments and interest earned on those repayments, shall be used only for providing loans or other financial assistance to water systems as the board deems appropriate.  In addition, any amounts in the revolving fund or the emergency fund may be used to defray the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund or the emergency fund and conducting activities under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, subject to any limitations established in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended and subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature.  The department is authorized, upon approval by the board, to use amounts available to it from the revolving fund or the emergency fund to contract for those facilities and staff needed to administer and provide routine management for the funds and loan program.  However, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all or any portion of repayments of principal and interest derived from the fund uses described in this section may be designated or pledged for repayment of a loan as provided for in Section 31-25-28 in connection with a loan from the Mississippi Development Bank. (3) In administering this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, the board created in subsection (1) of this section shall have the following powers and duties: (a) To supervise the use of all funds made available under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, for local governments and rural water systems  improvements; (b) To promulgate rules and regulations, to make variances and exceptions thereto, and to establish procedures in accordance with this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, for the implementation of the local governments and rural water systems improvements revolving loan program; (c) To require, at the board's discretion, any loan or grant recipient to impose a per connection fee or surcharge or amended water rate schedule or tariff on each customer or any class of customers, benefiting from an improvement financed by a loan or grant made under this section, for repayment of any loan funds provided under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995.  The board may require any loan or grant recipient to undergo a water system viability analysis and may require a loan or grant recipient to implement any result of the viability analysis.  If the loan recipient fails to implement any result of a viability analysis as required by the board, the board may impose a monetary penalty or increase the interest rate on the loan, or both.  If the grant recipient fails to implement any result of a viability analysis as required by the board, the board may impose a monetary penalty on the grant; (d) To review and certify all projects for which funds are authorized to be made available under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, for local governments and rural water systems improvements; (e) To requisition monies in the Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Improvements Revolving Loan Fund and the Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Emergency Loan Fund and distribute those monies on a project-by-project basis in accordance with this section; (f) To ensure that the funds made available under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, to a county, an incorporated municipality, a district or a water organization that has been granted tax-exempt status under either federal or state law provide for a distribution of projects and funds among the entities under a priority system established by the board; (g) To maintain in accordance with generally accepted government accounting standards an accurate record of all monies in the revolving fund and the emergency fund made available to counties, incorporated municipalities, districts or other water organizations under this section and Sections 6 through 20 of Chapter 521, Laws of 1995, and the costs for each project; (h) To establish policies, procedures and requirements concerning viability and financial capability to repay loans that may be used in approving loans available under this section, including a requirement that all loan recipients have a rate structure which will be sufficient to cover the costs of operation, maintenance, major equipment replacement and repayment of any loans made under this section; and (i) To file annually with the Legislature a report detailing how monies in the Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Improvements Revolving Loan Fund and the Local Governments and Rural Water Systems Emergency Loan Fund were spent during the preceding fiscal year in each county, incorporated municipality, district or other water organization, the number of projects approved and constructed, and the cost of each project. For efficient and effective administration of the loan program, revolving fund and emergency fund, the board may authorize the department or the State Health Officer to carry out any or all of the powers and duties enumerated above. (4) The board may, on a case-by-case basis and to the extent allowed by federal law, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this section to the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to incorporated municipalities, districts or other water organizations located in such counties; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months. SECTION 44.  Section 41-3-16.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-3-16.1. (1)  (a)  The State Department of Health (department) shall establish a grant program to be known as the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program (program) to assist rural water associations and entities in the construction of eligible drinking water infrastructure projects as provided in the Final Rule for the Coronavirus State and Local Fiscal Recovery Funds as established by the federal American Rescue Plan Act (ARPA). (b) Rural water associations and any entity that received funding under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program or the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure (MCWI) Grant Program before April 14, 2023, shall be ineligible for additional grants under this section. (2) The program shall be funded from appropriations by the Legislature to the department from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund, and the department shall expend all such funds for the purposes provided in subsection (1) of this section. (3) The department shall obligate the funds by the deadline set by the rules and guidelines of the United States Department of the Treasury and will adhere to the Treasury's rules and guidelines for reporting and monitoring projects funded through ARPA. (4) (a)  The department shall develop a system for use in ranking the grant applications received.  The ranking system shall include the following factors, at a minimum:  (a) the environmental impact of the proposed project; (b) the proposed project's ability to address noncompliance with state/federal requirements; (c) the extent to which the project promotes economic development; (d) the number of people served by the project (both new and existing users); (e) impacts of the proposed project on disadvantaged/overburdened communities; (f) the grant applicant's prior efforts to secure funding to address the proposed project's objectives; (g) the grant applicant's proposed contribution of other funds or in-kind cost-sharing to the proposed project; (h) the grant applicant's long-term plans for the financial and physical operation and maintenance of the project; and (i) the grant applicant's capacity to initiate construction in a timely manner and complete the proposed project by the deadline specified by rules and guidelines of the United States Department of the Treasury for ARPA funds. (b) For the second round of grant awards, the department shall apply a greater weight to grant applications that promote consolidation of separate systems. In order to receive the additional weight, the systems that will consolidate shall be in a proximity of each other as determined by the department. (c) In addition to the points awarded under paragraph (b) of this subsection, an additional ten (10) points shall be added to any application with at least one (1) system that has consolidated after January 1, 2018, and before application to this program and is otherwise eligible under this section. (5) An application for a grant under this section shall be submitted at such time, be in such form, and contain such information as the department prescribes. (6) (a)  Upon the approval of an application for a grant under this section, the department shall enter into a project grant agreement with each grantee to establish the terms of the grant for the project, including the amount of the grant. (b) (i)  For the first award of grants, the maximum amount of funds that may be provided to any rural water association or entity from all grants under the program is Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00). (ii) For the second round of grant awards, the maximum amount of funds that may be provided to any eligible association or entity from all grants under the program is Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). (c) Associations or entities that received funding under the first round of grant awards for this program or received funding in the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022 are ineligible to receive funding under the second round. (7) With any funds appropriated to the department for the program after April 1, 2024, the department shall distribute the funds to projects from the second round of grant awards in the order in which the applications were ranked for grants as long as the department determines that the project can obligate the funds by October 1, 2024, and expend the funds by December 31, 2026.  Where the department determines that a project cannot obligate or expend the funds by the required dates, the department shall not fund the project, and it shall continue from the second round of grant awards in the order in which the applications were ranked for grants. (8) The department shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program.  Of the funds appropriated to the department for the program, not more than five percent (5%) may be used by the department to cover the department's costs of administering the program. (9) In carrying out its responsibilities under the program, for any contract under the purview of the Public Procurement Review Board (PPRB), the department shall be exempt from any requirement that the PPRB approve any personal or professional services contracts or pre-approve any solicitation of such contracts.  This subsection shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. (10) The department shall submit an annual report regarding the program no later than December 31 of each year to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, and the Chairmen of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees. (11) For the purposes of this section, "entity" means: (a) Any entity operating as a rural water association, regardless of whether such entities were user created, were initially organized not for profit, or have been granted tax-exempt status under state or federal law. (b) Any nonprofit water or sewer provider not owned by the municipality or county and are not a Rural Water Association. (c) Any entity eligible under this program shall be currently operating as a not-for-profit entity. (d) "Entity" under this subsection does not include any state agency.  No state agency shall be eligible under this program. SECTION 45.  Section 41-26-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-26-23. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the "Drinking Water Quality Analysis Fund."  The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund.  Interest earned on the principal in the fund shall be credited by the Treasurer to the fund.  The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including fees, proceeds and grants.  The department shall expend or utilize monies in the fund to pay all reasonable direct and indirect costs of water quality analysis and related activities as required by the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended.  Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the fund for use in the succeeding fiscal year.  Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if the annual fees collected exceed the cost of administering the water quality analysis program in that fiscal year, the excess shall be applied to the cost of administering the program in the succeeding fiscal year.  In the succeeding fiscal year, the total to be collected from fees shall be reduced by the excess retained in the fund and the assessment rates shall be adjusted proportionately. (2) The department annually shall assess and collect fees for water quality analysis and related activities as required by the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, which shall not exceed Three Dollars and Seventy-five Cents ($3.75) per connection or Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per system, whichever is less.  Except as otherwise provided by law, the fee may be increased no more than one (1) time during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, and any such increase shall be based on the most recent increase in the Producer Price Index.  The department annually shall adopt by rule, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law and following a public hearing, a fee schedule to cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs of water quality analysis and related activities as required by the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended.  In adopting a fee schedule, the department shall consider the recommendations of the advisory committee created in this section, if those recommendations are made in a timely manner as provided. (3) An advisory committee is created to study the program needs and costs for the implementation of the water quality analysis program and to conduct an annual review of the needs and costs of administering that program.  The annual review shall include an independent recommendation on an equitable fee schedule for the succeeding fiscal year.  Each annual review report shall be due to the department by May 1.  The advisory committee shall consist of one (1) member appointed by the Mississippi Rural Water Association, one (1) member appointed by the Mississippi Municipal Association, one (1) member appointed by the Mississippi Association of Supervisors and one (1) member appointed by the Mississippi Water and Pollution Control Operators Association, Inc. (4) All suppliers of water for which water quality analysis and related activities as required by the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, are performed by the State Department of Health shall pay the water quality analysis fee within forty-five (45) days following receipt of an invoice from the department.  In the discretion of the department, any supplier of water required to pay the fee shall be liable for a penalty equal to a maximum of two (2) times the amount of fees due and payable plus an amount necessary to reimburse the costs of delinquent fee collection for failure to pay the fee within ninety (90) days following the receipt of the invoice.  Any person making sales to customers of water for residential, noncommercial or nonagricultural use and who recovers the fee required by this section or any portion thereof from any customer shall indicate on each statement rendered to customers that these fees are for water quality analyses required by the federal government under the Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended. (5) There is created within the Drinking Water Quality Analysis Fund an equipment capital expenditure account, hereinafter referred to as the "account." The department may transfer any excess fees, not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the total fees assessed under this section, to the account.  The balance in the account shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00).  Funds in the account shall be used by the department, as appropriated by the Legislature, to defray the costs of purchasing new equipment or repairing existing equipment for the analysis of drinking water. Require timely reporting to towns, cities and water systems of any report by telephone, email and portal system.  Water operators should be made aware immediately or within twenty-four (24) hours. SECTION 46.  Section 41-26-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-26-101. (1)  Each member elected or reelected after June 30, 1998, to serve on a governing board of any community public water system, except systems operated by municipalities with a population greater than ten thousand (10,000), shall attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of management training within two (2) years following the election of that board member.  Any member failing to complete the management training within two (2) years after his election shall be subject to removal from the board by the remaining members.  If a board member has undergone training and is reelected to the board, that board member shall not be required to attend training as provided by this subsection. (2) The management training shall be organized by the State Department of Health, in cooperation with the Mississippi Rural Water Association and other organizations.  The management training shall include information on water system management and financing, rate setting and structures, operations and maintenance, applicable laws and regulations, ethics, the duties and responsibilities of a board member and other information deemed necessary by the department after consultation with the association and other organizations.  The department shall develop and provide all training materials.  The association and other training organizations may charge a fee in the amount of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) per member plus the cost of the manual and materials.  These costs shall be reimbursed to the board member as an expense of the community public water system. (3) Two (2) officers of each board shall also obtain an additional four (4) hours of updated and advanced training within a four-year period.  The term "officers" shall include the legally responsible official of the community public water system and the mayor, mayor pro tem, the president, and the vice president of the board.  If one (1) of the officers is not able to attend the training, then he may appoint someone from among the existing board to attend in his place; however, the board member attending this training must have first completed the eight (8) hours of management training.  This training will be held at a time and place that will accommodate those members who have other responsibilities.  The training shall consist of, but not be limited to, updated regulatory rules and regulations, an in depth look at the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act as well as any updated information that would aid them in making decisions for their utility system.  The association and other training organizations may charge a fee in the amount of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per member plus the cost of the material needed for the training. These costs shall also be reimbursed to the board member as an expense of the community water system. (4) To avoid board members having to interfere with their jobs or employment, management training sessions may be divided into segments and, to the greatest extent possible, shall be scheduled for evening sessions.  The department shall conduct management training on a regional basis and shall use community college or other public facilities for the convenience of board members. (5) The department may make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances to the requirements of this section for good cause shown. SECTION 47.  Section 77-13-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-13-29. (1)  There is created an Underground Facilities Damage Prevention Board for the purpose of enforcing this chapter. (2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board and its enforcement activities not be funded by appropriations from the state budget. (3) The Pipeline Safety Division will provide administrative, investigative and legal support for the board as deemed necessary and approved by the board.  The Pipeline Safety Division shall charge to the board the expenses associated with the administration, investigative and legal duties requested by the board. (4) The board shall be composed of sixteen (16) members and all board appointments shall be made on or before July 31, 2016, as follows: (a) The President of Mississippi 811, Inc., or his designee; (b) One (1) representative of the telecommunications industry, appointed by the Governor; (c) One (1) representative of the excavation, utility and/or site construction industry, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (d) One (1) representative of the electric power industry investor-owned utilities, appointed by the Governor; (e) One (1) representative of the Electric Power Associations of Mississippi, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (f) The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, or his designee; (g) One (1) representative of the cable industry appointed by the Governor; (h) One (1) representative of the Pipeline Safety Division, serving as an ex officio, nonvoting member; (i) One (1) representative of the natural gas or liquid transmission industry, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (j) One (1) representative of the natural gas or liquid distribution industry, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (k) The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Professional Surveyors, Inc., or his designee; (l) The Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or his designee; (m) The Executive Director of the Mississippi Municipal League, or his designee; (n) The Executive Director of the Mississippi Homebuilders Association, or his designee; (o) The Chief Executive Officer of the Mississippi Rural Water Association, or his designee; and (p) The Executive Director of the American Council of Engineering Companies of Mississippi, or his designee. (5) The initial term of the appointed members provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (4) shall end December 31, 2017; the initial term of the appointed members provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (4) shall end December 31, 2019; and the initial term of the representatives provided in paragraphs (g), (i) and (j) of subsection (4) shall end December 31, 2021.  After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members shall serve a term of five (5) years. (6) The Governor shall appoint the initial chairman of the board, and the initial board shall elect other officers as the board deems necessary.  The board shall meet and elect a chairman and other officers every two (2) years thereafter. The staff of Mississippi 811, Inc., shall serve as staff support for the board. (7) The board shall meet no less than three (3) times each year, with a date and time to be set by its chairman upon at least five (5) business days' notice provided by United States mail, electronic mail or personal delivery to every board member. (8) Eight (8) members of the board shall constitute a quorum and a majority vote of those present and voting at any meeting shall be necessary to transact business. (9) The members of the board shall be immune, individually and jointly, from civil liability for any act or omission done or made in the performance of their duties while serving as members of the board, but only in the absence of willful misconduct. (10) The members of the board shall serve without compensation. (11) The board shall elect from its membership an executive committee, which shall have the exclusive authority for levying civil penalties and taking action as described in Section 77-13-27.  The executive committee shall be composed of the following five (5) members of the board: (a) One (1) member appointed from subsection (4)(c) of this section; (b) One (1) member from a state agency or local government; (c) One (1) member appointed from subsection (4)(b), (d), (e), (g) or (o) of this section; (d) One (1) member appointed from subsection (4)(i) or (j) of this section; and (e) One (1) member chosen at large from the board from any paragraph of subsection (4) of this section. (12) A member serving on the executive committee shall be limited to two (2) consecutive one-year terms.  No executive committee member may participate in a vote on any matter in which his employer is the alleged violator or has incurred damage to its facilities as a result of the alleged violation. (13) The board and the executive committee may hold meetings and vote by telephone, television, or other electronic means. SECTION 48.  Section 41-3-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-3-15. (1)  (a)  There shall be a State Department of Health. (b) The State Board of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i) To formulate the policy of the State Department of Health regarding public health matters within the jurisdiction of the department; (ii) To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction, and as the board may deem necessary; (iii) To apply for, receive, accept and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, trusts, devises, bequests, grants, endowments or funds from any other source or transfers of property of any kind; (iv) To enter into, and to authorize the executive officer to execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if it finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature; (v) To appoint, upon recommendation of the Executive Officer of the State Department of Health, a Director of Internal Audit who shall be either a Certified Public Accountant or Certified Internal Auditor, and whose employment shall be continued at the discretion of the board, and who shall report directly to the board, or its designee; and (vi) To discharge such other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. (c) The Executive Officer of the State Department of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i) To administer the policies of the State Board of Health within the authority granted by the board; (ii) To supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the department, except that the department's internal auditor shall be subject to the sole supervision and direction of the board; (iii) To organize the administrative units of the department in accordance with the plan adopted by the board and, with board approval, alter the organizational plan and reassign responsibilities as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the policies of the board; (iv) To coordinate the activities of the various offices of the department; (v) To employ, subject to regulations of the State Personnel Board, qualified professional personnel in the subject matter or fields of each office, and such other technical and clerical staff as may be required for the operation of the department.  The executive officer shall be the appointing authority for the department, and shall have the power to delegate the authority to appoint or dismiss employees to appropriate subordinates, subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board; (vi) To recommend to the board such studies and investigations as he or she may deem appropriate, and to carry out the approved recommendations in conjunction with the various offices; (vii) To prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the board may have; (viii) To prepare and deliver to the Chairmen of the Public Health and Welfare/Human Services Committees of the Senate and House on or before January 1 of each year, a plan for monitoring infant mortality in Mississippi and a full report of the work of the department on reducing Mississippi's infant mortality and morbidity rates and improving the status of maternal and infant health; and (ix) To enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if he or she finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature.  Each contract or agreement entered into by the executive officer shall be submitted to the board before its next meeting. (2) The State Board of Health shall have the authority to establish an Office of Rural Health within the department.  The duties and responsibilities of this office shall include the following: (a) To collect and evaluate data on rural health conditions and needs; (b) To engage in policy analysis, policy development and economic impact studies with regard to rural health issues; (c) To develop and implement plans and provide technical assistance to enable community health systems to respond to various changes in their circumstances; (d) To plan and assist in professional recruitment and retention of medical professionals and assistants; and (e) To establish information clearinghouses to improve access to and sharing of rural health care information. (3) The State Board of Health shall have general supervision of the health interests of the people of the state and to exercise the rights, powers and duties of those acts which it is authorized by law to enforce. (4) The State Board of Health shall have authority: (a) To make investigations and inquiries with respect to the causes of disease and death, and to investigate the effect of environment, including conditions of employment and other conditions that may affect health, and to make such other investigations as it may deem necessary for the preservation and improvement of health. (b) To make such sanitary investigations as it may, from time to time, deem necessary for the protection and improvement of health and to investigate nuisance questions that affect the security of life and health within the state. (c) To direct and control sanitary and quarantine measures for dealing with all diseases within the state possible to suppress same and prevent their spread. (d) To obtain, collect and preserve such information relative to mortality, morbidity, disease and health as may be useful in the discharge of its duties or may contribute to the prevention of disease or the promotion of health in this state. (e) To charge and collect reasonable fees for health services, including immunizations, inspections and related activities, and the board shall charge fees for those services; however, if it is determined that a person receiving services is unable to pay the total fee, the board shall collect any amount that the person is able to pay.  Any increase in the fees charged by the board under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. (f) (i)  To establish standards for, issue permits and exercise control over, any cafes, restaurants, food or drink stands, sandwich manufacturing establishments, and all other establishments, other than churches, church-related and private schools, and other nonprofit or charitable organizations, where food or drink is regularly prepared, handled and served for pay; and (ii) To require that a permit be obtained from the Department of Health before those persons begin operation.  If any such person fails to obtain the permit required in this subparagraph (ii), the State Board of Health, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.  However, the department is not authorized to impose a monetary penalty against any person whose gross annual prepared food sales are less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). Money collected by the board under this subparagraph (ii) shall be deposited to the credit of the State General Fund of the State Treasury. (g) To promulgate rules and regulations and exercise control over the production and sale of milk pursuant to the provisions of Sections 75-31-41 through 75-31-49. (h) On presentation of proper authority, to enter into and inspect any public place or building where the State Health Officer or his representative deems it necessary and proper to enter for the discovery and suppression of disease and for the enforcement of any health or sanitary laws and regulations in the state. (i) To conduct investigations, inquiries and hearings, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and records at any hearing when authorized and required by statute to be conducted by the State Health Officer or the State Board of Health. (j) To promulgate rules and regulations, and to collect data and information, on (i) the delivery of services through the practice of telemedicine; and (ii) the use of electronic records for the delivery of telemedicine services. (k) To enforce and regulate domestic and imported fish as authorized under Section 69-7-601 et seq. (5) (a)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority, in its discretion, to establish programs to promote the public health, to be administered by the State Department of Health. Specifically, those programs may include, but shall not be limited to, programs in the following areas: (i) Maternal and child health; (ii) Family planning; (iii) Pediatric services; (iv) Services to crippled and disabled children; (v) Control of communicable and noncommunicable disease; (vi) Chronic disease; (vii) Accidental deaths and injuries; (viii) Child care licensure; (ix) Radiological health; (x) Dental health; (xi) Milk sanitation; (xii) Occupational safety and health; (xiii) Food, vector control and general sanitation; (xiv) Protection of drinking water; (xv) Sanitation in food handling establishments open to the public; (xvi) Registration of births and deaths and other vital events; (xvii) Such public health programs and services as may be assigned to the State Board of Health by the Legislature or by executive order; and (xviii) Regulation of domestic and imported fish for human consumption. (b) [Deleted] (c) The State Department of Health may undertake such technical programs and activities as may be required for the support and operation of those programs, including maintaining physical, chemical, bacteriological and radiological laboratories, and may make such diagnostic tests for diseases and tests for the evaluation of health hazards as may be deemed necessary for the protection of the people of the state. (6) (a)  The State Board of Health shall administer the local governments and rural water systems improvements loan program in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-16. (b) The State Board of Health shall have authority: (i) To enter into capitalization grant agreements with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or any successor agency thereto; (ii) To accept capitalization grant awards made under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended; (iii) To provide annual reports and audits to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as may be required by federal capitalization grant agreements; and (iv) To establish and collect fees to defray the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund or emergency fund if the State Board of Health determines that those costs will exceed the limitations established in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended.  The administration fees may be included in loan amounts to loan recipients for the purpose of facilitating payment to the board; however, those fees may not exceed five percent (5%) of the loan amount. (7) [Deleted] (8) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to issue a license to an existing home health agency for the transfer of a county from that agency to another existing home health agency, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such transfer not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the home health agency, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (9) [Deleted] (10) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to extend and renew any certificate of need that has expired, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such action not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the certificate of need, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (11) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to revoke, immediately, the license and require closure of any institution for the aged or infirm, including any other remedy less than closure to protect the health and safety of the residents of said institution or the health and safety of the general public. (12) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to require the temporary detainment of individuals for disease control purposes based upon violation of any order of the State Health Officer, as provided in Section 41-23-5.  For the purpose of enforcing such orders of the State Health Officer, persons employed by the department as investigators shall have general arrest powers.  All law enforcement officers are authorized and directed to assist in the enforcement of such orders of the State Health Officer. (13) Additionally, the State Board of Health and the State Health Officer each are authorized and directed to study the status of health care, in its broadest sense, throughout the state.  The study should include challenges such as access to care; the cost of care; indigent care; providing health care to the incarcerated; the availability of health care workers, paraprofessionals, and professionals; the effects of unhealthy lifestyle choices; the consequences of health care facilities locating in affluent and urban areas to the detriment of less affluent areas, small towns, and rural areas; and negative trends which may cause ill effects if they continue.  The study shall also include opportunities to improve health care, such as greater coordination among state agencies, local governments, and other entities which provide various types of health care; methods of increasing the health care workforce; and methods to increase the location of health care facilities in distressed areas, rural areas, and small towns.  All state agencies, the Legislative Budget Office and the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) are directed to assist the department in developing this study. This provision does not by itself grant any additional power to the State Board of Health or the State Health Officer to require any entity to operate differently.  It does, however, empower and direct them to obtain information and make recommendations, and it does require all entities to cooperate with the board and health officer as they seek information. SECTION 49.  Section 45-23-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-23-15. (1)  This chapter shall not apply to the following boilers and pressure vessels: (a) Boilers and pressure vessels located on United States Government property and/or under federal government control and pipelines, including compressors and related facilities, which are subject to inspection by any agency of the federal government or other agency of the State of Mississippi; (b) Pressure vessels used for transportation and storage of compressed gases when constructed in compliance with specifications of the U.S. Department of Transportation and when charged with gas, marked, maintained and when periodically requalified for use, as required by appropriate regulations of the U.S. Department of Transportation; (c) Air tanks located on vehicles operating under the rules of other state authorities and used for carrying passengers or freight; (d) Air tanks installed on the right-of-way of railroads and used directly in the operation of trains; (e) Pressure vessels that do not exceed (i) five (5) cubic feet in volume and two hundred fifty (250) psig pressure, or (ii) one and one-half (1-1/2) cubic feet in volume and six hundred (600) psig pressure, or (iii) an inside diameter of six (6) inches or less with no limitation on pressure; (f) Pressure vessels operating at a working pressure not exceeding fifteen (15) psig; (g) Vessels with a nominal water-containing capacity of one hundred twenty (120) gallons or less for containing water under pressure, including those containing also air, the compression of which serves only as a cushion; (h) Boiler and pressure vessels constructed and operated under licenses and permits granted by the U.S. Atomic Energy Commission; (i) Boilers and pressure vessels used in connection with the production, treating, processing, storage or transportation of oil or natural gas, when located in areas which are remote from places of human habitation or public congregation. (2) The following boilers and pressure vessels shall be exempt from the requirements of Sections 45-23-31 through 45-23-55: (a) Heating boilers which are located in private residences or in apartment houses of less than six (6) family units; (b) Pressure vessels containing only water under pressure for domestic supply purposes, including those containing also air, the compression of which serves only as a cushion or airlift pumping system when located in private residences or in apartment houses of less than six (6) family units, or those serving rural water systems; (c) Pressure vessels which are covered under the Liquefied Compressed Gas Equipment Inspection Law of Mississippi, being Sections 75-57-1 through 75-57-63, Mississippi Code of 1972; (d) Air receiving tanks and attached tanks used in connection with automobile filling stations that do not exceed fifteen (15) cubic feet in volume and two hundred fifty (250) psig pressure and that are used primarily to increase air pressure in automobile tires. SECTION 50.  Section 65-1-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-1-8. (1)  The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall have the following general powers, duties and responsibilities: (a) To coordinate and develop a comprehensive, balanced transportation policy for the State of Mississippi; (b) To promote the coordinated and efficient use of all available and future modes of transportation; (c) To make recommendations to the Legislature regarding alterations or modifications in any existing transportation policies; (d) To study means of encouraging travel and transportation of goods by the combination of motor vehicle and other modes of transportation; (e) To take such actions as are necessary and proper to discharge its duties pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 496, Laws of 1992, and any other provision of law; (f) To receive and provide for the expenditure of any funds made available to it by the Legislature, the federal government or any other source. (2) In addition to the general powers, duties and responsibilities listed in subsection (1) of this section, the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall have the following specific powers: (a) To make rules and regulations whereby the Transportation Department shall change or relocate any and all highways herein or hereafter fixed as constituting a part of the state highway system, as may be deemed necessary or economical in the construction or maintenance thereof; to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, land or other property whatsoever that may be necessary for a state highway system as herein provided, with full consideration to be given to the stimulation of local public and private investment when acquiring such property in the vicinity of Mississippi towns, cities and population centers; (b) To enforce by mandamus, or other proper legal remedies, all legal rights or rights of action of the Mississippi Transportation Commission with other public bodies, corporations or persons; (c) To make and publish rules, regulations and ordinances for the control of and the policing of the traffic on the state highways, and to prevent their abuse by any or all persons, natural or artificial, by trucks, tractors, trailers or any other heavy or destructive vehicles or machines, or by any other means whatsoever, by establishing weights of loads or of vehicles, types of tires, width of tire surfaces, length and width of vehicles, with reasonable variations to meet approximate weather conditions, and all other proper police and protective regulations, and to provide ample means for the enforcement of same.  The violation of any of the rules, regulations or ordinances so prescribed by the commission shall constitute a misdemeanor.  No rule, regulation or ordinance shall be made that conflicts with any statute now in force or which may hereafter be enacted, or with any ordinance of municipalities.  A monthly publication giving general information to the boards of supervisors, employees and the public may be issued under such rules and regulations as the commission may determine; (d) To give suitable numbers to highways and to change the number of any highway that shall become a part of the state highway system.  However, nothing herein shall authorize the number of any highway to be changed so as to conflict with any designation thereof as a U.S. numbered highway.  Where, by a specific act of the Legislature, the commission has been directed to give a certain number to a highway, the commission shall not have the authority to change such number; (e) (i)  To make proper and reasonable rules, regulations, and ordinances for the placing, erection, removal or relocation of telephone, telegraph or other poles, signboards, fences, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other pipelines, and other obstructions that may, in the opinion of the commission, contribute to the hazards upon any of the state highways, or in any way interfere with the ordinary travel upon such highways, or the construction, reconstruction or maintenance thereof, and to make reasonable rules and regulations for the proper control thereof.  Any violation of such rules or regulations or noncompliance with such ordinances shall constitute a misdemeanor; (ii) Except as otherwise provided for in this paragraph, whenever the order of the commission shall require the removal of, or other changes in the location of, telephone, telegraph or other poles, signboards, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other pipelines, or other similar obstructions on the right-of-way or such other places where removal is required by law, the owners thereof shall at their own expense move or change the same to conform to the order of the commission.  Any violation of such rules or regulations or noncompliance with such orders shall constitute a misdemeanor; (iii) Rural water districts, rural water systems, nonprofit water associations and municipal public water systems in municipalities with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less, according to the latest federal decennial census, shall not be required to bear the cost and expense of removal and relocation of water and sewer lines and facilities constructed or in place in the rights-of-way of state highways.  The cost and expense of such removal and relocation, including any unpaid prior to July 1, 2002, shall be paid by the Department of Transportation; (iv) Municipal public sewer systems and municipal gas systems owned by municipalities with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less, according to the latest federal decennial census, shall not be required to bear the cost and expense of removal and relocation of lines and facilities constructed or in place in the rights-of-way of state highways.  The cost and expense of such removal and relocation, including any unpaid prior to July 1, 2003, shall be paid by the Department of Transportation; (f) To regulate and abandon grade crossings on any road fixed as a part of the state highway system, and whenever the commission, in order to avoid a grade crossing with the railroad, locates or constructs said road on one side of the railroad, the commission shall have the power to abandon and close such grade crossing, and whenever an underpass or overhead bridge is substituted for a grade crossing, the commission shall have power to abandon such grade crossing and any other crossing adjacent thereto.  Included in the powers herein granted shall be the power to require the railroad at grade crossings, where any road of the state highway system crosses the same, to place signal posts with lights or other warning devices at such crossings at the expense of the railroad, and to regulate and abandon underpasses or overhead bridges and, where abandoned because of the construction of a new underpass or overhead bridge, to close such old underpass or overhead bridge, or, in its discretion, to return the same to the jurisdiction of the county board of supervisors; (g) To make proper and reasonable rules and regulations to control the cutting or opening of the road surfaces for subsurface installations; (h) To make proper and reasonable rules and regulations for the removal from the public rights-of-way of any form of obstruction, to cooperate in improving their appearance, and to prescribe minimum clearance heights for seed conveyors, pipes, passageways or other structure of private or other ownership above the highways; (i) To establish, and have the Transportation Department maintain and operate, and to cooperate with the state educational institutions in establishing, enlarging, maintaining and operating a laboratory or laboratories for testing materials and for other proper highway purposes; (j) To provide, under the direction and with the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, suitable offices, shops and barns in the City of Jackson; (k) To establish and have enforced set-back regulations; (l) To cooperate with proper state authorities in producing limerock for highway purposes and to purchase same at cost; (m) To provide for the purchase of necessary equipment and vehicles and to provide for the repair and housing of same, to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, land or lands and buildings in fee simple, and to authorize the Transportation Department to construct, lease or otherwise provide necessary and proper permanent district offices for the construction and maintenance divisions of the department, and for the repair and housing of the equipment and vehicles of the department; however, in each Supreme Court district only two (2) permanent district offices shall be set up, but a permanent status shall not be given to any such offices until so provided by act of the Legislature and in the meantime, all shops of the department shall be retained at their present location.  As many local or subdistrict offices, shops or barns may be provided as is essential and proper to economical maintenance of the state highway system; (n) To cooperate with the Department of Archives and History in having placed and maintained suitable historical markers, including those which have been approved and purchased by the State Historical Commission, along state highways, and to have constructed and maintained roadside driveways for convenience and safety in viewing them when necessary; (o) To cooperate, in its discretion, with the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in planning and constructing roadside parks upon the right-of-way of state highways, whether constructed, under construction, or planned; said parks to utilize where practical barrow pits used in construction of state highways for use as fishing ponds.  Said parks shall be named for abundant flora and fauna existing in the area or for the first flora or fauna found on the site; (p) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, to make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such reasonable and necessary appropriate terms, provisions and conditions as in its absolute discretion it may deem necessary, proper or advisable, for the purpose of obtaining or securing financial assistance, grants or loans from the United States of America or any department or agency thereof, including contracts with several counties of the state pertaining to the expenditure of such funds; (q) To cooperate with the Federal Highway Administration in the matter of location, construction and maintenance of the Great River Road, to expend such funds paid to the commission by the Federal Highway Administration or other federal agency, and to authorize the Transportation Department to erect suitable signs marking this highway, the cost of such signs to be paid from state highway funds other than earmarked construction funds; (r) To cooperate, in its discretion, with the Mississippi Forestry Commission and the School of Forestry, Mississippi State University, in a forestry management program, including planting, thinning, cutting and selling, upon the right-of-way of any highway, constructed, acquired or maintained by the Transportation Department, and to sell and dispose of any and all growing timber standing, lying or being on any right-of-way acquired by the commission for highway purposes in the future; such sale or sales to be made in accordance with the sale of personal property which has become unnecessary for public use as provided for in Section 65-1-123, Mississippi Code of 1972; (s) To expend funds in cooperation with the Division of Plant Industry, Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the United States government or any department or agency thereof, or with any department or agency of this state, to control, suppress or eradicate serious insect pests, rodents, plant parasites and plant diseases on the state highway rights-of-way; (t) To provide for the placement, erection and maintenance of motorist services business signs and supports within state highway rights-of-way in accordance with current state and federal laws and regulations governing the placement of traffic control devices on state highways, and to establish and collect reasonable fees from the businesses having information on such signs; (u) To request and to accept the use of persons convicted of an offense, whether a felony or a misdemeanor, for work on any road construction, repair or other project of the Transportation Department.  The commission is also authorized to request and to accept the use of persons who have not been convicted of an offense but who are required to fulfill certain court-imposed conditions pursuant to Section 41-29-150(d)(1) or 99-15-26, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the Pretrial Intervention Act, being Sections 99-15-101 through 99-15-127, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The commission is authorized to enter into any agreements with the Department of Corrections, the State Parole Board, any criminal court of this state, and any other proper official regarding the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing and subsistence of such persons performing work for the Transportation Department.  Such persons shall not be deemed agents, employees or involuntary servants of the Transportation Department while performing such work or while going to and from work or other specified areas; (v) To provide for the administration of the railroad revitalization program pursuant to Section 57-43-1 et seq.; (w) The Mississippi Transportation Commission is further authorized, in its discretion, to expend funds for the purchase of service pins for employees of the Mississippi Transportation Department; (x) To cooperate with the State Tax Commission by providing for weight enforcement field personnel to collect and assess taxes, fees and penalties and to perform all duties as required pursuant to Section 27-55-501 et seq., Sections 27-19-1 et seq., 27-55-1 et seq., 27-59-1 et seq. and 27-61-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, with regard to vehicles subject to the jurisdiction of the Office of Weight Enforcement.  All collections and assessments shall be transferred daily to the State Tax Commission; (y) The Mississippi Transportation Commission may delegate the authority to enter into a supplemental agreement to a contract previously approved by the commission if the supplemental agreement involves an additional expenditure not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00); (z) (i)  The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may enter into agreements with any county, municipality, county transportation commission, business, corporation, partnership, association, individual or other legal entity, for the purpose of accelerating the completion date of scheduled highway construction projects. (ii) Such an agreement may permit the cost of a highway construction project to be advanced to the commission by a county, municipality, county transportation commission, business, corporation, partnership, association, individual or other legal entity, and repaid to such entity by the commission when highway construction funds become available; provided, however, that repayment of funds advanced to the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be made no sooner than the commission's identified projected revenue schedule for funding of that particular construction project, and no other scheduled highway construction project established by statute or by the commission may be delayed by an advanced funding project authorized under this paragraph (z).  Repayments to a public or private entity that advances funds to the Mississippi Transportation Commission under this paragraph (z) may not include interest or other fees or charges, and the total amount repaid shall not exceed the total amount of funds advanced to the commission by the entity; however, the inclusion of public entities in this provision does not invalidate any existing agreements authorized under this paragraph (z) before April 19, 2022.  The commission shall retain the ability to service, refinance or restructure any indebtedness incurred through any such existing agreements. (iii) In considering whether to enter into such an agreement, the commission shall consider the availability of financial resources, the effect of such agreement on other ongoing highway construction, the urgency of the public's need for swift completion of the project and any other relevant factors. (iv) Such an agreement shall be executed only upon a finding by the commission, spread upon its minutes, that the acceleration of the scheduled project is both feasible and beneficial.  The commission shall also spread upon its minutes its findings with regard to the factors required to be considered pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z); (aa) The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may purchase employment practices liability insurance, and may purchase an excess policy to cover catastrophic losses incurred under the commission's self-insured workers' compensation program authorized under Section 71-3-5.  Such policies shall be written by the agent or agents of a company or companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi.  The deductibles shall be in an amount deemed reasonable and prudent by the commission, and the premiums thereon shall be paid from the State Highway Fund.  Purchase of insurance under this paragraph shall not serve as an actual or implied waiver of sovereign immunity or of any protection afforded the commission under the Mississippi Tort Claims Act; (bb) The Mississippi Transportation Commission is further authorized, in its discretion, to expend funds for the purchase of promotional materials for safety purposes, highway beautification purposes and recruitment purposes; (cc) To lease antenna space on communication towers which it owns; (dd) To receive funds from the Southeastern Association of Transportation Officials and from other nonstate sources and expend those funds for educational scholarships in transportation related fields of study.  The commission may adopt rules or regulations as necessary for the implementation of the program. A strict accounting shall be made of all funds deposited with the commission and all funds dispersed; (ee) To contract with any county, if the county chooses to enter such contract, to perform any maintenance on the state highways and interstate highways in that county and any rights-of-way to such highways. SECTION 51.  Section 19-31-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-31-5. As used in this chapter the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Assessable improvements" means any public improvements and community facilities that the district is empowered to provide in accordance with this chapter. (b) "Assessment bonds" means special obligations of the district that are payable solely from proceeds of the special assessments levied for an assessable project. (c) "Board" or "board of directors" means the governing board of the district or, if such board has been abolished, the board, body or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given to the board by this chapter have been given by law. (d) "Bond" includes certificate, and the provisions that are applicable to bonds are equally applicable to certificates.  The term "bond" includes any assessment bond, refunding bond, revenue bond and other such obligation in the nature of a bond as is provided for in this chapter. (e) "Public improvement district" or "district" means a special district that is created pursuant to this chapter and limited to the performance of those specialized functions authorized by this chapter, the boundaries of which are contained wholly within a single county or two (2) or more contiguous counties; the governing head of which is a body created, organized and constituted and authorized to function specifically as prescribed in this chapter for the delivery of public improvement services; and the formation powers, governing body, operation, duration accountability, requirements for disclosure and termination of which are as required by general law. (f) "Contribution agreement" means an agreement between a district and a public entity under which the public entity agrees to provide financial or credit support in the form of cash, pledge, guaranty or other enhancement, which agreement must be approved in accordance with Sections 17-13-1 through 17-13-17. (g) "Cost," when used with reference to any project, includes, but is not limited to: (i) The expenses of determining the feasibility or practicability of acquisition, construction or reconstruction. (ii) The cost of surveys, estimates, plans and specifications. (iii) The cost of improvements. (iv) Engineering, fiscal and legal expenses and charges. (v) The cost of all labor, materials, machinery and equipment. (vi) The cost of all lands, rights, servitudes and franchises acquired. (vii) Financing charges. (viii) The creation of initial reserve and debt service funds. (ix) Working capital. (x) Interest charges incurred or estimated to be incurred on money borrowed before and during construction and acquisition and for such reasonable period of time after completion of construction or acquisition as the board may determine. (xi) The cost of issuance of bonds pursuant to this chapter, including advertisements and printing. (xii) The cost of any election held pursuant to this chapter and all other expenses of issuance of bonds. (xiii) The discount, if any, on the sale or exchange of bonds. (xiv) Administrative expenses. (xv) Such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the acquisition, construction or reconstruction of any project or to the financing thereof, or to the development of any lands within the district. (h) "District manager" means the manager of the district. (i) "District roads" means highways, streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks, landscaping, storm drains, bridges and thoroughfares of all kinds and descriptions. (j) "Landowner" means the owner of land, including real property as it appears in the official records of the county, including a trustee, a private corporation or other entity, and an owner of a condominium unit. (k) "Market value" means the amount in cash, or on terms reasonably equivalent to cash, for which in all probability the property would have sold on the effective date of the appraisal, after a reasonable exposure time on the open competitive market, from a willing and reasonably knowledgeable seller to a willing and reasonably knowledgeable buyer, with neither acting under any compulsion to buy or sell, giving due consideration to all available economic uses of the property at the time of the appraisal.  Market value must be determined in accordance with Section 27-35-50 and must conform to the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisers Practice. (l) "Project" means any development, improvement, property, utility, facility, works, enterprise or service  undertaken after April 1, 2002, or established under the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Water management and control for the lands within the district and connection of some or any of such facilities with roads and bridges; (ii) Water supply, sewer and wastewater management, reclamation and reuse, or any combination thereof; (iii) Bridges or culverts that may be needed across any drain, ditch, canal, floodway, holding basin, excavation, public highway, tract, grade, fill or cut and roadways over levees and embankments; (iv) District roads equal to or exceeding the specifications of the county in which the district roads are located, including street lights and the location of underground utilities; (v) Parks and facilities for indoor and outdoor recreational, cultural and educational uses, and other tourism related infrastructure and facilities; (vi) Fire prevention and control, including fire stations, water mains and plugs, fire trucks, and other vehicles and equipment; (vii) Security, except that the district may not exercise any police power but may contract with the appropriate local governmental agencies for an increased level of such services within the district boundaries; (viii) Waste collection and disposal; (ix) Acquisition, construction, repair, renovation, demolition or removal of: 1. Buildings and site improvements (including fixtures); 2. Potable and nonpotable water supply systems; 3. Sewage and waste disposal systems; 4. Storm water drainage and other drainage systems; 5. Airport facilities; 6. Rail lines and rail spurs; 7. Port facilities; 8. Highways, streets and other roadways; 9. Fire suppression and prevention systems; 10. Utility distribution systems, including, but not limited to, water, electricity, natural gas, telephone and other information and telecommunications facilities, whether by wire, fiber or wireless means; however, electrical, natural gas, telephone and telecommunication systems may be constructed, repaired or renovated only for the purpose of completing the project and connecting to existing utility systems.  This provision may not be construed to prevent a city, county or natural gas district from supplying utility service that it is authorized to supply in the service area that it is authorized to serve; and 11. Business, industrial and technology parks and the acquisition of land and acquisition or construction of improvements to land connected with any of the preceding purposes; (x) County purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3 and 19-9-1, except Section 19-9-1(f); and (xi) Municipal purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3, 17-17-301 through 17-17-349, 21-27-23 and 21-33-301. (m) "Public entity" means any governmental agency, county or municipality, which enters into a contribution agreement with a district in accordance with this chapter. (n) "Qualified voter" means any landowner within the district who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, or the landowner's authorized representative who is at least eighteen (18) years of age.  If the landowner of a parcel consists of more than one (1) person or is a corporation, partnership, limited liability company or any association or legal entity organized to conduct business, the majority interest of the landowners of the parcel shall select one (1) person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age to serve as the "qualified voter" for the group. (o) "Revenue bonds" means obligations of the district that are payable from revenues derived from sources other than ad valorem taxes on real or personal property and that do not pledge the property, credit or general tax revenue of the district. (p) "Sewer system" means any plant, system, facility or property, and additions, extensions and improvements thereto, useful or necessary in connection with the collection, treatment or disposal of sewage. (q) "Water management and control facilities" means any lakes, canals, ditches, reservoirs, dams, levees, floodways, pumping stations or any other works, structures or facilities for the conservation, control, development, utilization and disposal of water, and any purposes incidental thereto. (r) "Water system" means any plant system, facility or property, and additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, useful or necessary in connection with the development of sources, treatment or purification and distribution of water. SECTION 52.  Section 19-31-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-31-19. The district shall have, and the board, or if necessary, the governing authorities of the municipality in which the district is contained, may exercise, any or all of the special powers relating to public improvements and community facilities authorized by this chapter.  The district or municipality shall have the power to finance, fund, establish, acquire, construct or reconstruct, enlarge or extend, equip, operate and maintain systems, facilities, projects and basic infrastructures that are within the district, or which benefit or serve the district, for the following: (a) Water management and control for the lands within the district and connection of some or any of such facilities with roads and bridges; (b) Water supply, sewer and wastewater management, reclamation and reuse, or any combination thereof; (c) Bridges or culverts that may be needed across any drain, ditch, canal, floodway, holding basin, excavation, public highway, tract, grade, fill or cut and roadways over levees and embankments; (d) District roads equal to or exceeding the specifications of the county in which such district roads are located, including street lights and the location of underground utilities; (e) Parks and facilities for indoor and outdoor recreational, cultural and educational uses, and other tourism related infrastructure and facilities; (f) Fire prevention and control, including fire stations, water mains and plugs, fire trucks, and other vehicles and equipment; (g) Security, except that the district may not exercise any police power, but may contract with the appropriate local governmental agencies for an increased level of such services within the district boundaries; (h) Waste collection and disposal; (i) Systems, as defined in Section 21-27-11(b); and (j) Projects, as defined in this chapter. SECTION 53.  Section 19-31-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-31-21. No public improvement district may purchase, sell, dedicate, donate or convey in any manner a water or wastewater utility that provides service to the public, or enter into a management contract for such facilities, until the board has held a public hearing on the purchase, sale, dedication, donation, conveyance or management contract and has made a determination that the purchase, sale or management contract is in the public interest. SECTION 54.  Section 21-27-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-203. For purposes of Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context shall otherwise require: (a) "Association" means the Mississippi Water and Pollution Control Operator's Association, Inc. (b) "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Health. (c) "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality. (d) "Community water system" means a public water system serving piped water for human consumption to fifteen (15) or more individual service connections used by year-round consumers or regularly serving twenty-five (25) or more individual consumers year-round, including, but not limited to, any collection, pretreatment, treatment, storage and/or distribution facilities or equipment used primarily as part of, or in connection with, that system, regardless of whether or not the components are under the ownership or control of the operator of the system. (e) "Commercial Class I rubbish site" means a permitted rubbish site which accepts for disposal Class I rubbish, as defined by the commission, for compensation or from more than one (1) generator. (f) "Nontransient, noncommunity water system" means a public water system that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) of the same persons over six (6) months per year. (g) "Operator" means the person who directly supervises and is personally responsible for the daily operation and maintenance of a wastewater facility, community water system, nontransient, noncommunity water system or commercial nonhazardous solid waste management landfill. (h) "Person" means the state or any agency or institution of the state, any municipality, political subdivision, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association or other entity, including any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or public or private corporation, or the United States or any officer or employee of the United States. (i) "Pollution" means contamination or other alteration of the physical, chemical or biological properties of any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity or odor of the waters, or the discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive or other substance or heat into any waters of the state. (j) "Wastewater facilities" means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, force mains, treatment plants, lagoons or any other structure, device, appurtenance or facility, whether operated individually or in any combination, used for collecting, treating and/or disposing of municipal or domestic wastewater, by either surface or underground methods, which is required to have a permit under Section 49-17-29. (k) "Waters of the state" means all waters within the jurisdiction of this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs, marshes, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems and all other bodies or accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural or artificial, situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the state, and such coastal waters as are within the jurisdiction of the state, except lakes, ponds or other surface waters which are wholly landlocked and privately owned. SECTION 55.  Section 21-27-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-205. (1)  The board shall classify all municipal and domestic water collection, storage, treatment and/or distribution systems actually used or intended for use as community water systems or nontransient, noncommunity water systems according to size, type, character of water to be treated, number of service connections, and other physical conditions affecting the operation and maintenance of those systems, and also according to the degree of skill, knowledge, training and experience required of the operators of those systems to ensure competent, efficient operation and maintenance of such systems and protection of public health. (2) The commission shall classify all municipal and domestic wastewater facilities according to size, type, character of wastewater to be treated, and other physical conditions affecting the operation and maintenance of the facilities, and also according to the degree of skill, knowledge, training and experience required of the operators of the facilities to ensure competent, efficient operation and maintenance of the facilities and prevention of pollution of waters of the state. (3) The commission shall establish reciprocal certification arrangements with other states and private companies that establish training and certification programs for operators of commercial nonhazardous solid waste management landfills that meet or exceed the requirements of the commercial nonhazardous solid waste management landfill operator training and certification program established by the commission. (4) The commission may establish reciprocal certification arrangements with other states and private companies that establish training and certification programs for operators of commercial Class I rubbish sites that meet or exceed the requirements of the commercial Class I rubbish site operator training and certification program established by the commission. SECTION 56.  Section 21-27-207, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-207. Both the board and commission may adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and may make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from and may enforce those rules, regulations and procedures as are necessary or appropriate to effectuate the duties and responsibilities of these agencies arising under Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221.  The rules, regulations and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, the following:  criteria for classifying municipal and domestic community water systems, nontransient, noncommunity water systems and wastewater facilities; qualifications for operators of community water systems, nontransient, noncommunity water systems and wastewater facilities; certification of operators of commercial Class I rubbish sites; procedures for examining or testing applicants for operator certificates; procedures and fees for issuing, reissuing, modifying, revoking or terminating operator certificates; and reciprocal certification of operators certified in other states having certification requirements not less stringent than those established by the board and commission.  Any increase in the fees charged by the board under this section shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. SECTION 57.  Section 21-27-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-211. (1)  It is unlawful to operate or cause to be operated any wastewater facility or community water system covered under Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221 unless the operator of that facility or system holds a current certificate of competency issued by the board or commission, as provided by Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, in a classification corresponding to the classification of the facility or system.  After July 1, 1998, it shall be unlawful to operate or cause to be operated any nontransient, noncommunity water system covered under Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, unless the operator of that system holds a current certificate of competency issued by the board.  If an operator is lost due to illness, death, resignation, discharge or other legitimate cause, the owner or president of the governing board of the facility or system shall immediately notify either the board or commission, as the case may be.  The facility or system may continue to operate without a certified operator on an interim basis for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, except for good cause shown upon petition to the responsible agency.  The board or the commission, as the case may be, may grant, upon petition of the facility or system, an extension of the interim operating period not to exceed an additional one hundred eighty (180) days for good cause shown. (2) It is unlawful to operate or cause to be operated any commercial nonhazardous solid waste management landfill permitted under Section 49-17-29 unless the operator of that facility holds a current certificate of competency issued by the commission, as provided by Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221.  However, in the event of the loss of an operator due to illness, death, resignation, discharge or other legitimate cause, notice shall be immediately given to the commission and the continued operation of the facility without a certified operator may proceed on an interim basis for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, except for good cause shown upon petition to the commission. (3) After June 30, 2005, it is unlawful to operate or cause to be operated any commercial Class I rubbish site, unless the operator of that facility holds a certificate of competency issued by the commission under Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221.  However, in the event of the loss of an operator due to illness, death, resignation, discharge or other legitimate cause, notice shall be immediately given to the commission and the continued operation of the facility without a certified operator may proceed on an interim basis for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, except for good cause shown upon petition to the commission. SECTION 58.  Section 21-27-213, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-213. (1)  Notwithstanding any provision of Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221 to the contrary, any person who is an operator of a municipal or domestic wastewater facility or community water system on July 1, 1986, may, on or before June 30, 1987, apply to the board or commission for, and shall be issued, an operator's certificate without examination or proof of other qualifications, if the application is accompanied by an affidavit of the owner of the facility or system verifying the status of the applicant.  Any certificate so issued shall be valid only for the particular facility being operated by the applicant, and then only so long as the facility remains in the same or a lower classification as at the time the application is filed. (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221 to the contrary, any person who is an operator of a nontransient, noncommunity water system on July 1, 1997, may, before June 30, 1998, apply to the board for an operator's certificate without examination.  The application shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the owner of the system verifying the status of the applicant.  The board shall consider the performance history of any system operated by the applicant in determining whether to issue a certificate under this subsection.  Upon review of the performance history and the application, the board may grant or deny the issuance of a certificate under this subsection.  Any certificate issued under this subsection shall be valid only for the particular facility being operated by the applicant. SECTION 59.  Section 27-104-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-104-301. (1)  A special fund, to be designated the "2018 Transportation and Infrastructure Improvements Fund," is created within the State Treasury, which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (2) Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed, in the discretion of the Department of Finance and Administration, as follows: (a) To pay the costs incurred by the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the Mississippi Department of Transportation to widen Mississippi Highway 16 to three (3) lanes as follows: (i) From near the Neely Town Road at the DeKalb City Limits to the point at which Old Philadelphia Road ties into Mississippi Highway 16; and (ii) Between the two (2) points at which Mississippi Highway 39 ties into Mississippi Highway 16........................................ $2,000,000.00. (b)  To assist in paying the costs associated with preconstruction, design, engineering, land acquisition, right-of-way acquisition, construction and development of the Reunion Parkway project from Bozeman Road to Parkway East in Madison County, Mississippi....................... $8,000,000.00. (c) To assist the East Metropolitan Corridor Commission, which is a commission operating as a local public agency representing the Jackson Municipal Airport Authority, the City of Brandon, Mississippi, the City of Flowood, Mississippi, and the City of Pearl, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with land acquisition and implementation of the East Metro Corridor project in Rankin County, Mississippi, from its current terminus at the southeast corner of, and within, the Jackson-Medgar Wiley Evers International Airport, traversing easterly and southerly and terminating at Interstate 20 at Crossgates Boulevard in Brandon, Mississippi....... $8,000,000.00. (d)  To assist DeSoto County, Mississippi, in paying the costs of rebuilding Holly Springs Road in DeSoto County and drainage improvements to the road.......................... $3,000,000.00. (e) To assist Carroll County, Mississippi, in paying the costs of repair, renovation or replacement of two (2) closed bridges on or near County Road 57 in Carroll County.................................... $ 500,000.00. (f) To assist Lamar County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with necessary infrastructure improvements in Beat 5 of Lamar County and/or construction of recreational facilities in Beat 5.............................. $ 500,000.00. (g) To assist Lamar County, Mississippi, in paying the costs of improvements to the intersection of Scruggs Road and Mississippi Highway 589, including, but not limited to, the relocation of portions of the road, the purchase of property related to the relocation, signage, paving, other costs related to improving the safety of the intersection and other road safety projects in Supervisors District 5 of Lamar County...................................... $1,500,000.00. (h) To assist Bolivar County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with preplanning and construction of a Mississippi River landing dock facility and related facilities in Bolivar County...................... $1,000,000.00. (i) To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, in paying the costs related to the extension of Gunter Road in Rankin County..................................... $2,800,000.00. (j) To assist the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District in paying the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction or replacement of seawalls at the Ross Barnett Reservoir as required by the settlement agreement in the case of Bobby L. Baker, Jr., et al. v. Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, in the Circuit Court of Rankin County, Mississippi, Civil Action No. 212-133E............. $4,000,000.00. (k) To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with resurfacing and other improvements to Hardy Street in the City of Hattiesburg from its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 East to its intersection with West Pine Street in the City of Hattiesburg........ $ 400,000.00. (l) To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with resurfacing and other improvements to 38th Avenue in the City of Hattiesburg....................................... $ 100,000.00. (m) To assist Hinds County, Mississippi, in paying the costs of construction and development of the Byram-Clinton Parkway project in Hinds County........................... $2,000,000.00. (n) To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the following purposes, in the following order: (i) Construction and development of roundabout projects and other improvements at the intersection of Main Street and Scott Street and adjoining or related intersections in the City of Senatobia; (ii) Improvements at the intersection of Front Street and Main Street in the City of Senatobia; and (iii) Improvements at the intersection of Heard Street and Main Street in the City of Senatobia.... $2,300,000.00. Any such funds that are in excess of that needed to complete the projects described in this paragraph shall be used to assist the City of Senatobia in paying the costs associated with making historically relevant infrastructure improvements in the city's downtown historic district.  In addition, the scope of work for any projects described in this paragraph that are located in the city's downtown historic district must be in keeping with the character of the district. (o) To assist in paying the costs associated with: (i) Constructing, developing, extending and implementing wastewater infrastructure and related facilities, systems and infrastructure within and/or near Gateway Industrial Park in Pike County, Mississippi; and (ii) Constructing access roads and related infrastructure within and/or near Gateway Industrial Park in Pike County....................................... $3,000,000.00. (p) To assist the City of Petal, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with (i) the repair, rehabilitation, resurfacing, construction and reconstruction of Leeville Road/Main Street located in Forrest County, Mississippi, in the City of Petal from its intersection with the Evelyn Gandy Parkway southerly to the boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Petal; and (ii) the repair, rehabilitation, resurfacing, construction and reconstruction of Smithville Road located in Forrest County, Mississippi, in the City of Petal.. $ 750,000.00. (q) To assist the Town of West, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and making other improvements to streets in the Town of West........ $ 500,000.00. (r) To assist Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the resurfacing and repaving of Longview Road in Oktibbeha County.......................... $ 750,000.00. (s) To assist in paying the costs associated with the completion of the four-lane of Mississippi Highway 19 South at the south Philadelphia City boundary intersection at Holland Avenue and extending south along Mississippi Highway 19 South to the intersection of BIA Road 241 (also known as Tucker Road), including, but not be limited to, all necessary acquisition, preconstruction and construction activities........ $2,000,000.00. (t) To assist the City of Pascagoula, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with construction and development of the East Bank Access Road project in the City of Pascagoula................................ $2,000,000.00. (u) To assist the Pascagoula Port Authority in paying the costs associated with construction and development of the North Rail Corridor project in Jackson County, Mississippi....................................... $2,000,000.00. (v) To assist the Town of Carrollton, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with making improvements to Washington Street in the Town of Carrollton.................. $ 200,000.00. (w) To assist the City of Winona, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with making improvements to Powell Street in the City of Winona...................... $ 300,000.00. (x) To assist the Town of Como, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Como.......... $ 250,000.00. (y) To assist the Town of Sledge, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Sledge........ $ 250,000.00. (z) To assist the Town of Itta Bena, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Itta Bena..... $ 250,000.00. (aa) To assist the City of Grenada, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Grenada....... $ 500,000.00. (bb) To assist the City of Waynesboro, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Ramey Lane/Martin Luther King, Jr., Drive sewer repair and resurfacing project in the City of Waynesboro................................ $ 500,000.00. (cc) To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair, rehabilitation, maintenance and other improvements to roads in the City of Corinth................................... $ 500,000.00. (dd) To assist the City of Long Beach, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Long Beach.... $1,000,000.00. (ee) To assist Wilkinson County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, replacement, reconstruction and/or construction of bridges in Wilkinson County, including those bridges on state-designated highways that are maintained by the county.......................... $1,700,000.00. (ff) To assist the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with: (i) Transportation infrastructure due diligence to increase multimodal river transportation options in the City of Vicksburg; and (ii) Expanded multimodal layout to provide a combination of rail, interstate, airport, and river access in and to the City of Vicksburg.......................... $1,000,000.00. (gg) To assist the Town of Flora, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Flora......... $ 300,000.00. (hh) To assist in paying the costs associated with making improvements to: (i) The intersection of Mississippi Highway 9W and Mississippi Highway 7 in Lafayette County, Mississippi; (ii) A portion of Mississippi Highway 7 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 9W and running approximately one (1) mile south of such intersection in Lafayette County; and (iii) A portion of Mississippi Highway 7 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 9W and running northerly to the boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Oxford, Mississippi....................... $1,000,000.00. (ii) To assist in paying the costs associated with necessary repairs to Natchez Trace Lake and surrounding roads in Pontotoc County, Mississippi...................... $1,000,000.00. (jj) To assist the City of Houston, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Houston....... $ 300,000.00. (kk) To assist the Town of Houlka, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Houlka........ $ 200,000.00. (ll) To assist the City of Clinton, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements and upgrades to roads in the City of Clinton................................... $1,000,000.00. (mm) To assist Tate County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with widening, safety improvements, leveling, mill and overlay of Country Club Road south of the Country Club Road/Shands Bottom Road four-way stop; however, any funds that are in excess of that needed to complete such project shall be used to assist Tate County in paying the costs associated with repaving roads in Tate County.............................. $1,000,000.00. (nn) To assist in paying the costs of construction and development related to the Cook Road Corridor project in Jackson County, Mississippi, and Harrison County, Mississippi....................................... $2,000,000.00. (oo)  To assist the Town of Vaiden, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to streets in the Town of Vaiden...... $ 100,000.00. (pp) To assist the City of Crystal Springs, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Crystal Springs........................... $ 500,000.00. (qq) To assist the City of Hernando, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with construction and construction engineering related to the realignment of McIngvale Road in the City of Hernando........................... $1,000,000.00. (rr) To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the following purposes: (i) Rehabilitation and paving of Attala County Road 2221 also known as Airport Road in Attala County; (ii) Base repair and asphalt overlay of the back and front parking lots of the Attala County Justice Court Building; and (iii)  Base reconstruction and resurfacing of the parking lot of the former Jack Post Manufacturing Building in Attala County..................................... $  450,000.00. (ss) To assist the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with making improvements and upgrades to South Huntington Street and other streets in the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi.................... $ 750,000.00. (tt)  To assist in paying the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, resurfacing, construction and reconstruction, including the widening of and addition of lanes to Scott Road in the City of Lucedale, Mississippi, from its intersection with Mississippi Highway 26 to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 63 in the City of Lucedale.................................. $ 350,000.00. (uu) To assist in paying the costs associated with planning, design, construction, repair, renovation, replacement, expansion of and other improvements to infrastructure at the Columbia-Marion County Airport in Marion County, Mississippi....................................... $ 250,000.00. (vv) To assist in paying the costs associated with construction and development of a bridge at the industrial park/port in Itawamba County, Mississippi.......... $ 500,000.00. (ww) To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Lincoln County............ $ 500.000.00. (xx)  To assist the City of Brookhaven, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Brookhaven................................ $ 500,000.00. (yy)  To assist the City of Farmington, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with expansion of and upgrades and improvements to the city's infrastructure......................... $  500,000.00. (zz) To assist the City of Carthage, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with making improvements to portions of Valley Street, Williams Street, Franklin Street and McMillan Park Road in the City of Carthage................. $ 500,000.00. (aaa)  To assist the Itawamba County Railroad Authority in paying a portion of the costs associated with the repair, rehabilitation, construction, reconstruction, upgrading and improvement of the existing railroad line and related facilities running from the City of Amory, Mississippi, to the City of Fulton, Mississippi, including projects necessary to ensure safety and structural integrity of the rail line, rail beds and bridges............................. $1,500,000.00. (bbb) To assist in paying costs associated with improvements at the Columbia Training School in the City of Columbia, Mississippi..................... $ 500,000.00. (ccc)  To assist the City of Louisville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with constructing a road and other transportation infrastructure in the City of Louisville that will provide and improve access to land owned by the city designated for an economic development project on or near the location of Winston Plywood & Veneer............... $ 500,000.00. (ddd)  To assist the New Site Water Association in paying the costs associated with repairing a water tank that is located adjacent to the Piney Grove Campground in Prentiss County, Mississippi $  250,000.00. (eee)  To assist Quitman County, Mississippi, in paying the costs of construction, furnishing and equipping of a passenger train depot in Marks, Mississippi, specifically, to reimburse the Four Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollar ($420,000.00) loan from Quitman County general fund 001 to help with the construction of the Amtrak shelter in Marks, Mississippi.  The amount of Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) may be used to purchase and remodel an existing building next to the new Amtrak stop that will serve as a waiting area and provide restroom facilities for Amtrak passengers and waiters................. $ 500,000.00. (fff) To assist the City of Saltillo, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a project involving the city's wastewater system and/or repair of sinkholes in the city....................................... $ 250,000.00. (ggg)  To assist Lafayette County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the extension of West Oxford Loop in Lafayette County........................................... $1,000,000.00. (hhh)  To assist the Tupelo Public School District in paying the costs associated with roofing Church Street Elementary School in Tupelo, Mississippi............................... $  400,000.00. (iii)  To assist the City of Baldwyn, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with making improvements and upgrades to a portion of the city's natural gas system transmission system line and related infrastructure.................................... $1,000,000.00. (jjj)  To assist Harrison County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction, furnishing and equipping of an expansion of the Harrison County Law Enforcement Training Academy $ 800,000.00. (kkk) To assist the Town of Monticello, Mississippi, in paying the cost of necessary improvements to the U.S. Highway 84 frontage road between S.R. 27 and Old Highway 27 project in the Town of Monticello......................... $  450,000.00. (lll) To assist the Lamar County School District in paying the cost of repairs, renovations and capital improvements necessitated by the consolidation of the Lumberton County School District into the Lamar County School District..... $1,000,000.00. (mmm) To assist in paying the costs associated with repair, rehabilitation, and related construction activities for the Mississippi Center for Innovation and Technology in the City of Vicksburg................................. $2,500,000.00. (nnn) To assist the Mississippi's Toughest Kids Foundation in paying the costs associated with: (i) Design, preplanning, construction, furnishing and equipping of buildings and related facilities at Camp Kamassa in Copiah County, Mississippi; and (ii) Design, preplanning, construction and development of infrastructure at Camp Kamassa in Copiah County, Mississippi....................................... $1,000,000.00. (ooo)  To assist in paying the costs associated with construction, furnishing and equipping the Mississippi Children's Museum-Meridian in Meridian, Mississippi............................. $2,000,000.00. (ppp) To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying the costs associated with upgrades to Highway 8 starting at U.S. Highway 61 and extending to Bishop Road in Bolivar County.................. $1,000,000.00. (qqq) To assist Jasper County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the paving of County Road 6 in Jasper County..................................... $ 100,000.00. (rrr) To assist Jasper County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with upgrades to CR 1591 leading toward the Hol-Mac facility in Bay Springs................... $ 50,000.00. (sss) To assist Lowndes County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction of a portion of Charleigh Ford, Jr. Drive extending from Artesia Road to Mims Road...................................... $1,000,000.00. (ttt)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying the cost of completing the last mile of U.S. Highway 61 in Claiborne County, Mississippi, as contemplated in the 1987 Four-Lane Highway Program.......................................... $1,000,000.00. (uuu) To assist the Division of State Aid Road Construction in paying the costs associated with the completion of construction repairs on Parks Road in Drew, Mississippi................................. $ 300,000.00. (vvv)  To assist the Rodney History and Preservation Society in paying the costs associated with the repair and renovation of the historic Rodney Presbyterian Church in the Rodney Center Historic District......................................... $ 280,000.00. (www)  To assist the Summit Community Development Foundation under a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the IRS, in paying the costs associated with (i) the Water Stand Pipe lighting installation and landmark marker, and (ii) the acquisition, development and establishment of a town park in Summit, Mississippi.............. $  150,000.00. (xxx) To assist the City of Ripley, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Ripley........ $ 500,000.00. (yyy) To assist the Town of Byhalia, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Byhalia....... $ 500,000.00. (zzz)  To assist the City of Natchez, Mississippi, in providing matching funds for federal funds for emergency watershed projects in the city............................................. $  900,000.00. (aaaa)  To assist the City of Greenville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction and extension of Colorado Street from its intersection with George Abraham Boulevard southerly to VFW Road in the City of Greenville, including costs associated with land acquisition and professional services for such project.......................................... $1,000,000.00. (bbbb)  To assist the City of New Albany, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair, resurfacing, maintenance and other improvements to roads and streets and sewer repairs in the City of New Albany........................................ $ 500,000.00. (cccc) To assist Choctaw County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Choctaw County............ $ 250,000.00. (dddd) To assist Webster County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Webster County............ $ 250,000.00. (eeee)  To assist the City of Batesville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Batesville................................ $ 350,000.00. (ffff) To assist the Town of Sardis, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Sardis........ $ 250,000.00. (gggg)  To assist Newton County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with overlaying portions of Turkey Creek Road and Simkins Road in Newton County..................... $  225,000.00. (hhhh)  To assist Hancock County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair of Crane Creek Bridge No. 32 in Hancock County........................................... $ 500,000.00. (iiii) To assist Stone County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Stone County.............. $ 150,000.00. (jjjj) To assist the City of Southaven, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements in the Greenbrook and Carriage Hills neighborhoods in the City of Southaven................................. $ 500,000.00. (kkkk) To assist the City of Wiggins, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to Hall Road in the City of Wiggins... $ 500,000.00. (llll)  [Deleted] (mmmm)  [Deleted] (nnnn) To assist the Town of North Carrollton, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to Marshall Elementary School Road in the Town of North Carrollton............... $ 100,000.00. (oooo) To assist the Town of Kilmichael, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to Binford Street in the Town of Kilmichael................................ $ 200,000.00. (pppp) To assist the City of Bruce, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the following purposes: (i) Repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Bruce; and (ii) Construction of walking and bicycle trails in the municipality............................... $  200,000.00. (qqqq) To assist Jones County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair and replacement of the Lower Myrick Road Bridge in Jones County........... $ 380,000.00. (rrrr) To assist Jones County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair and replacement of the Ellisville - Tuckers Crossing Bridge in Jones County...................................... $1,200,000.00. (ssss)  To assist Clarke County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair and replacement of a bridge on County Road 360 in Clarke County.............................. $  480,000.00. (tttt) To assist Pearl River County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, leveling, resurfacing and other improvements to a portion of FZ Goss Road located between County Line Road and West Union Road in Pearl River County................................ $ 525,000.00. (uuuu)  To assist the City of Meridian, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to the 22nd Avenue-Interstate 20/Interstate 59 Overpass $  565,000.00. (vvvv) To assist the City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the City of Pass Christian............................ $ 400,000.00. (wwww)  To assist the Town of Mantachie, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with improvements to the town's water system and sewer system infrastructure....................... $  150,000.00. (xxxx) To assist Leake County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to Barnes Road in Leake County........ $ 300,000.00. (yyyy) To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to Emory Road beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 51 and running westerly to Interstate 55 in Holmes County..................................... $  300,000.00. (zzzz) To assist the Town of Sallis, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Sallis........ $ 100,000.00. (aaaaa) To assist the Town of Ethel, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Ethel......... $ 100,000.00. (bbbbb) To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, reconstruction, resurfacing and other improvements to Court Street in the City of Senatobia; however, any funds that are in excess of that needed to complete such project shall be used to assist the City of Senatobia in paying the costs associated with repairs, reconstruction, resurfacing and other improvements to Ward Street in the City of Senatobia............... $ 500,000.00. (ccccc)  To assist the Town of Lambert, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Lambert.......................................... $ 200,000.00. (ddddd)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair of a bridge on Freeman Town Road in Greene County........................................... $  250,000.00. (eeeee) To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair of a bridge on Hawthorne Drive between Sherwood Drive and Robin Drive in the City of Jackson.................................... $ 50,000.00. (fffff) To assist Lee County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements within and/or near the Hive Industrial site in Lee County............... ................................................. $ 500,000.00. (ggggg) To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with acquisition and repair of the New Imaging Water Association and related facilities........................................ $ 200,000.00. (hhhhh) To assist the Town of Bentonia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the town's sewer system...................................... $ 525,000.00. (iiiii)  To assist the Itawamba County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Itawamba County................................... $ 250,000.00. (jjjjj)  To assist the Town of New Hebron, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of New Hebron........................................ $ 50,000.00. (kkkkk) To assist the Town of Blue Mountain, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Blue Mountain............................. $ 100,000.00. (lllll) To assist the Town of Walnut, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Walnut........ $ 100,000.00. (mmmmm)  To assist the Town of Falkner, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Falkner.......................................... $ 100,000.00. (nnnnn)  To assist the City of Olive Branch, Mississippi, in paying the costs of infrastructure improvements and upgrades as necessary, including, but not limited to, repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads; repair and renovation of bridges; repairs and improvements to water and wastewater systems; and dam repairs................................................. $1,000,000.00. (ooooo) To assist the CREATE Foundation in paying the costs associated with repairs, renovations and upgrades at the First Christian Church in Amory, Mississippi....... $ 200,000.00. (ppppp) To assist the Tougaloo College Research Development Foundation, Inc., in paying the costs associated with completion of restoration, repair, renovation and upgrades to the interior of the historic Tougaloo College site where the Freedom Riders took refuge........................ $1,000,000.00. (qqqqq)  To assist the Town of Magnolia, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repair, renovation and upgrades of the town's police and fire station........................... $  500,000.00. (rrrrr)  To assist the City of Guntown, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the repair, replacement, renovation, demolition, construction and/or making any other improvements to the municipal structures on or near Main Street in the City of Guntown $  350,000.00. (sssss) To assist the City of Baldwyn in paying the costs associated with repair, resurfacing and other improvements to Third Street and sewer repairs on Third Street; however, any funds that are in excess of that needed to complete such project shall be used to assist the City of Baldwyn in paying the costs associated with repairs, reconstruction, resurfacing and other improvements to streets in the City of Baldwyn..... $ 213,000.00. (ttttt) To assist Smith County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in Smith County.............. $ 450,000.00. (uuuuu) To assist the Town of Wesson, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Wesson........ $ 100,000.00. (vvvvv) To assist the Town of Georgetown, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads in the Town of Georgetown........................................ $ 100,000.00. (wwwww) To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with improvements to the city's water system and sewer system infrastructure.................................... $ 500,000.00. (xxxxx)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements at Town Green in the City of Gautier............................... $  500,000.00. SECTION 60.  Section 27-104-371, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-104-371. (1)  A special fund, to be designated as the "2022 Local Improvements Projects Fund," is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (2) Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration as follows: (a)  To the Department of Archives and History for the purpose of providing a grant to the Scott Ford House, Inc., to develop the property located at 136 East Cohea Street in the City of Jackson, the home of the former slave Mary Scott Green, to tell her story and that of other Mississippi midwives, and to develop the property located at 138 East Cohea Street in the City of Jackson as a house museum to tell the family story of the midwife Virginia Scott Ford.... $ 200,000.00 (b)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of and upgrades and improvements to the Jackson Public School District's Career Development Center in Jackson, Mississippi.............................. $ 300,000.00 (c)  To assist the Centreville Chamber of Commerce in paying costs associated with construction, furnishing and equipping of a recreation center and related facilities in the Town of Centreville, Mississippi....................................... $ 500,000.00 (d)  To assist the Richards Community Center, Inc., in paying costs associated with recreational equipment and lights for the Richards Community Center.................................. $ 150,000.00 (e)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the National Guard Armory in the Town of Gloster, Mississippi....................................... $ 250,000.00 (f)  To assist the City of Georgetown, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Railroad Avenue lighting and park area......................................... $    50,000.00 (g)  To assist the City of Georgetown, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Railroad Avenue sidewalks......................................... $ 100,000.00 (h)  To assist the City of Brookhaven, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with geometric improvements, signalization improvements, striping/signing and drainage improvements to Brookway Boulevard beginning at Interstate 55 and continuing east to U.S. Highway 51 $ 1,000,000.00 (i)  To assist the Town of Byhalia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Old School Commons restoration and upgrades necessary to meet ADA regulations................. $   500,000.00 (j)  To assist Marshall County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Blackwater Road Bridge project.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (k)  To assist the Town of Tylertown, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the renovation of the Civic Center and Mississippi State University Extension Service offices.......................................... $ 450,000.00 (l)  To assist the City of Durant, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs...................... $    50,000.00 (m) To assist the Town of Goodman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs................. $    50,000.00 (n)  To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with courthouse renovation.............. $   150,000.00 (o)  To assist the Town of Pickens, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the town police station................................................. $ 50,000.00 (p)  To the Board of Supervisors of Lowndes County, Mississippi, to assist the Town of Crawford, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure needs............................................ $ 250,000.00 (q)  To assist the City of D'Iberville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the extension of Mallett Road...................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (r)  To assist the Town of Coldwater, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of a fire truck............................................ $ 350,000.00 (s)  To assist the Town of Tunica, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road repairs...................... $   500,000.00 (t)  To assist Tunica County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the extension of natural gas lines............................................ $ 150,000.00 (u)  To assist the City of Starkville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Northside Drive drainage channel improvements, mobilization, channel shaping and grading.......................................... $ 250,000.00 (v)  To assist the City of Starkville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with J.L. King Center infrastructure, security and lighting......................................... $ 250,000.00 (w)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of a parking lot and related facilities for the Jackson Convention Center........................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (x)  To assist the City of Oxford, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of a building to be used by the City of Oxford Police Department........................................ $ 1,000,000.00 (y)  To assist Perry County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of a fire truck................. ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (z)  To assist the City of Columbus, Mississippi, Fire and Rescue in paying costs associated with the acquisition of a fire engine................................................. $ 350,000.00 (aa)  To assist the City of Fulton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of and repair and renovation of a building to house City Hall and repair and renovation of the former City Hall to house other city departments....................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (bb)  To assist Itawamba County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the Itawamba County Courthouse and construction of a Justice Court................ $ 1,000,000.00 (cc)  To assist Jones County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair, renovation, upgrades and additions to the Jones County Law Enforcement Complex.................... $   500,000.00 (dd)  To assist the City of Laurel, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with additions to the Veterans Museum in Laurel, Mississippi....................................... $   250,000.00 (ee)  To assist Arise and Shine, Inc., with providing children and youth programs and services in Copiah County, Mississippi... $    50,000.00 (ff)  To assist the City of Crystal Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with providing lighting for Pedestrian and Bicycle Corridor Federal Aid Project No. STP-0130-00(013)LPA/107363-701000.............. $ 250,000.00 (gg)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the Millsaps Heritage Center in the City of Hazlehurst, Mississippi....................................... $   300,000.00 (hh)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water system, sewer system and other infrastructure improvements and development of the Fayard project beautification.................................... $ 1,500,000.00 (ii)  To assist the Diamondhead Fire District in paying various costs for the City Fire Department................. $    25,000.00 (jj)  To assist in paying various costs for the Fenton Fire Station in Hancock County, Mississippi............. $ 25,000.00 (kk)  To assist in paying various costs for the County Farm Fire Station in Harrison County, Mississippi....................................... $ 25,000.00 (ll)  To assist in paying various costs for the Lizan Fire Station in Harrison County, Mississippi............ $ 25,000.00 (mm)  To assist in paying various costs for the Saucier Fire Station in Harrison County, Mississippi....................................... $ 25,000.00 (nn)  To assist in paying various costs for the Success Fire Station in Harrison County, Mississippi....................................... $ 25,000.00 (oo)  To assist the City of Fayette, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction, furnishing and equipping of a fire station for the city's fire department........................................ $ 400,000.00 (pp)  To assist the City of Baldwyn, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of a satellite fire station $   200,000.00 (qq)  To assist the City of Baldwyn, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs to Winddance Drive necessary for trucking company weight restrictions....................... $ 100,000.00 (rr)  To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with lighting and curb upgrades to McCullough Boulevard................................................. $   500,000.00 (ss)  To assist the City of Booneville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the repair, replacement, adjustment and relocation of sewer lines and related sewer system infrastructure underneath and near the Northeast Mississippi Community College football field and surrounding area............................................. $ 1,000,000.00 (tt)  To assist Madison County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with making improvements to Bozeman Road, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 463 and proceeding north.. $ 2,500,000.00 (uu)  To assist the City of Madison, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation of the Performing Arts Center and placement of utility lines under the center........................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (vv)  To assist the Town of Bruce, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements around and near both of the city's parks, including, but not limited to, paving town streets and parking lots, drainage improvements, water and sewer line repairs and extensions, and pavilion construction in such parks $   400,000.00 (ww)  To assist the Town of Bruce, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and resurfacing of "Jimmy Beckley" Industrial Park Road............................................. $ 500,000.00 (xx)  To assist the Town of Derma, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with water well repairs................. $ 50,000.00 (yy)  To assist the Town of Vardaman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with paving town streets.......... $   150,000.00 (zz)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of an ambulance center for Tippah County Hospital......................................... $ 500,000.00 (aaa)  To assist the Town of Walnut, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of a fire truck for the town's fire department........................................ $   300,000.00 (bbb)  To assist the Town of Dumas, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the town's fire department........................................ $    25,000.00 (ccc)  To assist in paying costs associated with creating a SkillPath 2030 Lab for the North Tippah School District......................................... $ 200,000.00 (ddd)  To assist the City of Ripley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the city's fire department........................................ $ 100,000.00 (eee)  To assist the City of Ripley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with various infrastructure projects......................................... $ 200,000.00 (fff)  To assist Mississippi Hills Heritage Area Alliance in paying costs associated with alliance activities........................................ $ 100,000.00 (ggg)  To assist in paying costs associated with exhibits with robotics and code training for students at the Issac Chapel Rosenwald Historical Museum and Education Center in Marshall County, Mississippi................................................. $ 200,000.00 On April 21, 2023, the Board of Supervisors of Marshall County shall transfer to the Issac Chapel Rosenwald Historical Museum and Education Center the remaining balance of all funds received from the Department of Finance and Administration under this paragraph (ggg). (hhh)  To assist Delta Health System in paying costs associated with capital improvements and infrastructure improvements related to patient room compliance and women's center services $ 2,000,000.00 (iii)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of the Mississippi Songwriters Performing Arts Center and improvements to Town Commons Park, including, but not limited to, parking and through roads for an amphitheater $ 4,000,000.00 (jjj)  To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair, renovation and upgrades to Front Street Fire Station...................................... $ 500,000.00 (kkk)  To assist the City of Gautier, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with expansion of RV sites and paving at Shepard State Park............................................. $ 1,500,000.00 (lll)  To assist Chickasaw County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the CR 42 Road project ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (mmm)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of a firehouse for the Thorn Volunteer Fire Department in Chickasaw County, Mississippi............................... $ 50,000.00 (nnn)  To assist Clay County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road projects in Supervisors District 2 in Clay County including overlay of Mayhew Road, Mayfield Road, Pinkerton Road, Clisby Road and Herman Shirley Road ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ooo)  To assist Monroe County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road maintenance and repairs ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (ppp)  To assist the City of West Point, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with roof repair and/or replacement for Bryan Public Library.......................................... $ 250,000.00 (qqq)  To assist in paying costs associated with the construction or purchase of a building for the Michael H. Ball Veterans of Foreign Wars Post 12191 in Carroll County, Mississippi ................................................. $ 200,000.00 (rrr)  To assist the Town of Duck Hill, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with resurfacing streets.......... $   200,000.00 (sss)  To assist the Town of Carrollton, Mississippi, in paying various costs associated with the town's water tower project.... $    20,000.00 (ttt)  To assist in paying costs associated with various Winona-Montgomery County Consolidated School District renovation projects................................................. $ 7,000,000.00 (uuu)  To assist in paying costs associated with a regional communications system for the Mississippi Organ Recovery Agency. $   200,000.00 (vvv)  To assist the City of Columbia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the city's downtown storm drainage system and related infrastructure................. $   500,000.00 (www)  To assist Marion County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with pavement maintenance for county roads ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (xxx)  To assist Lamar County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Mental Health Diversion Center in Purvis, Mississippi................................................. $ 500,000.00 (yyy)  To provide for the reimbursement of prior costs associated with acquisition and repair, renovation, furnishing and equipping of a building and related facilities for the Bovina Volunteer Fire Department in Warren County, Mississippi....................................... $ 250,000.00 (zzz)  To assist the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with lighting for city baseball fields........................................... $ 250,000.00 (aaaa)  To assist Warren County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the purchase of culverts and construction and installation of sluice gates...................... $ 75,000.00 (bbbb)  To assist the City of Grenada, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road resurfacing for Southwest Frontage Road $   250,000.00 (cccc)  To assist Grenada County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction and extension of New Industrial Park Road................................................. $ 500,000.00 (dddd)  To assist Grenada County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with resurfacing of National Guard Trout Road............................................. $ 750,000.00 (eeee)  To assist Tallahatchie County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with roof repair for Phillip Community Center in Tallahatchie County, Mississippi.................. $ 50,000.00 (ffff)  To assist the City of Petal, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the construction of an access road beginning at or near the intersection of Central Avenue and M. J. Harris Drive in Petal, Mississippi, and running southerly into the Robert E. Russell Sports Complex.......................................... $   500,000.00 (gggg)  To assist the City of Iuka, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road paving, purchase of utility vehicles for the city's police department and fire department, city park upgrades, library repair and purchase of a dump truck and two (2) police cars $ 250,000.00 (hhhh)  To assist the City of Pontotoc, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with relocating the fire station on Main Street in the city to a less congested corner lot near the current location... $   750,000.00 (iiii)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of the Agricola Multipurpose Center in George County, Mississippi $ 1,600,000.00 (jjjj)  To assist in paying costs associated with industrial park wastewater replacement main in George County, Mississippi....................................... $   400,000.00 (kkkk)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of a multipurpose arena in Jackson County, Mississippi $   750,000.00 (llll)  To assist Jasper County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and improvements to roads and bridges including, but not limited to, CR 195 and CR 215........................................ $ 650,000.00 (mmmm)  To assist Smith County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and repaving of county roads............................................ $ 250,000.00 (nnnn)  To assist in paying costs associated with acquisition of motor vehicles for the Winston County Sheriff's Department... $   150,000.00 (oooo)  To assist Kemper County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a gas line project from Dekalb, Mississippi, to Scooba, Mississippi....................................... $ 500,000.00 (pppp)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of equipment for the Kemper County Volunteer Fire Department.... $ 50,000.00 (qqqq)  To assist in paying costs associated with acquisition of motor vehicles for the Neshoba County Sheriff's Department... $   150,000.00 (rrrr)  To assist the Town of Scooba, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the renovation of town facilities........................................ $ 75,000.00 (ssss)  To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements in infrastructure in the Midtown area of the city, including, but not limited to, roads, bridges, water, sewer, drainage, sidewalks, stormwater detention, land acquisition, utility relocation and lighting.......................................... $ 1,750,000.00 (tttt)  To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with flood control, detention basins or other infrastructure improvements in and around Gordon's Creek ................................................. $ 250,000.00 (uuuu)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of the Alcorn County Courthouse $ 1,000,000.00 (vvvv)  To assist in paying costs associated with Alcorn County School District improvements...................... $ 150,000.00 (wwww)  To Alcorn County, Mississippi, to assist in paying Alcorn County Fire Chiefs and Firefighters Association expenses......................................... $ 100,000.00 (xxxx)  To assist the Jacinto Foundation, Inc., in paying costs associated with capital improvements, repairing, renovating, restoring, rehabilitating, preserving, furnishing and/or equipping the Jacinto Courthouse and related facilities in Alcorn County, Mississippi. $   100,000.00 (yyyy)  To assist Covington County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Kelly Creek Road and/or Fruitstand Road............................................. $ 200,000.00 (zzzz)  To assist Jefferson Davis County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Willie Fortenberry Road, Gum Swamp Road and/or Sumrall Road.................... $ 100,000.00 (aaaaa)  To assist the Town of Shubuta, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with refurbishing, repair, renovation, restoration and furnishing of the Town Hall building......................................... $ 200,000.00 (bbbbb)  To assist Coahoma Community College in paying costs associated with completion of the HVAC system for the Coahoma County Higher Education Center........................... $   150,000.00 (ccccc)  To assist Simpson County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with various road paving projects......................................... $ 500,000.00 (ddddd)  To assist the Town of D'Lo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with paving South Maple Street, Elm Street, North Oak Street and North Maple Street..................... $ 200,000.00 (eeeee)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Simpson County, Mississippi, and Rankin County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs:  Braxton Fire Department, Cato Fire Department, Harrisville Volunteer Fire Department, Magee Fire Department, Mendenhall Fire Department, Simpson County Station 7 Fire Department, Old Pearl Volunteer Fire Department, Pinola Fire Department, Puckett Volunteer Fire Department and Shell Road Volunteer Fire Department......................... $ 150,000.00 (fffff)  To assist in paying costs associated with the purchase of playground equipment for Houston Community Park in Itawamba County $ 50,000.00 (ggggg)  To assist Newton County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrades and repairs to Tanglewood Road............................................. $ 450,000.00 (hhhhh)  To assist Scott County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements on Coal Bluff Road.. $ 350,000.00 (iiiii)  To assist the Town of Plantersville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements and the purchase of equipment for the town's police department........................................ $ 100,000.00 (jjjjj)  To assist Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with upgrades and improvements to Maben Sturgis Road $ 1,000,000.00 (kkkkk)  To assist the City of Starkville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the city's Main Street project.......................................... $ 1,250,000.00 (lllll)  To assist Humphreys County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, including asbestos removal, to the Humphreys County Courthouse....................... $   400,000.00 (mmmmm)  To assist the City of New Albany, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with central business district renovations $ 250,000.00 (nnnnn)  To assist the CREATE Foundation in paying costs associated with storm shelter and community center renovations in the Red Hill Community in Union County, Mississippi....................................... $ 150,000.00 (ooooo)  To the Board of Trustees of Southwest Mississippi Community College for the purpose of providing funds for the costs associated with the construction of a new outdoor multipurpose center on the campus of the college......................... $ 500,000.00 (ppppp)  To Scenic Rivers Development Alliance for the purpose of making improvements at parks and facilities as follows:  golf cart path repairs and course equipment upgrades at Quail Hollow Golf Course in Pike County; building repairs and equipment upgrades at Bogue Chitto Water Park in Pike County; building repairs, arena equipment and bleachers at Ethel Vance Park in Pike County; building repairs and fencing at Liberty Town Fields in Pike County; ADA sidewalk improvements and building repairs at Walkers Bridge Water Park in Walthall County; pier improvements, building improvements and road improvements at the County Outdoor Complex in Walthall County and park improvements in Franklin County................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (qqqqq)  To assist the Caledonia Natural Gas District in paying costs associated with acquisition of three (3) pickup trucks to be used as service trucks................................. $   150,000.00 (rrrrr)  To assist Neshoba County, Mississippi, for the reimbursement of prior costs associated with transition to the MSWIN system........................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (sssss)  To assist in paying costs associated with the Neshoba General Hospital Ambulance Enterprise.............. $   250,000.00 (ttttt)  To assist the Briarwood Pool in Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with ADA requirements and accessibility plan................................................. $ 250,000.00 (uuuuu)  To assist Hinds County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Phase I White Oak Creek streambank erosion improvements to a portion of the creek running from at or near Old Canton Road to at or near Briarwood Drive in the City of Jackson, Mississippi $ 2,000,000.00 (vvvvv)  To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Endville Road ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (wwwww)  To provide funds to Wayne County, Mississippi, to be distributed equally among the following volunteer fire departments in Wayne County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs:  Battles Volunteer Fire Department, Beat Four Volunteer Fire Department, Buckatunna Volunteer Fire Department, Central Volunteer Fire Department, Clara Volunteer Fire Department, Coyt Volunteer Fire Department, Crossroads Volunteer Fire Department, Denham Volunteer Fire Department, Ecutta Volunteer Fire Department, Hiwanee Volunteer Fire Department, Matherville Volunteer Fire Department, Maynor Creek Volunteer Fire Department, Mulberry Volunteer Fire Department, Pleasant Grove Volunteer Fire Department, Progress Volunteer Fire Department, Strengthford Volunteer Fire Department and Yellow Creek Volunteer Fire Department  $   340,000.00 (xxxxx)  To assist the City of Waynesboro, Mississippi, in paying city fire department costs................. $    70,000.00 (yyyyy)  To assist the Town of State Line, Mississippi, in paying various department costs for Stateline Volunteer Fire Department................................................. $ 20,000.00 (zzzzz)  To assist in paying various department costs for Richton Volunteer Fire Department in Perry County, Mississippi....................................... $ 20,000.00 (aaaaaa)  To assist the Town of State Line, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with acquisition of motor vehicles for the city's police department................................. $ 50,000.00 (bbbbbb)  To assist the City of Picayune, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to North Frontage Road from Interstate 59 in Picayune......................... $   850,000.00 (cccccc)  To assist the City of Raymond, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation, rehabilitation and expansion of and additions to the city's police station.......................................... $ 250,000.00 (dddddd)  To assist Benton County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with maintenance of roads and bridges.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (eeeeee)  To assist the Town of Potts Camp, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of a fire truck............................................ $ 300,000.00 (ffffff)  To assist the Town of Hickory Flat, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of equipment for the town's police department................................. $ 100,000.00 (gggggg)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with maintenance of roads in Supervisors District 1 in Union County........................................... $ 500,000.00 (hhhhhh)  To assist Union County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with maintenance of roads in Supervisors District 2 in Union County........................................... $ 500,000.00 (iiiiii)  To provide matching funds to the City of Charleston, Mississippi, for the repair of Charleston City Hall............................................. $ 250,000.00 (jjjjjj)  To assist the Town of Coffeeville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with street improvements...................................... $ 125,000.00 (kkkkkk)  To assist the City of Water Valley, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovation of the Water Valley Civic Auditorium........................................ $   225,000.00 (llllll)  To assist Pearl River County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with county road maintenance ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (mmmmmm)  To assist the City of Morton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing, upgrades and improvements to streets and roads around Morton High School and surrounding areas in the City of Morton.................................... $   150,000.00 (nnnnnn)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the eight (8) volunteer fire departments in Scott County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs and expenses......................................... $ 200,000.00 (oooooo)  To assist in paying costs associated with repair and renovation of facilities at Chautauqua Park in Crystal Springs, Mississippi....................................... $ 500,000.00 (pppppp)  To assist Quitman Community Hospital in paying costs associated with improvements and upgrades to facilities and equipment $   500,000.00 (qqqqqq)  To provide funds to be distributed in the amount of $25,000.00 to fire departments in Prentiss County, Mississippi, to assist in paying equipment costs......................... $   375,000.00 (rrrrrr)  To assist the City of Senatobia, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with lighting and other improvements to city-owned facilities.................................. $ 1,000,000.00 (ssssss)  To assist Tate County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road and infrastructure improvements...................................... $ 5,000,000.00 (tttttt)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of an Agriculture Technology building at Independence High School in the Tate County School District.......... $ 750,000.00 (uuuuuu)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among all volunteer fire departments in Clarke County, Mississippi, to assist in paying equipment costs and for upgrades......................................... $ 150,000.00 (vvvvvv)  To assist in paying costs associated with acquisition of motor vehicles with upfit, lights, cages and sirens, for the Clarke County Sheriff's Department........................................ $ 100,000.00 (wwwwww)  To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with HVAC system and equipment repairs and/or replacement....................................... $   500,000.00 (xxxxxx)  To assist Jackson Metropolitan Technical Center in paying costs associated with roof and building repairs for its building................................................. $ 100,000.00 (yyyyyy)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, to provide funds for the acquisition of fire trucks for Carmack Volunteer Fire Department, Friendship Volunteer Fire Department, Providence Fire Department and Zama Volunteer Fire Department........................................ $ 1,000,000.00 (zzzzzz)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in defraying expenses associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to county roads and bridges.......................... $ 1,000,000.00 (aaaaaaa)  To assist Leake County, Mississippi, to provide funds for the acquisition of fire trucks, firefighting equipment and gear for volunteer fire departments in Leake County...................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (bbbbbbb)  To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and/or replacement of the roof for the Jack Post Industrial Building.......................... $ 1,000,000.00 (ccccccc)  To assist the Town of West, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs and improvements to town facilities $   200,000.00 (ddddddd)  To assist the City of Kosciusko, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair and maintenance of city facilities................................................. $ 500,000.00 (eeeeeee)  To assist in paying costs associated with construction of a new building for American Legion Post No. 44 in Attala County, Mississippi............................... $ 300,000.00 (fffffff)  To assist the City of Clinton, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with site work for and construction and development of streets, street lighting and signals, electrical and communications distribution systems and equipment, water system and sewer system infrastructure and related infrastructure within an area bound by U.S. Highway 80, Springridge Road, Interstate 20 and Clinton-Raymond Road/Madison Street in the City of Clinton......... $ 8,000,000.00 (ggggggg)  To assist the Town of Flora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the town's water system and sewer system infrastructure............................. $ 1,000,000.00 (hhhhhhh)  To assist Rankin County, Mississippi, in defraying expenses associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads and bridges................................. $ 8,000,000.00 (iiiiiii) To assist the City of Brandon, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements............................................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (jjjjjjj)  To assist the City of Pearl, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction of a bridge extending from the intersection of the extension of Ware Street and relocated St. Augustine Street to Pearson Road in the City of Pearl........ $   500,000.00 (kkkkkkk)  To assist Harrison County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Sportsplex improvements in the City of Long Beach, Mississippi........................ $ 1,500,000.00 (lllllll)  To assist in paying costs associated with improvements to Lumpkin Stadium for the Long Beach School District......................................... $   100,000.00 (mmmmmmm)  To provide $22,222.22 to each of the following fire departments in Choctaw County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs: Chester Volunteer Fire Department, Town of Ackerman Fire Department, Bywy Volunteer Fire Department, Simpson Volunteer Fire Department, Town of Weir Fire Department, Panhandle Volunteer Fire Department, Union Volunteer Fire Department and Town of French Camp Fire Department and to provide $22,222.24 to the Reform Fire Department in Choctaw County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs............................................ $ 200,000.00 (nnnnnnn)  To provide funds to Winston County, Mississippi, to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Winston County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs:  Nanih Waiya Volunteer Fire Department, Shiloh Volunteer Fire Department, City of Louisville Fire Department, Lo Butcha Volunteer Fire Department, Town of Noxapater Volunteer Fire Department and Mars Hill Volunteer Fire Department........................................ $ 120,000.00 (ooooooo)  To provide funds to be distributed equally among the following fire departments in Webster County, Mississippi, to assist in paying various department costs:  Town of Mathiston Volunteer Fire Department, City of Eupora Fire Department and Tomnolen Volunteer Fire Department........................................ $ 60,000.00 (ppppppp)  To assist the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with street repairs, resurfacing and improvements $   300,000.00 (qqqqqqq)  To assist the City of Louisville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with constructing a road and other transportation infrastructure in the City of Louisville that will provide and improve access to land owned by the city designated for an economic development project on or near the location of Winston Plywood & Veneer................................................. $   200,000.00 (rrrrrrr)  To assist the Town of French Camp, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with sidewalk repairs, lighting and improvements for the town's Historic Downtown District and School Street................................................. $   100,000.00 (sssssss)  To provide funds to Choctaw County, Mississippi, for repairs and resurfacing of roads.................. $   500,000.00 (ttttttt)  To assist the Town of Ackerman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with street repairs, resurfacing and improvements................................................. $ 200,000.00 (uuuuuuu)  To assist the Town of Mathiston, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction, repair, renovation, upgrades and improvements to the town's facilities........................................ $ 100,000.00 (vvvvvvv)  To assist Choctaw County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with Courthouse renovations and improvements...................................... $ 100,000.00 (wwwwwww) To assist American Legion Post 82 in the Town of Ackerman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities............................... $    25,000.00 (xxxxxxx) To assist VFW Post 3806 in the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities........................................ $ 25,000.00 (yyyyyyy) To assist VFW Post 4540 in Winston County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities........................................ $ 25,000.00 (zzzzzzz) To assist the American Legion Post 82 in the Town of Ackerman, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Post building and Post activities............................... $ 25,000.00 (aaaaaaaa)  To assist in paying the costs associated with land acquisition, site development and construction, furnishing and equipping of new buildings and facilities for, and the relocation of, the Mississippi Armed Forces Museum at Camp Shelby to property owned by the Mississippi Military Department and located near Camp Shelby in Forrest County, Mississippi....................................... $ 6,000,000.00 (bbbbbbbb)  To assist the City of Pascagoula, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations of city offices...................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (cccccccc)  To assist the Town of Sardis, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads and bridges.............................. $ 250,000.00 (dddddddd)  To assist the Town of Como, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repairs, resurfacing and other improvements to roads and bridges................................. $ 250,000.00 (eeeeeeee)  To assist the City of Bay Springs, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs to Payton Avenue $    35,000.00 (ffffffff)  To assist the Town of Heidelberg, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs to Walnut Street $ 45,000.00 (gggggggg)  To assist East Jasper School District in paying the costs associated with the acquisition of the Old Heidelberg Academy................................ $   350,000.00 (hhhhhhhh)  To assist the City of Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with improvements to Dabbs Street... $   250,000.00 (iiiiiiii)  To assist Lincoln County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and improvements to the county courthouse........................................ $ 350,000.00 (jjjjjjjj)  To assist the City of Carthage, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the repair and renovation of the coliseum......................................... $ 600,000.00 (kkkkkkkk)  To assist Holmes County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the paving and improvements to Salem/Courts Road................................. $   600,300.00 (llllllll)  To assist Tougaloo College in paying the costs associated with the improvement, renovation and preservation of the historic Mansion building......................... $ 600,000.00 (mmmmmmmm)  To assist the City of Southaven, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with a traffic signal at the intersection of Airways Boulevard and Guthrie Drive..................................... $   270,000.00 (nnnnnnnn)  To assist DeSoto County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a traffic signal at the intersection of Byhalia Road and Hwy 305 in Lewisburg/Olive Branch........................................... $ 270,000.00 (oooooooo)  To assist Marshall County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with building the Chickasaw Trail Emergency Response Center........................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (pppppppp)  To assist the Town of Terry, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the renovation of a community center.. $    30,000.00 (qqqqqqqq)  To assist the City of Byram, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with bridge and drainage projects......................................... $ 500,000.00 (rrrrrrrr)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations and upgrades for Thalia Mara Hall............................................. $ 2,000,000.00 (ssssssss)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations and upgrades for the Jackson Planetarium....................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (tttttttt)  To assist Panola County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with airport improvements ................................................. $   500,000.00 (uuuuuuuu)  To assist the Town of Sardis, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Sardis Lake Development project.......................................... $ 1,700,000.00 (vvvvvvvv)  To assist the Town of Noxapater, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with paving, repairs and improvements to city streets.......................................... $ 250,000.00 (wwwwwwww)  To assist the Town of Walnut Grove, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the purchase of a new fire truck $   250,000.00 (xxxxxxxx)  To assist the Lee County 4th District Community Development Group, a nonprofit corporation, in paying the costs associated with the construction/improvement to its community center  $   300,000.00 (yyyyyyyy)  To assist the Windows of Amory, a nonprofit corporation, for expenses related to improvements and operations of the former First Christian Church, known as "The Windows"..................................... $   200,000.00 (zzzzzzzz)  To assist the City of Aberdeen, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and improvements to the Magnolias......................................... $ 150,000.00 (aaaaaaaaa)  To assist Claiborne County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and improvements to historical structures in the county.......................... $ 75,000.00 (bbbbbbbbb)  To assist Claiborne County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the replacement of an air conditioning and heating system for the county jail ................................................. $ 80,000.00 (ccccccccc)  To assist Claiborne County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the resurfacing of Russom-Westside Road $   300,000.00 (ddddddddd)  To assist the Summit Community Development Foundation in paying the costs associated with the Stand Pipe project $   200,000.00 (eeeeeeeee)  To assist the City of Natchez, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with lighting of the Mississippi River Bridge................................................. $ 500,000.00 (fffffffff)  To assist the City of Magee, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements...................................... $ 150,000.00 (ggggggggg) To assist the City of Mendenhall, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with infrastructure improvements $   150,000.00 (hhhhhhhhh)  To assist Montgomery County, Mississippi, in defraying expenses for infrastructure improvements and industrial facility......................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (iiiiiiiii) To assist Attala County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with roof repairs for a county-owned building......................................... $ 600,000.00 (jjjjjjjjj)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying the costs associated with an overpass for Old Highway 63 over Highway 98........................ $ 1,200,000.00 (kkkkkkkkk)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with asbestos abatement and demolition of an abandoned factory building........................ $   600,000.00 (lllllllll)  To assist Greene County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the conversion of the old farmer's market into a regional emergency operations center........................................... $ 1,200,000.00 (mmmmmmmmm)  To assist the Greene County School District in paying costs associated with tornado and wind damage at the McLain Attendance Center................................. $ 50,000.00 (nnnnnnnnn)  To assist the City of D'Iberville, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with upgrades, mitigation and improvements to the city marina................................... $ 750,000.00 (ooooooooo)  To assist Jackson County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the renovations and expansions of the Ball Park Road Fire Station................................. $   750,000.00 (ppppppppp)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to Riley Road $   500,000.00 (qqqqqqqqq)  To assist the Pearl & Leaf Rivers Rails to Trails Recreational District in paying the costs associated with overlaying the trail from James Lynn Cartlidge Gateway to Carolyn McRaney Gateway and paving the parking lots at stations......................................... $ 1,500,000.00 (rrrrrrrrr)  To assist the City of Flowood, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements to North Flowood Drive..................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (sssssssss)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying the costs associated with improvements to Highway 25 between Grants Ferry Road and Mississippi Highway 471....................................... $ 4,000,000.00 (ttttttttt)  To assist the City of Macon, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with inspection, repairs and improvements to the Electric Department Office.................... $    40,000.00 (uuuuuuuuu)  To assist Noxubee County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a roof replacement on the county courthouse $   400,000.00 (vvvvvvvvv)  To assist the City of Poplarville, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the acquisition of a new fire truck. $   500,000.00 (wwwwwwwww)  To assist Warren County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with upgrades and improvements for the historic Old Courthouse and grounds in Vicksburg................ $ 650,000.00 (xxxxxxxxx)  To assist the City of Gulfport, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the Interconnecting Gulfport project related to the federal BUILD grant route, to include Pool Street Extension, Creosote Road Extension, and Daniel Boulevard Extension $ 3,500,000.00 (yyyyyyyyy)  To assist Yazoo County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction and repairs of the Lake George Bridge........................................... $ 3,000,000.00 (zzzzzzzzz)  To assist Issaquena County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction and repairs of the Mannie Road Bridge........................................... $ 1,500,000.00 (aaaaaaaaaa)  To assist Sharkey County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction and repairs of the Low Water Bridge Road Bridge................................ $ 1,500,000.00 (bbbbbbbbbb)  To assist the Warren County Port Commission in defraying expenses for environmental and permit........................................... $ 500,000.00 (cccccccccc)  To assist Quitman County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements on county roads and bridges.......................................... $ 500,000.00 (dddddddddd)  To assist Perry County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the widening of Cochran Road...................................... $   600,000.00 (eeeeeeeeee)  To assist the City of Richland, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Highway 49 pedestrian crossover  $   500,000.00 (ffffffffff)  To assist the City of Pearl, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Pearl-Richland Intermodal Bridge $ 2,000,000.00 (gggggggggg)  To assist the Mississippi Department of Transportation in paying the costs associated with improvements to Highway 21 in Sebastopol, Mississippi.............. $ 400,000.00 (hhhhhhhhhh)  To assist the Town of Decatur, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with upgrading rescue extrication equipment................................................. $    60,000.00 (iiiiiiiiii)  To assist the City of Hernando, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements to the Oak Grove and Highway 51 intersection ................................................. $ 500,000.00 (jjjjjjjjjj)   To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi, in the refurbishment of Ballard Park for the purposes of renovation and to establish a special needs (all inclusive) children's playground. $   500,000.00 (kkkkkkkkkk)  To assist the City of Tupelo, Mississippi,  in paying costs associated with turnaround access at the Elvis Presley Birthplace........................................ $ 250,000.00 (llllllllll)  To assist the City of Saltillo, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements..... $   250,000.00 (mmmmmmmmmm)  To assist the City of Gluckstadt, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the acquisition of land and construction of a new police station........................... $ 1,000,000.00 (nnnnnnnnnn)  To assist the City of Ridgeland, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction of the Commerce Park Connector Road.................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (oooooooooo)  To assist the City of Ridgeland, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with road paving and improvements to city streets.......................................... $ 1,500,000.00 (pppppppppp)  To assist the City of Olive Branch, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvement on Pleasant Hill Road from SR 302 to Stateline Road............................................. $ 750,000.00 (qqqqqqqqqq)  To assist the Horn Lake Creek Basin Interceptor Sewer District in paying the costs associated with an infrastructure project.......................................... $10,000,000.00 (rrrrrrrrrr)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the EFLAP Bridge Replacement... $   500,000.00 (ssssssssss)  To assist Alcorn County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with infrastructure improvements at the Getwell Road and Harper Road Intersection...................... $   350,000.00 (tttttttttt)  To assist the Town of Blue Mountain, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with improvements to the Blue Mountain Children's Park................................... $ 150,000.00 (uuuuuuuuuu)  To assist the Town of Farmington, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with computer equipment upgrades for city hall............................................. $ 25,000.00 (vvvvvvvvvv)  To assist the City of Corinth, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Corinth Veterans Honor Memorial  $    25,000.00 (wwwwwwwwww)  To assist the University of Southern Mississippi in paying the costs associated with re-roofing the coliseum......................................... $ 500,000.00 (xxxxxxxxxx)  To assist Stone County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with road paving and improvements to county roads and bridges....................................... $ 500,000.00 (yyyyyyyyyy)  To assist the City of Greenville, Mississippi, in paying the costs of construction and development of the downtown green space associated with the new federal courthouse as part of the Thad Cochran Project................................... $ 500,000.00 (zzzzzzzzzz)  To assist the City of Greenville, Mississippi, in paying the costs of redevelopment of Hangar 173 at airport to assist the Mississippi Delta Community College (MDCC) Aerospace Maintenance Instruction Program............................... $ 1,500,000.00 (aaaaaaaaaaa)  To assist the City of Cleveland, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Airport Terminal Road Extension Project.......................................... $ 1,000,000.00 (bbbbbbbbbbb)  To assist Tishomingo County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a tornado siren and storm shelter at Carter's Branch Volunteer Fire Department................................... $    50,000.00 (ccccccccccc)  To assist the Town of Marietta, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with an infrastructure project $   165,000.00 (ddddddddddd)  To assist the Town of Mantachie, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with modernizing the town's police force  $   100,000.00 (eeeeeeeeeee)  To assist Tishomingo County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a roof replacement for the Circuit Courthouse........................................ $ 400,000.00 (fffffffffff)  To assist the City of Iuka, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and improvements to city streets................................................. $ 150,000.00 (ggggggggggg)  To assist the Yellow Creek Inland Port Authority in paying the costs associated with infrastructure and port improvement................................................. $ 1,500,000.00 (hhhhhhhhhhh)  To assist Pontotoc County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a Veteran's Service Center in Pontotoc................................................. $ 125,000.00 (iiiiiiiiiii)  To assist Pontotoc County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with improvements to the Fairgrounds/Exhibit Building Parking Project.......................... $   100,000.00 (jjjjjjjjjjj)  To assist the City of Calhoun City, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with paving and improvements to city streets.......................................... $ 200,000.00 (kkkkkkkkkkk)  To assist the Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Experience (The MAX) in paying the costs associated with upgrading exhibits......................................... $ 250,000.00 (lllllllllll)  To assist Yazoo County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with renovations at the Oakes African-American Cultural Center........................................... $ 100,000.00 (mmmmmmmmmmm)  To assist the City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the Pass Christian Downtown Redevelopment Initiative................. $ 750,000.00 (nnnnnnnnnnn)  To assist Clay County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the renovations of the county courthouse........................................ $ 350,000.00 (ooooooooooo)  To assist the City of West Point, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with road paving and improvements to city streets.......................................... $ 400,000.00 (ppppppppppp)  To assist the City of Macon, Mississippi, for reimbursement to the city for engineers, clean up of debris, and to stabilize exterior of Electric Department when surrounding buildings collapsed (local state of emergency)............... $    35,000.00 (qqqqqqqqqqq)  To assist the Pascagoula Redevelopment Authority in paying the costs associated with the downtown revitalization project................................................. $ 750,000.00 (rrrrrrrrrrr)  To assist the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction of an amphitheater  $    50,000.00 (sssssssssss)  To assist the City of Eupora, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with a walking trail..................................... $    10,000.00 (ttttttttttt)  To assist Lowndes County, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the construction, development, upgrades and improvements to the rail yard expansion at the West Bank Port, and other rail improvements in Lowndes County that provide otherwise support freight rail service to and from the West Bank Port $ 3,200,000.00 (uuuuuuuuuuu)  To assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with the widening, straightening and clearing debris from Eubanks Creek from State Street to Old Canton Road.. $   500,000.00 (vvvvvvvvvvv)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration in paying the costs associated with the development of the LeFleur's Bluff Otter Creek Golf Park and Connector Trail Project................................................. $13,250,000.00 (wwwwwwwwwww)  To assist the City of Vicksburg, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with the river front development $ 3,500,000.00 (xxxxxxxxxxx)  To assist the City of Pelahatchie, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with repairs and improvements to roads and bridges.......................................... $ 300,000.00 (yyyyyyyyyyy)  To assist the Marty Stuart Congress of Country Music Museum in paying the costs associated with the completion of the Ellis Theatre..................................... $ 500,000.00 (zzzzzzzzzzz)  To assist the City of Water Valley, Mississippi, in paying the costs associated with upgrades and improvements to the city-owned electrical system...................... $   500,000.00 (aaaaaaaaaaaa)  To assist the North Mississippi Health Services in paying the costs associated with the unfinished dedicated operating room for cesarean deliveries at the hospital in Amory, Mississippi, which room may be used as a negative pressure room ...... $ 1,000,000.00 (bbbbbbbbbbbb)  To assist the B.B. King Museum and Delta Interpretive Center in paying costs associated with renovations, repairs and improvements to the B.B. King Museum and Club Ebony........................................ $ 2,500,000.00 (cccccccccccc)  To assist the Department of Finance and Administration  Bureau of Building, Ground and Real Property Management for the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame and Museum in paying costs associated with renovations, repairs and improvements to the Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame............................... $ 2,500,000.00 (dddddddddddd)  To assist the Town of Macon, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with storm cleanup and emergency operation including storm debris removal.................... $    75,000.00 (eeeeeeeeeeee)  To assist Noxubee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with repair of the Veterans Building......................................... $ 25,000.00 (ffffffffffff)  To assist Noxubee County, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with road maintenance and repairs....................................... $   150,000.00 (gggggggggggg)  [Deleted] (hhhhhhhhhhhh)  To assist the Town of Vaiden, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with various infrastructure projects.... $   100,000.00 (iiiiiiiiiiii)  To assist the Town of McCool, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with various infrastructure projects.... $   100,000.00 (jjjjjjjjjjjj)  To assist the Tate County Heritage Museum in paying costs associated with acquisition and updating of exhibits and displays and repair, restoration, upgrades and improvements to equipment and facilities.................................... $    50,000.00 (kkkkkkkkkkkk)  To assist the Mississippi's Toughest Kids Foundation in paying the costs associated with: (i) Design, preplanning, construction, furnishing and equipping of buildings and related facilities at Camp Kamassa in Copiah County, Mississippi; and (ii) Design, preplanning, construction and development of infrastructure at Camp Kamassa in Copiah County, Mississippi....................................... $ 1,000,000.00 SECTION 61.  Section 41-26-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-26-14. (1)  The department shall develop and implement a cross connection control program in accordance with this section.  Before development of the cross connection control program, the department shall consult with the United States Environmental Protection Agency regarding the development of a federal cross connection control program.  It is the intent of the Legislature that any cross connection control program developed and implemented by the department be equivalent to a federal program, unless otherwise provided in this section. (2) (a)  The board shall adopt regulations defining a high hazard cross connection and a low hazard cross connection.  The board shall determine which low hazard cross connections pose a very low risk and therefore are below regulatory concern.  Those low hazard cross connections posing a very low risk shall be exempt from the requirements of this section and shall not be required to have a backflow preventer device.  In addition, the regulations shall specify those backflow preventer devices which are recommended to address both high hazard and low hazard cross connections. (b) For the purposes of this section, the following cross connections shall be considered as low hazard cross connections posing a very low risk: (i) Any lawn sprinkler system or lawn irrigation system that is connected to a public water system and was professionally installed, regardless of whether the system is underground or above ground or whether the system has pop-up sprinkler heads; (ii) Any swimming pool that is connected to a public water system and was professionally installed, or any swimming pool that is connected to a public water system and has a fill line with an anti-siphon air gap; (iii) Any water fountain or cooler that provides drinking water for human consumption, that is connected to a public water system and was professionally installed; (iv) Any fire sprinkler system that contains only water or a dry pipe and no chemicals, that is connected to a public water system and was professionally installed; and (v) Any commercial establishment that is connected to a public water system, that contains no cross connections directly with a dangerous or hazardous substance or material. (c) For the purposes of this section, any lawn sprinkler system or lawn irrigation system that is connected to a public water system and either injects or stores lawn chemicals or is connected to a wastewater supply shall be considered as high hazard cross connections and not exempt from the requirements of this section; however, the local public water system shall not be required to conduct an on-site inspection to identify any such system under this paragraph (c). (d) Any regulations that were adopted before April 12, 2001, to implement a cross connection control program shall be void to the extent those regulations are in conflict or inconsistent with this section. (3) Before December 31, 2000, each public water system shall develop and implement a cross connection control program and shall conduct a survey and on-site visits, as necessary, to locate cross connections within its system.  Single family dwellings and multifamily dwellings shall be excluded from the survey, unless the public water system has reason to believe a cross connection exists. (4) Before June 30, 2001, each property owner identified by the public water system as having a high hazard cross connection shall install a backflow preventer device.  If the property owner already has a backflow preventer device installed and the backflow preventer device functions properly, the public water system shall consider the backflow preventer device approved and shall allow the installed backflow preventer device to remain in place until the backflow preventer device fails to function properly.  Additional backflow preventer devices shall not be required for carbonated beverage dispensers if (a) the water supply connection to the carbonated beverage dispenser is protected against backflow by a backflow preventer device conforming to ASSE 1022 or by an air gap, and (b) the backflow preventer device and the piping downstream from the device are not affected by carbon dioxide gas. (5) Before June 30, 2004, each property owner identified by the public water system as having a low hazard cross connection shall install a backflow preventer device.  This requirement does not apply to any low hazard cross connection that poses a very low risk.  If the property owner already has a backflow preventer device installed and the backflow preventer device functions properly, the public water system shall consider the backflow preventer device approved and shall allow the installed backflow preventer device to remain in place until the backflow preventer device fails to function properly. (6) Each high hazard backflow preventer device shall be inspected and tested at least annually.  If a high hazard backflow preventer device fails to function properly, the property owner shall have the backflow preventer device repaired and retested or shall install a new approved backflow preventer device within thirty (30) days of the initial test.  If a low hazard backflow preventer device fails to function properly, the property owner shall have the backflow preventer device repaired or shall install a new backflow preventer device within ninety (90) days after the date the backflow preventer device first fails to function properly. (7) All inspection and testing of backflow preventer devices under this section shall be conducted by a certified tester, unless otherwise provided in the regulations of the board.  Certified backflow preventer device testers shall be licensed by the department under those conditions as the department deems appropriate. (8) If a property owner fails to install a backflow preventer device or fails to have a backflow preventer device tested as required by this section, the public water system may discontinue service to that property owner until the failure is corrected. (9) After the dates specified in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, it is unlawful to install or allow the installation or maintenance of any cross connection, auxiliary intake or bypass, unless the source and quality of water from the auxiliary supply, the method of connection and the use and operation of that cross connection, auxiliary intake or bypass has been approved by the director.  However, this subsection does not authorize the director to modify, supersede or suspend any provision of this section regarding backflow preventer devices. (10) (a)  A municipality, county or public water system shall not adopt or implement any ordinance, rule, regulation, standard or policy regarding cross connections or backflow preventer devices that is more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage or effect than the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section, or is in conflict or inconsistent with the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section.  Any such ordinance, rule, regulation, standard or policy regarding cross connections or backflow preventer devices that was adopted before April 12, 2001, is void to the extent that it is more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage or effect than the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section, or is in conflict or inconsistent with the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section. (b) If any municipality or county adopts or has previously adopted a building code, plumbing code or any other code that contains requirements or standards regarding cross connections or backflow preventer devices, the municipality or county or any public water system operating in the municipality or county shall not implement or enforce any such requirements or standards that are more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage or effect than the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section, or are in conflict or inconsistent with the provisions of this section or any rules or regulations adopted by the board to implement this section. SECTION 62.  Section 47-5-94, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 47-5-94. The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Board of Health are hereby authorized and directed, upon the passage of this section, to institute permanent annual structural and environmental inspections of institutional housing and service facilities at the State Penitentiary, such inspections to include, but not be limited to, structural soundness, repairs and maintenance of buildings; food service; fire and safety hazards; fresh water supply; wastewater system; sewage collection and treatment; solid waste collection, storage and disposal; rodent and pest control and general institutional housekeeping.  Beginning July 1, 2025, the Mississippi State Department of Health shall conduct an annual structural and environmental inspection of the infirmary at the State Penitentiary at Parchman and make a report thereon as required in this section. All other state agencies, authorities, boards, commissions and departments are hereby directed, upon the request of the Commissioner of Corrections, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the State Board of Health, to assist in such inspections with the fullest degree of reasonable cooperation. Within thirty (30) days of the completion of the inspections provided for herein, the participants shall compile a written report of their findings which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Commissioner of Corrections and the Warden or Superintendent of the State Penitentiary at Parchman. SECTION 63.  Section 49-17-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-29. (1)  (a)  Except as in compliance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person to cause pollution of the air in the state or to place or cause to be placed any wastes or other products or substances in a location where they are likely to cause pollution of the air.  It is also unlawful to discharge any wastes, products or substances into the air of the state which exceed standards of performance, hazardous air pollutant standards, other emission standards set by the commission, or which reduce the quality of the air below the air quality standards or increments established by the commission or prevent attainment or maintenance of those air quality standards. Any such action is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. (b) It is unlawful for any person to build, erect, alter, replace, use or operate any equipment which will cause the issuance of air contaminants unless that person holds a permit from the Permit Board (except repairs or maintenance of equipment for which a permit has been previously issued), or unless that person is exempted from holding a permit by a regulation promulgated by the commission.  Concentrated animal feeding operations may be a source or a category of sources exempted under this paragraph.  However, no new or existing applications relating to swine concentrated animal feeding operations within a county shall be exempted from regulations and ordinances which have been duly passed by the county's board of supervisors and which are in force on June 1, 1998. (2)  (a) Except as in compliance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person to cause pollution of any waters of the state or to place or cause to be placed any wastes in a location where they are likely to cause pollution of any waters of the state.  It is also unlawful to discharge any wastes into any waters of the state which reduce the quality of those waters below the water quality standards established by the commission; or to violate any applicable pretreatment standards or limitations, technology-based effluent limitations, toxic standards or any other limitations established by the commission.  Any such action is declared to be a public nuisance. (b) It is unlawful for any person to carry on any of the following activities, unless that person holds a current permit for that activity from the Permit Board as may be required for the disposal of all wastes which are or may be discharged into the waters of the state, or unless that person is exempted from holding a permit by a regulation promulgated by the commission: (i) the construction, installation, modification or operation of any disposal system or part thereof or any extension or addition thereto, including, but not limited to, systems serving agricultural operations; (ii) the increase in volume or strength of any wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified under any existing permit; (iii) the construction, installation or operation of any industrial, commercial or other establishment, including irrigation projects or any extension or modification thereof or addition thereto, the operation of which would cause an increase in the discharge of wastes into the waters of the state or would otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological properties of any waters of the state in any manner not already lawfully authorized; (iv) the construction or use of any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters of the state.  However, no new or existing applications relating to swine concentrated animal feeding operations within a county shall be exempted from regulations and ordinances which have been duly passed by the county's board of supervisors and which are in force on June 1, 1998. (3) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Permit Board created by Section 49-17-28 shall be the exclusive administrative body to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of air pollution control and water pollution control permits and permits required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17), and all other permits within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board.  After consideration of alternative waste treatment technologies available to control air and water pollution and odor, including appropriate siting criteria, the commission may promulgate regulations establishing conditions, limitations and exemptions under which the Permit Board shall make these decisions.  Regulations promulgated by the commission which establish exemptions as authorized under this section shall apply to any applicable facility in operation on the effective date of that regulation and to any applicable facility constructed or operated after the effective date of that regulation.  The Permit Board may issue multiple permits for the same facility or operation simultaneously or in the sequence that it deems appropriate consistent with the commission's regulations.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the Permit Board, under any conditions that the board may prescribe, may authorize the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation.  The executive director shall not be authorized to make decisions on permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation for a commercial hazardous waste management facility or a solid waste management permit for a municipal solid waste landfill or incinerator.  A decision by the executive director shall be a decision of the Permit Board and shall be subject to formal hearing and appeal as provided in this section.  The executive director shall report all permit decisions to the Permit Board at its next regularly scheduled meeting and those decisions shall be recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board.  The decisions of the Permit Board shall be recorded in minutes of the Permit Board and shall be kept separate and apart from the minutes of the commission.  The decision of the Permit Board or the executive director to issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke permits shall not be construed to be an order or other action of the commission. (b) The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall also be the Executive Director of the Permit Board and shall have available to him, as Executive Director of the Permit Board, all resources and personnel otherwise available to him as executive director of the department. (c) All persons required to obtain an air pollution control or water pollution control permit, a permit under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board shall make application for that permit with the Permit Board.  The Permit Board, under any regulations as the commission may prescribe, may require the submission of those plans, specifications and other information as it deems necessary to carry out Sections 49-17-1 through 49-17-43 and Title 17, Chapter 17, or to carry out the commission's regulations adopted under those sections. The Permit Board, based upon any information as it deems relevant, shall issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke air pollution control or water pollution control permit or permits required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within the jurisdiction of the Permit Board under any conditions as it deems necessary that are consistent with the commission's regulations.  The Permit Board's action of issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of a permit as recorded in its minutes shall constitute a complete decision of the board.  All permits issued by the Permit Board shall remain in full force and effect until the board makes a final determination regarding any reissuance, modification, or revocation thereof.  The Permit Board shall take action upon an application within one hundred eighty (180) days following its receipt in the board's principal office.  No action which affects revocation of an existing permit shall take effect until the thirty (30) days mentioned in paragraph (4)(b) of this section has expired or until a formal hearing as prescribed in that paragraph is held, whichever is later. (d) The Permit Board may adopt rules of practice and procedure governing its proceedings that are consistent with the commission's regulations.  All hearings in connection with permits  issued, reissued, denied, modified or revoked and all appeals from decisions of the Permit Board shall be as provided in this section. (e) Upon any conditions that are consistent with the commission's regulations and subject to those procedures for public notice and hearings as provided by law, not inconsistent with federal law and regulations, the Permit Board may issue general permits and, where appropriate, may consolidate multiple permits for the same facility or operation into a single permit. (f) The Permit Board shall not issue any permit for a new swine concentrated animal feeding operation or the expansion of an existing swine concentrated animal feeding operation before January 1, 2000, unless the department received the application for that operation's new or modified permit before February 28, 1998, or except as provided in this paragraph (f).  In issuing or modifying any permit for which the department received an application before February 28, 1998, the Permit Board shall apply those siting criteria adopted or used by the commission before February 28, 1998, unless federal law or regulations require more stringent criteria.  The moratorium established in this paragraph shall not apply to the issuance of any permit for a new swine concentrated animal feeding operation or the expansion of an existing swine concentrated animal feeding operation that uses an animal waste management system which the applicant demonstrates to the Permit Board is innovative in significantly reducing the effects of the operation on the public health, welfare or the environment and which is approved by the Permit Board.  The Permit Board shall not issue or modify more than five (5) permits under this innovative animal waste management system technology exemption to the moratorium. (g) Each applicant for a permit for a new outlet for the discharge of wastes into the waters of the state who is required to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission for such wastewater system shall submit financial and managerial information as required by the Public Utilities Staff.  Following review of that information, the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff shall certify in writing to the executive director of the department, the financial and managerial viability of the system if the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff determines the system is viable.  The Permit Board shall not issue the permit until the certification is received. (4)  (a) Except as required by this section, before the issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation of any air pollution control or water pollution control permit, permit required under the Solid Wastes Disposal Law of 1974 (Title 17, Chapter 17) or any other permit within its jurisdiction, the Permit Board, in its discretion, may hold a public hearing or meeting to obtain comments from the public on its proposed action. Before the issuance, reissuance, denial, modification pertaining to the expansion of a facility, transfer or revocation of a permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility or a solid waste management permit for a commercial municipal solid waste landfill or incinerator, the Permit Board shall conduct a public hearing or meeting to obtain comments from the public on the proposed action.  That hearing or meeting shall be informal in nature and conducted under those procedures as the Permit Board may deem appropriate consistent with the commission's regulations. (b) Within thirty (30) days after the date the Permit Board takes action upon permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation, as recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board, any interested party aggrieved by that action may file a written request for a formal hearing before the Permit Board.  An interested party is any person claiming an interest relating to the property or project which is the subject of the permit action, and who is so situated that the person may be affected by the disposition of that action. The Permit Board shall fix the time and place of the formal hearing and shall notify the permittee of that time and place. In conducting the formal hearing, the Permit Board shall have the same full powers as to subpoenaing witnesses, administering oaths, examining witnesses under oath and conducting the hearing, as is now vested by law in the Mississippi Public Service Commission, as to the hearings before it, with the additional power that the Executive Director of the Permit Board may issue all subpoenas at the instance of the Permit Board or at the instance of any interested party.  Any subpoenas shall be served by any lawful officer in any county to whom the subpoena is directed and return made thereon as provided by law, with the cost of service being paid by the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued.  Witnesses summoned to appear at the hearing shall be entitled to the same per diem and mileage as witnesses attending the circuit court and shall be paid by the person on whose behalf the witness was called.  Sufficient sureties for the cost of service of the subpoena and witness fees shall be filed with the Executive Director of the Permit Board at the time that issuance of the subpoena is requested.  At a hearing, any interested party may present witnesses and submit evidence and cross-examine witnesses. The Permit Board may designate a hearing officer to conduct the formal hearing on all or any part of the issues on behalf of the Permit Board.  The hearing officer shall prepare the record of the formal hearing conducted by that officer for the Permit Board and shall submit the record to the Permit Board. Upon conclusion of the formal hearing, the Permit Board shall enter in its minutes the board's decision affirming, modifying or reversing its prior decision to issue, reissue, deny, modify or revoke a permit.  The Permit Board shall prepare and record in its minutes findings of fact and conclusions of law supporting its decision.  That decision, as recorded in its minutes with its findings of fact and conclusions of law, shall be final unless an appeal, as provided in this section, is taken to chancery court within twenty (20) days following the date the decision is entered in the board's minutes. (c) Within twenty (20) days after the date the Permit Board takes action upon permit issuance, reissuance, denial, modification or revocation after a formal hearing under this subsection as recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board, any person aggrieved of that action may appeal the action as provided in subsection (5) of this section. (5)  (a) Appeals from any decision or action of the Permit Board shall be only to chancery court as provided in this subsection. (b) Any person who is aggrieved by any decision of the Permit Board issuing, reissuing, denying, revoking or modifying a permit after a formal hearing may appeal that decision within the period specified in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the chancery court of the county of the situs in whole or in part of the subject matter.  The appellant shall give a cost bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the state in the sum of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to be fixed by the Permit Board and to be filed with and approved by the Executive Director of the Permit Board, who shall forthwith certify the filing of the bond together with a certified copy of the record of the Permit Board in the matter to the chancery court to which the appeal is taken, which shall thereupon become the record of the cause.  An appeal to the chancery court as provided in this section shall not stay the decision of the Permit Board.  The aggrieved party may, within twenty (20) days following the date the board's decision after a formal hearing is entered on the board's minutes, petition the chancery court for an appeal with supersedeas and the chancellor shall grant a hearing on that petition. Upon good cause shown, the chancellor may grant that appeal with supersedeas. If granted, the appellant shall be required to post a bond with sufficient sureties according to law in an amount to be determined by the chancellor. Appeals shall be considered only upon the record as made before the Permit Board.  The chancery court shall always be deemed open for hearing of an appeal and the chancellor may hear the same in termtime or in vacation at any place in the chancellor's district, and the appeal shall have precedence over all civil cases, except election contests.  The chancery court shall review all questions of law and of fact.  If no prejudicial error is found, the matter shall be affirmed.  If prejudicial error is found the decision of the board shall be reversed and the chancery court shall remand the matter to the Permit Board for appropriate action as may be indicated or necessary under the circumstances. Appeals may be taken from the chancery court to the Supreme Court in the manner as now required by law, except that if a supersedeas is desired by the party appealing to the chancery court, that party may apply for a supersedeas to the chancellor of that court, who shall award a writ of supersedeas, without additional bond, if in the chancellor's judgment material damage is not likely to result thereby; but otherwise, the chancellor shall require a supersedeas bond as the chancellor deems proper, which shall be liable to the state for any damage. SECTION 64.  Section 49-17-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-83. For the purposes of Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed in this section: (a) "Administrator" means the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (b) "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality. (c) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality. (d) "Emergency fund" means the "Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund" created under Section 49-17-86. (e) "Loan agreement" means an agreement by and among the commission, a political subdivision and the State Tax Commission to evidence the terms and provisions of a loan under Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89. (f) "Loan fund" means the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Fund created pursuant to Section 49-17-61. (g) "Municipal security" means a bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a political subdivision to evidence a loan pursuant to the provisions of Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89. (h) "Political subdivision" means any county, municipality, utility, district, political subdivision, or other governmental unit created under state law. (i) "Project" means a publicly owned wastewater collection, treatment or disposal system including sludge disposal, renovation, repair and upgrading of existing systems, nonpoint source pollution control management programs and estuary conservation and management programs, and otherwise qualified under rules of the commission pursuant to the federal Water Quality Act of 1987. (j) "Revolving fund" means the Mississippi Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created under Section 49-17-85. (k) "State" means the State of Mississippi. SECTION 65.  Section 49-17-403, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-403. For the purposes of Sections 49-17-401 through 49-17-433, the following shall have the meaning ascribed in this section: (a) "Active site" means a site of an underground storage tank where an owner can be identified and where the tank is available for use in the management and handling of motor fuels, including tanks currently in service, tanks temporarily closed and tanks temporarily out of service. (b) "Bonded distributor" means any person holding a distributor's permit issued under either Section 27-55-7 or Section 27-55-507. (c) "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality. (d) "Contamination" means the presence or discharge of regulated substances in or on the land or in the waters of the state. (e) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality. (f) "Director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality. (g) "Groundwater" means water located beneath the land surface located wholly or partially within the boundaries of the state. (h) "Motor fuels" means gasoline and aviation gasoline as defined in Section 27-55-5 and special fuel as defined in Section 27-55-505, except for those "motor fuels" used in electric power generating plants for the commercial production of electricity. (i) "Operator" means any person in control of, or having responsibility for, the daily operation of an underground storage tank. (j) "Owner of an underground storage tank" means: (i) In the case of an underground storage tank in use on November 8, 1984, or brought into use after that date, any person who owns an underground storage tank used for the storage, use or dispensing of regulated substances; and (ii) In the case of an underground storage tank in use before November 8, 1984, but no longer in use on that date, any person who owned such tank immediately before the discontinuation of its use. (k) "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, federal agency, corporation, state municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state, any interstate body, a consortium, a joint venture, a commercial entity or the United States government. (l) "Regulated substance" means: (i) Any substance defined in Section 101(14) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, Public Law No. 96-510, as amended and extended (but not including any substance regulated as a hazardous waste under Section 17-17-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972);  and (ii) Petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure (sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit and fourteen and seven-tenths (14-7/10) pounds per square inch absolute). (m) "Release" means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching or disposing from an underground storage tank into groundwater, surface water or subsurface soils. (n) "Response action" means any activity, including evaluation, planning, design, engineering, construction and ancillary services, which is carried out in response to any discharge, release or threatened release of motor fuels. (o) "Response action contractor" means a person who has been approved by the commission and is carrying out any response action, including a person retained or hired by such person to provide services relating to a response action. (p) "Retailer" means any person other than a bonded distributor who sells motor fuel as defined in this section. (q) "Substantial compliance" means that an owner or operator of an underground storage tank has registered that tank with the department, and has made a good-faith effort to comply with the law; and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. (r) "Third-party claim" means any civil action brought or asserted by any person against any owner of any underground storage tank for damages to person or property which damages are the direct result of a release of motor fuels from an underground storage tank. (s) "Underground storage tank" means any one (1) or combination of containers including tanks, vessels, enclosures or structures together with appurtenances thereto used to contain an accumulation of regulated substances, and the volume of which, including the volume of the underground pipes connected thereto, is ten percent (10%) or more beneath the surface of the ground.  Such term does not include any: (i) Farm or residential tanks of one thousand one hundred (1,100) gallons or less capacity used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes; (ii) Tanks used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored; (iii) Septic tanks; (iv) Pipeline facilities (including gathering lines regulated under: 1. The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, Public Law No. 90-481, 49 USCS 1671-1684, as amended and extended, 2. The Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, Public Law No. 96-129, 49 USCS 2001 et seq., as amended and extended, or 3. An intrastate pipeline facility regulated under state laws comparable to the provisions of law in Clause 1 or 2 of this subparagraph); (v) Surface impoundments, pits, ponds or lagoons; (vi) Storm water or wastewater collection systems; (vii) Flow-through process tanks; (viii) Liquid traps or associated gathering lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operation; (ix) Storage tanks situated in an underground area such as a basement, cellar, mine working, drift, shaft or tunnel if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor; (x) Other tanks exempted by the Administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency; and (xi) Piping connected to any of the above exemptions. (t) "User" means any person who purchases or acquires motor fuels as defined in this section for consumption. SECTION 66.  Section 49-17-703, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-703. In the spirit of the report of the Governor's Commission on Recovery, Rebuilding and Renewal, the Legislature finds that there is a need for consolidation of water, wastewater and storm water services in order to reduce costs, promote resilience in the event of a disaster, improve the quality of the natural environment, and improve the planning and delivery of quality water, wastewater and storm water services within the areas of the Counties of George, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Pearl River and Stone.  It is further declared that there is the need for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water services in order to ensure protection of the waters of the state and to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens of the Gulf Coast Region.  The creation of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Act is determined to be necessary and essential to the accomplishment of these purposes.  To facilitate the purposes of the act, the Gulf Coast Region Utility Board, the George County Utility Authority, the Hancock County Utility Authority, the Harrison County Utility Authority, the Jackson County Utility Authority, the Pearl River County Utility Authority and the Stone County Utility Authority are created herein. SECTION 67.  Section 49-17-705, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-705. Words and phrases used in this act shall have meanings as follows: (a) "Act" means the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Act. (b) "Bonds" mean interim notes having a maturity of three (3) years or less, revenue bonds and other certificates of indebtedness of the authority issued under the provisions of this act. (c)  "County authority" means a county utility authority created in the Gulf Coast Region under this act. (d) "Fiscal year" means the period of time beginning on October 1 of each year and ending on September 30 of each year. (e) "Gulf Coast Region" means the areas encompassed by the Counties of George, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Pearl River and Stone. (f) "Municipality" means any incorporated city, town or village of the State of Mississippi, whether operating under general law or under special charter, lying wholly or partly within the Gulf Coast Region. (g) "Person" means the State of Mississippi, a county, a municipality, any public agency, or any other city, town, village or political subdivision or governmental agency, governmental instrumentality of the State of Mississippi or of the United States of America, or any private utility, individual, co-partnership, association, firm, trust, estate or any other entity whatsoever. (h) "Project" means the construction, development or acquisition by the county authority or county authorities of any infrastructure for water, wastewater and storm water systems or services and includes upgrading or repair of existing systems. (i) "Public agency" means any county, municipality, state board or commission owning or operating properties, district created pursuant to the general laws or local and private laws of the State of Mississippi, or other political subdivision of the State of Mississippi having the power to own and operate waterworks, water supply systems, sewerage systems, sewage treatment systems or other facilities or systems for the collection, transportation and treatment of water, wastewater and storm water. (j) "Storm water" means any flow occurring during or following any form of natural precipitation and resulting from that precipitation. (k) "System" or "systems" means any plants, structures, facilities and other real and personal property, used or useful in the generation, storage, transportation or supply of water, and the collection, transportation, treatment or disposal of wastewater and storm water, including, but not limited to, tanks, lakes, streams, ponds, pipes, trunk lines, mains, sewers, conduits, pipelines, pumping and ventilating stations, plants and works, connections and any other real and personal property and rights therein necessary, useful or convenient for the purposes of the utility board or authorities in connection therewith. (l) "Wastewater" means water being disposed of by any person and which is contaminated with waste or sewage, including industrial, municipal and any other wastewater that may cause impairment of the quality of the waters in the state. (m) "Water" means potable water, service water and groundwater. (n) "Utility board" means the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board. SECTION 68.  Section 49-17-739, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-739. The purpose of Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 is to confer certain powers on the county authorities for the purpose of cooperating with federal, state and local public agencies for the further development of local and regional water, wastewater and storm water services within the Gulf Coast Region.  In addition to the powers over water, wastewater and storm water, the Harrison County Utility Authority is granted power over solid waste within its jurisdiction. SECTION 69.  Section 49-17-743, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-743. From and after April 18, 2006, each and every county authority shall have, in addition to any other powers granted under any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) To acquire, construct, improve, enlarge, extend, repair, operate and maintain one or more of its systems used for the collection, transportation, treatment and disposal of water, wastewater and storm water; (b) To make contracts with any person in furtherance thereof; and to make contracts with any person, under the terms of which the county authority will collect, transport, treat or dispose of water, wastewater and storm water for such person; (c) To make contracts with any person to design and construct any water, wastewater and storm water systems or facilities, and thereafter to purchase, lease or sell, by installments over such terms as may be deemed desirable, reasonable and necessary, or otherwise, any such system or systems; (d) To enter into operating agreements with any person, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any water, wastewater and storm water systems; and the county authority may lease to or from any person, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any water, wastewater and storm water collection, transportation, treatment or its other facilities or systems.  Any such contract may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of materials to be handled by the respective system or systems and also may provide that the county authority shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract; (e) To enter into contracts with any person or any public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by this act, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized under this act upon such consideration as the board of directors and such person may agree.  Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary; may be upon such terms and for such consideration, nominal or otherwise, as the parties thereto shall agree; and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated.  Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms; (f) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure; (g) To sue and be sued, in its own name, and to enjoy all of the protections, immunities and benefits provided by the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, as it may be amended or supplemented from time to time; (h) To maintain office space at such place or places within the county authority boundaries as it may determine; (i) To invest money of the county authority, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds subject to any agreements with bondholders, on such terms and in such manner as the county authority deems proper; (j) To require the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines, and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided fair compensation is first paid to the owners or an agreement with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the property being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act; (k) To acquire, construct, improve or modify, to operate or cause to be operated and maintained, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, any water, wastewater or storm water system within the county authority's service area.  The county authority may pay all or part of the cost of any system from any contribution by persons, firms, public agencies or corporations.  The county authority may receive, accept and use all funds, public or private, and pay all costs of the development, implementation and maintenance as may be determined as necessary for any project; (l) To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on any terms and conditions and in any manner as it may deem proper, including by eminent domain, property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or easements therein, franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes; (m) To acquire insurance for the county authority's systems, facilities, buildings, treatment plants and all property, real or personal, to insure against all risks as any insurance may, from time to time, be available; (n) To use any property and rent or lease any property to or from others, including public agencies, or make contracts for the use of the property.  The county authority may sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage or grant a security interest for any property.  The powers to acquire, use and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use and dispose of any interest in that property, whether divided or undivided.  Title to any property of the county authority shall be held by the county authority exclusively for the benefit of the public; (o) To apply, contract for, accept, receive and administer gifts, grants, appropriations and donations of money, materials and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon any terms and conditions as the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality shall impose.  The county authority may administer trusts.  The county authority may sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate and pledge any and all of its property and assets; (p) To make and enforce, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws, rules, ordinances and regulations for the management of its business and affairs and for the construction, use, maintenance and operation of any of the systems under its management and control; (q) To employ and terminate staff and other personnel, including attorneys, engineers and consultants as may be necessary to the functioning of the county authority.  The board of directors, in its discretion, may employ an executive director having the authority to employ and fire employees and other duties as determined by the board; (r) To establish and maintain rates, fees and any other charges for services and the use of systems and facilities within the control of the county authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates, fees and any other charges to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining of the facilities and treatment systems and all of the persons' obligations under any contract or bonds resolution with respect thereto or any obligation of any person under any agreement, contract, indenture or bonds resolution with respect thereto.  Such rates, fees, assessments and any other charges shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Public Service Commission; (s) To adopt rules and regulations necessary to accomplish the purposes of the county authority and to assure the payment of each participating person or public agency of its proportionate share of the costs for use of any of the systems and facilities of the county authority and for the county authority's proportionate share of the costs of the utility board; (t) To enter on public or private lands, waters or premises for the purpose of making surveys, borings or soundings, or conducting tests, examinations or inspections for the purposes of the authority, subject to responsibility for any damage done to property entered; (u) To accept industrial wastewater from within the boundaries of the county authority for treatment and to require the pretreatment of same when, in the opinion of the county authority, such pretreatment is necessary; (v) To control and operate local retail water, wastewater and storm water services, and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same services in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area.  Any rates, fees, assessments or other charges shall not be under the control or regulation of the Mississippi Public Service Commission; (w) To assume control and administer, within the county authority's jurisdiction, any water, wastewater or storm water system or systems by agreement or contract with any person if the person providing such services requests to be relieved of that responsibility.  However, the person may maintain control over connections in their service areas and may charge rates, fees and any other charges in addition to the rates, fees and any charges of the county authority; (x) The county authority shall have the power of eminent domain for the particular purpose of the acquisition of property designated by plan to sufficiently accommodate the location of water, wastewater or storm water systems and such requirements related directly thereto pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The county authority may acquire by eminent domain property necessary for any system and the exercise of the powers, rights and duties conferred upon the county authority by this act.  No person owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production shall be prevented from exploring, developing or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting such interests on any lands or interest of the county authority held or used for the purposes of this act, but any such activities shall be subject to reasonable regulations by the board of directors that will adequately protect the systems or projects of the county authority; (y) To use any legally available funds to acquire, rebuild, operate and maintain any existing water, wastewater or storm water systems owned or operated by any person; (z) To refuse to receive water, wastewater or storm water from any public agency or person; and (aa) So long as any indebtedness on the systems of the county authority remains outstanding, to require by contract with a member public agency, or other person, that all water, wastewater and storm water within the boundaries of the respective county authority be disposed of through the appropriate treatment system to the extent that the same may be available, but no public agency shall be precluded from constructing, operating and maintaining its own such system after the current indebtedness owing on the system as of April 18, 2006, is paid in full. SECTION 70.  Section 49-17-747, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-747. (1)  Any public agency or person, pursuant to a duly adopted resolution of the governing body of such public agency or person, may enter into contracts with the county authority or county authorities under the terms of which the county authority will manage, operate and contract for usage of its systems and facilities, or other services, for such person or public agency. (2) Any public agency or person may enter into contracts with the county authority for the county authority to purchase or sell, by installments over such terms as may be deemed desirable, or otherwise, to any person or any systems.  Any public agency may sell, donate, convey, or otherwise dispose of water, wastewater and storm water facilities or systems; or any equipment, personal property or any other things, deemed necessary for the construction, operation, and maintenance to the county authority without the necessity of appraisal, advertising, or bidding.  This section creates an alternative method of disposal of public property. (3) Any public agency is authorized to enter into operating agreements with the county authority, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any of its systems of any person by the county authority or by any person contracting with the county authority to operate such systems. (4) Any public agency may lease to or from the county authority, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any of its systems. (5) Any municipality or county may donate office space, equipment, supplies and materials to the authority. (6) Any such contract may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of the material to be handled by the wastewater or storm water systems and may also provide that the county authority shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract.  Such contracts may obligate the public agency to make payments to the county authority or to a trustee in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable the county authority to defray the expenses of administering, operating and maintaining its respective systems, to pay interest and principal (whether at maturity upon redemption or otherwise) on bonds of the county authority, issued under this act and to fund reserves for debt service, for operation and maintenance and for renewals and replacements, to fulfill the requirements of any rate covenant with respect to debt service coverage contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to the bonds of the county authority issued under this act or to fulfill any other requirement relating to bonds issued pursuant to this act. (7) Any public agency shall have the power to enter into such contracts with the county authority as in the discretion of the governing body of the public agency would be in the best interest of the public agency.  Such contracts may include a pledge of the full faith and credit of such public agency and/or the avails of any special assessments made by such public agency against property receiving benefits, as now or hereafter are provided by law.  Any such contract may provide for the sale, or lease to, or use of by the county authority, of the systems or any part thereof, of the public agency; and may provide that the county authority shall operate its systems or any part thereof of the public agency; and may provide that any public agency shall have the right to continued use and/or priority use of the systems or any part thereof during the useful life thereof upon payment of reasonable charges therefor; and may contain provisions to assure equitable treatment of persons or public agencies who contract with the county authority under this act; and may contain such other provisions and requirements as the parties thereto may determine to be appropriate or necessary.  Such contracts may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, and may extend beyond the life of the respective systems or any part thereof or the term of the bonds sold with respect to such facilities or improvements thereto. (8) The obligations of a public agency arising under the terms of any contract referred to in this act, whether or not payable solely from a pledge of revenues, shall not be included within the indebtedness limitations of the public agency for purposes of any constitutional or statutory limitation or provision.  To the extent provided in such contract and to the extent such obligations of the public agency are payable wholly or in part from the revenues and other monies derived by the public agency from the operation of its systems or of its combined systems, or any part thereof, such obligations shall be treated as expenses of operating such systems. (9) Contracts referred to in this section may also provide for payments in the form of contributions to defray the cost of any purpose set forth in the contracts and as advances for the respective systems or any part thereof subject to repayment by the county authority.  A public agency may make such contributions or advances from its general fund or surplus fund or from special assessments or from any monies legally available therefor. (10) Payments made, or to be made, to the county authority by a public agency or other person under a contract for any of its treatment systems, or any part thereof, shall not be subject to approval or review by the Mississippi Public Service Commission. (11) Subject to the terms of a contract or contracts referred to in this act, the county authority is hereby authorized to do and perform any and all acts or things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out the purposes of such contracts, including the fixing, charging, collecting, maintaining and revising of rates, fees and other charges for the services rendered to any user of any of the systems operated or maintained by the county authority, whether or not such systems are owned by the county authority. (12) No provision of this act shall be construed to prohibit any public agency, otherwise permitted by law to issue bonds, from issuing bonds in the manner provided by law for the construction, renovation, repair or development of any of the county authority's systems, or any part thereof, owned or operated by such public agency. SECTION 71.  Section 49-17-751, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-751. (1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 77-3-21 and 77-3-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, the certificate of public convenience and necessity held by any municipality, public agency, district, public utility or other person authorized by law to provide water, sewer and wastewater services may be cancelled and its powers, duties and responsibilities transferred to the county authority in the manner provided by this section. (2) Any entity described in subsection (1) of this section desiring to have its certificate of public convenience and necessity cancelled and its powers, duties and responsibilities transferred to the county authority shall make a determination to that effect on its official minutes if a public entity, or by affidavit if not a public entity, and transmit such determination to the county authority. (3) Upon receipt of the document evidencing such determination from an entity to transfer its powers, duties and responsibilities to the county authority, the county authority shall, by resolution, declare whether it is willing and able to accept such transfer from the entity. (4) Upon completion of the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) herein and agreement by both parties to the transfer, the holder of the certificate of public convenience and necessity and the county authority shall jointly petition the Public Service Commission to cancel the certificate of public convenience and necessity.  The petition must be accompanied by copies of the official minutes, affidavit or resolution, as the case may be, reflecting the actions of the petitioners.  After review of the petition and any other evidence as the Public Service Commission deems necessary, the commission may issue an order cancelling the certificate and transferring to the county authority the powers, duties and responsibilities granted by the certificate, including all assets and debts of the transferor petitioner related to such certificated services, real or personal, or both, if it finds that: (a) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section have been complied with; and (b) Such action is in the public interest. (5) The county authority and providers of water, sewer, wastewater and storm water services that are not holders of a certificate of a public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission may enter into agreements for the provision of such services, including, but not limited to, the transfer to the county authority of such provider's powers, duties, responsibilities, assets and debts. SECTION 72.  Section 49-17-753, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-753. (1)  Any system of a municipality, public agency or person that becomes subject to the jurisdiction of a county authority and this act shall not impair, invalidate or abrogate any liens, bonds or other certificates of indebtedness related to water, storm water or wastewater facilities and systems incurred prior to becoming subject to the jurisdiction of the county authority. (2)  The county authority may do and perform any and all acts necessary, convenient or desirable to ensure the payment, redemption or satisfaction of such liens, bonds or other certificates of indebtedness. SECTION 73.  Section 49-19-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-19-35. As used in this section: (a) "Biomass" means bioenergy feedstocks from forest products manufacturing, including, without limitation: (i) Forest products manufacturing residuals, including, without limitation: 1. Pulping liquors; 2. Pulping byproducts; 3. Woody manufacturing residuals; 4. Paper recycling residuals; 5. Wastewater and processed water treatment plant residuals; and 6. Anaerobic digester biogas; (ii) Harvest residues, including, without limitation, trees or portions of harvested trees; (iii) Downed wood from extreme weather events or natural disasters; (iv) Nonhazardous landscape or right-of-way trimmings and municipal trimmings; (v) Plant material removed for purposes of invasive or noxious plant species control; (vi) Biowaste, including, without limitation, landfill gas; (vii) Forest biomass derived from residues created as a byproduct of timber harvesting; (viii) Forest management activities conducted for timber stand improvement or to increase yield, ecological restoration or to maintain or enhance forest health; (ix) Biomass materials described by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as fuels under 40 CFR Statute 241.1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2023; and (x) Other used wood products, including, without limitation, crates and pallets. (b) "Bioenergy with carbon capture and storage" means the process of capturing and permanently storing carbon dioxide from biomass energy generation. SECTION 74.  Section 51-8-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 51-8-1. (1)  Any two (2) or more local governmental units, being defined herein to mean a county or municipality, may create a joint water management district in the manner set forth in this chapter. (2) If any local governmental unit is located within an existing water management district, then the local governmental unit shall petition the district to provide a service or function needed by the petitioning unit, provided the service or function is one which the district has the power and authority to perform.  Upon receipt of the petition, the existing district shall have ninety (90) days within which to respond affirmatively to the petition, setting forth its intent to meet the need or perform the service or function and its proposal or plan for meeting the need or performing the service or function.  If the existing water district does not affirmatively respond in a timely fashion, then any two (2) or more local governmental units may create a joint water management district in the manner set forth in this chapter. (3) The joint water management district may include any geographic area within the boundaries of the interested governmental units. (4) A joint water management district may be created although adequate water supply, flood control, drainage or other water or wastewater management activities are being undertaken by one or more of the local governmental units interested in creating a joint water management district or by another corporate agency existing and operating within the geographical area of the joint water management district.  The term "corporate agency," as used herein, means any agency or subdivision of the state or federal government, any body politic and corporate created under the laws of this state, any utility, or any public or private profit or nonprofit corporation. SECTION 75.  Section 51-8-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 51-8-3. A joint water management district may be created for the purpose of establishing a water supply system, conserving water resources, developing additional water resources or any other water or wastewater management function not being performed by an existing water management district, except that such a district as described in Section 51-8-1 may not be created for the purpose of constructing, contracting for the construction of, or serving as a local sponsor for the construction of, any dam or other flood control facility or project, the primary purpose of which is to control flooding on any part of the Pearl River, Mississippi River, Yazoo River, Tombigbee River, Big Black River, Pearl River Pascagoula River, Tallahatchie River, Yalobusha River, Homochito River, Buffalo River, Leaf River, Coldwater River, Sunflower River, Little Sunflower River, Wolf River, Yockanookany River, Ofahoma River, Strong River, Bogue Chitto River, Amite River, Bayou Pierre River, Tangipahoa River, Noxubee River, Buttahatchee River, Chunky River, Biloxi River, Tippah River, Hatchie River, Jourdan River, Bowie River, Chickasawhay River and Escatawpa River. SECTION 76.  Section 51-39-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 51-39-7. (1)  (a)  Any single unit of local government or any combination of units of local government may create a district. (b) If any unit of local government is located within an existing district, then the unit of local government shall petition the district to provide a service or function needed by the petitioning unit, if the service or function is one which the district has the power and authority to perform.  Upon receipt of the petition, the district shall have ninety (90) days within which to respond affirmatively to the petition, setting forth its intent to meet the need or perform the service or function and its plan to meet the need or perform the service or function.  If the existing district does not affirmatively respond in a timely fashion, then the petitioning unit of local government may form a district as provided in this chapter. (c) The district may include any geographic area within the boundaries of any interested unit of local government. (d) A district may be formed although adequate water supply, flood control, drainage or other water or wastewater management activities are being undertaken by one or more of the units of local government interested in creating a district or by another public agency existing and operating within the geographical area of the district. (2) Creation of a district shall be initiated by ordinance or resolution duly adopted by the governing body of each unit of local government.  The ordinance or resolution shall state:  (a) the necessity for the proposed district; (b) the primary function of the proposed district; (c) the geographic boundaries of the proposed district within the jurisdiction of the unit of local government; (d) the names and geographic boundaries of any other units of local government proposing to be in the district; (e) the date upon which the governing body intends to create the district; (f) the estimated cost of projects to be conducted and maintained by the district; however the estimate shall not serve as a limitation upon the financing of any project or to invalidate any ordinance or resolution adopted under this section; (g) the name of a designated representative of the unit of local government to enter into an incorporation agreement with the other units of local government, if applicable; and (h) any other information reasonably necessary to inform the constituency of the unit of local government of the purpose and proposed obligations of the unit of local government and other units of local government, if applicable, proposing to create the district. (3) The governing body of the unit of local government may hold a public meeting or public hearing on the necessity for creation of the district.  The governing body shall provide notice in the manner provided under Section 51-39-9 of any public meeting or public hearing. SECTION 77.  Section 51-41-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-41-3.  As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (a) "Board" means the board of directors of the water authority. (b) "Bond" means any bond, promissory note, lease purchase agreement or other evidence of indebtedness of any nature along with all debt securing instruments of every nature related thereto. (c) "Indenture" means a mortgage, an indenture of mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, loan agreement, security agreement or trust indenture executed by the water authority as security for any bonds. (d) "Project" means any raw or potable water or wastewater intake, treatment, distribution, transmission, storage, pumping, well site, well field or other facility or system, or any combination of the foregoing, that has as its purpose the providing of raw or potable water to members of the public and commercial, industrial or other users or the treatment of wastewater, along with any and all other appurtenances, equipment, betterments or improvements related thereto.  The above projects may include any lands, or interest in any lands, deemed by the board to be desirable in connection with the projects, and necessary equipment for the proper functioning and operation of the buildings or facilities involved. (e) "Qualified corporation" means a not-for-profit corporation or association, or a for-profit entity formed solely for the purpose of complying with a federal or state order, which provides, distributes, transmits, treats, pumps or stores raw or potable water to or for the benefit of members of the general public and commercial, industrial and other users. (f) "United States" means the United States of America or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. (g) "State" means the State of Mississippi. (h) "Water authority" means that body politic and governmental entity organized under the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 78.  Section 57-75-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-75-9. (1)  The authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state in submitting a siting proposal for any project eligible for assistance under this act.  The authority is empowered to take all steps appropriate or necessary to effect the siting, development, and operation of the project within the state, including the negotiation of a fee-in-lieu.  If the state is selected as the preferred site for the project, the authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state and to represent the state in the planning, financing, development, construction and operation of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency.  The authority may take affirmative steps to coordinate fully all aspects of the submission of a siting proposal for the project and, if the state is selected as the preferred site, to coordinate fully, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, the development of the project or any facility related to the project with private business, the United States government and other public agencies.  All public agencies are encouraged to cooperate to the fullest extent possible to effectuate the duties of the authority; however, the development of the project or any facility related to the project by the authority may be done only with the concurrence of the affected public agency. (2) (a)  Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 or any facility related to the project shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if: (i) The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and (ii) The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding. (b) When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met: (i) The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and (ii) The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation. (c) The enterprise involved with the project may, upon approval of the authority, negotiate such contracts in the name of the authority. (d) The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and such contracts may be entered into pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (3) (a)  Contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts: (i) The authority shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority, but in no event less than one (1) business day, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority to receive specifications on a request for proposals on excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1. (ii) The authority shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii) Following the meeting the authority shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract. The decision of the authority concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final. (b) Contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, wastewater or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts: (i) The authority or the public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority or the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority or the public agency to receive specifications on the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii). (ii) The authority or the public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii) Following the meeting the authority or the public agency shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract.  The decision of the authority or the public agency concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final. (c)  Contracts by a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) may be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of contracts: (i) The public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the public agency to receive specifications on site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works related to the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii). (ii) The public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii) Following the meeting the public agency shall, in its discretion, which discretion may include participation by an enterprise involved in the project, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract.  The decision of the public agency concerning selection of the contractor shall be final. (4) (a)  Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), and any contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for other public facilities related to any such project shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if: (i) The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and (ii) The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding. (b) When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met: (i) The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and (ii) The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation with the authority or such public agency, and the authority or such public agency may, as part of such negotiations, further negotiate and require the level of participation by the enterprise involved in the project in the negotiation of such contracts. (c) Contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for other public facilities related to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii), shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 65-1-85, and the authority or public agency is authorized to use any method for design and/or construction procurement and contracting.  With respect to any such contract that is anticipated to be federally funded, in whole or in part, the authority or public agency may nonetheless comply with the provisions of Section 65-1-85 for purposes of compliance with any applicable federal funding requirements. (d) The decision of the authority or the public agency concerning selection of the contractor shall be final. (e) The company shall make commercially reasonable efforts to place out for bid, such that Mississippi Contractors and Mississippi Disadvantaged Business Enterprises ("DBEs") shall have an equal opportunity to respond to such bid, any contract by the company which (i) is subject to tax pursuant to Mississippi Code Section 27-65-21 (i.e., contracts for constructing, building, erecting, grading, excavating, etc.), and (ii) will be paid, or payment thereunder by the company will be reimbursed, using any portion of the grant proceeds or funds provided by the authority to the company in accordance with this agreement.  In carrying out such efforts, in order to increase the pool of qualified DBE bidders, the company will request that successful prime contract bidders include in their response a commitment to (a) participate in and/or host forums that highlight subcontract bidding opportunities for DBEs; and (b) work with various trade associations and the Mississippi Development Authority to promote increased participation from DBEs.  With respect to awarding any contract placed out for bid, the company shall be allowed to award such contract in the company's sole discretion (e.g., based upon optimization of quality, cost and efficiency or on any other basis as the company may see fit).  MDA agrees that it will offer to eligible contractor DBEs that have an opportunity to work on the project assistance through its Minority Surety Bond Guaranty Program. (5) The Department of Employment Security is authorized to provide to the authority any information received, obtained or produced, or findings or determinations made thereby, with respect to any jobs created or maintained for a project that has been certified by the authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f). SECTION 79.  Section 57-75-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-75-11. The authority, in addition to any and all powers now or hereafter granted to it, is empowered and shall exercise discretion and the use of these powers depending on the circumstances of the project or projects: (a) To maintain an office at a place or places within the state. (b) To employ or contract with architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts and such other advisors, consultants and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix and pay their compensation. (c) To make such applications and enter into such contracts for financial assistance as may be appropriate under applicable federal or state law. (d) To apply for, accept and utilize grants, gifts and other funds or aid from any source for any purpose contemplated by the act, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this act, with the terms and conditions thereof. (e) (i)  To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or in other manner, including quick-take eminent domain, or obtain options to acquire, and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey any and all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project.  The provisions of this paragraph that allow the acquisition of property by quick-take eminent domain shall be repealed by operation of law on July 1, 1994; and (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (e), from and after November 6, 2000, to exercise the right of immediate possession pursuant to the provisions of Sections 11-27-81 through 11-27-89 for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way in the county in which a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 is located, that are necessary for such project or any facility related to the project. (f) To acquire by purchase or lease any public lands and public property, including sixteenth section lands and lieu lands, within the project area, which are necessary for the project.  Sixteenth section lands or lieu lands acquired under this act shall be deemed to be acquired for the purposes of industrial development thereon and such acquisition will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this act. (g) If the authority identifies any land owned by the state as being necessary, for the location or use of the project, or any facility related to the project, to recommend to the Legislature the conveyance of such land or any interest therein, as the Legislature deems appropriate. (h) To make or cause to be made such examinations and surveys as may be necessary to the planning, design, construction and operation of the project. (i) From and after the date of notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site of the project, to acquire by condemnation and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey or otherwise dispose of any and all property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, and the exercise of the powers granted by this act, according to the procedures provided by Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, except as modified by this act. (i) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (i), in acquiring lands by condemnation, the authority shall not acquire minerals or royalties in minerals unless a competent registered professional engineer shall have certified that the acquisition of such minerals and royalties in minerals is necessary for purposes of the project; provided that limestone, clay, chalk, sand and gravel shall not be considered as minerals for the purposes of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (i); (ii) Unless minerals or royalties in minerals have been acquired by condemnation or otherwise, no person or persons owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production of minerals shall be prevented from exploring, developing, or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting interests on any land or interest therein of the authority held or used for the purposes of this act; but any such activities shall be under such reasonable regulation by the authority as will adequately protect the project contemplated by this act as provided in paragraph (r) of this section; and (iii) In acquiring lands by condemnation, including the exercise of immediate possession, for a project, as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, the authority may acquire minerals or royalties in minerals. (j) To negotiate the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is paid to the owners thereof or agreement is had with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire by condemnation or otherwise easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the facilities being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act. (k) To negotiate the necessary relocation of graves and cemeteries and to pay all reasonable costs thereof. (l) To perform or have performed any and all acts and make all payments necessary to comply with all applicable federal laws, rules or regulations including, but not limited to, the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 USCS 4601, 4602, 4621 to 4638, and 4651 to 4655) and relocation rules and regulations promulgated by any agency or department of the federal government. (m) To construct, extend, improve, maintain, and reconstruct, to cause to be constructed, extended, improved, maintained, and reconstructed, and to use and operate any and all components of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, within the project area, necessary to the project and to the exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges granted the authority. (n) To incur or defray any designated portion of the cost of any component of the project or any facility related to the project acquired or constructed by any public agency. (o) (i)  To lease, sell or convey any or all property acquired by the authority under the provisions of this act to the enterprise, its successors or assigns, and/or any entity for purposes in furtherance of economic development as determined by the authority, and in connection therewith to pay the costs of title search, perfection of title, title insurance and recording fees as may be required.  The authority may provide in the instrument conveying such property a provision that such property shall revert to the authority if, as and when the property is declared by the transferee to be no longer needed. (ii) To lease, sell, transfer or convey on any terms agreed upon by the authority any or all real and personal property, improvements, leases, funds and contractual obligations of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi) and conveyed to the State of Mississippi by a Quitclaim Deed from the United States of America dated February 23, 1996, filed of record at pages 511 to 524, Deed Book Number B179, Chancery Clerk's Office, Tishomingo County, Mississippi, to any governmental authority located within the geographic boundaries of the county wherein such project exists upon agreement of such governmental authority to undertake and assume from the State of Mississippi all obligations and responsibilities in connection with ownership and operation of the project.  Property leased, sold, transferred or otherwise conveyed by the authority under this paragraph (o) shall be used only for economic development purposes. (p) To enter into contracts with any person or public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by Section 57-75-17, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this act upon such consideration as the authority and such person or public agency may agree.  Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, may be upon such terms as the parties thereto shall agree, and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated.  Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms.  Such contracts may include an agreement to reimburse the enterprise, its successors and assigns for any assistance provided by the enterprise in the acquisition of real property for the project or any facility related to the project. (q) To establish and maintain reasonable rates and charges for the use of any facility within the project area owned or operated by the authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates and to impose penalties for failure to pay such rates and charges when due. (r) To adopt and enforce with the concurrence of the affected public agency all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations to carry out and effectuate the implementation of the project and any land use plan or zoning classification adopted for the project area, including, but not limited to, rules, regulations, and restrictions concerning mining, construction, excavation or any other activity the occurrence of which may endanger the structure or operation of the project.  Such rules may be enforced within the project area and without the project area as necessary to protect the structure and operation of the project.  The authority is authorized to plan or replan, zone or rezone, and make exceptions to any regulations, whether local or state, with the concurrence of the affected public agency which are inconsistent with the design, planning, construction or operation of the project and facilities related to the project. (s) To plan, design, coordinate and implement measures and programs to mitigate impacts on the natural environment caused by the project or any facility related to the project. (t) To develop plans for technology transfer activities to ensure private sector conduits for exchange of information, technology and expertise related to the project to generate opportunities for commercial development within the state. (u) To consult with the State Department of Education and other public agencies for the purpose of improving public schools and curricula within the project area. (v) To consult with the State Board of Health and other public agencies for the purpose of improving medical centers, hospitals and public health centers in order to provide appropriate health care facilities within the project area. (w) To consult with the Office of Minority Business Enterprise Development and other public agencies for the purpose of developing plans for technical assistance and loan programs to maximize the economic impact related to the project for minority business enterprises within the State of Mississippi. (x) To deposit into the "Yellow Creek Project Area Fund" created pursuant to Section 57-75-31: (i) Any funds or aid received as authorized in this section for the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi), and (ii) Any funds received from the sale or lease of property from the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi) pursuant to the powers exercised under this section. (y) To manage and develop the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi). (z) To promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. (aa) To negotiate a fee-in-lieu with the owners of the project. (bb) To enter into contractual agreements to warrant any site work for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of such warranties shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00). (cc) To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 in an amount not to exceed Thirty-nine Million Dollars ($39,000,000.00). (dd) (i)  To own surface water transmission lines constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this act and in connection therewith to purchase and provide water to any project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) and to certificated water providers; and (ii) To lease such surface water transmission lines to a public agency or public utility to provide water to such project and to certificated water providers. (ee) To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v) or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for job training, recruiting and infrastructure. (ff) To enter into negotiations with persons proposing projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xi) and execute acquisition options and conduct planning, design and environmental impact studies with regard to such project. (gg) To establish such guidelines, rules and regulations as the authority may deem necessary and appropriate from time to time in its sole discretion, to promote the purposes of this act. (hh) In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii): (i) To provide grant funds or loans to a public agency or an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(b); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii) To requisition money in the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Revolving Loan Fund in connection with such loans. (ii) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv): (i) To provide grant funds or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv); however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, shall, in the sole discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (jj) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii): (i) To provide grant funds of Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) to be used for real estate improvements and which may be disbursed as determined by the authority; (ii) To provide loans to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) or make payments to a lender providing financing to the enterprise; subject to the following provisions: 1. Not more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise for the purpose of defraying costs incurred by the enterprise for site preparation and real property improvements during the construction of the project in excess of budgeted costs; however, the amount of any such loan shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of such excess costs; 2. Not more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise or paid to a lender providing financing to the enterprise for purposes determined appropriate by the authority, and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the loan or payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(p); however, no such loan or payment may be made before the beginning of the fifth year after issuance by the enterprise of debt in like amount the proceeds of which are to be used in connection with the project; (iii) To supervise the use of all such loan funds; (iv) Loans under this paragraph (jj) may be for any term determined appropriate by the authority provided that the payments on any loan must be in an amount sufficient to pay the state's debt service on bonds issued for the purpose of providing funds for such a loan; and (v) The repayment obligation of the enterprise for any loan or payment authorized under this paragraph (jj) shall, in the discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (kk) In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or a facility related to such a project: (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, Itawamba Community College, Northeast Mississippi Community College, and/or East Mississippi Community College, public or private nonprofits or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(s); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed; and (iii) To enter into contractual agreements to warrant site preparation and availability for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi). (ll) In connection with a project related to a Tier One supplier: (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, public or private nonprofits and Tier One suppliers for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(t); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (mm) In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) or a facility related to such a project: (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, fire protection, wastewater, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(u); and (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (nn) It is the policy of the authority and the authority is authorized to accommodate and support any enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxi), 57-75-5(f)(xxii), 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxix), 57-75-5(f)(xxx), 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), or an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx), that wishes to have a program of diversity in contracting, and/or that wishes to do business with or cause its prime contractor to do business with Mississippi companies, including those companies that are small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.  The term "socially and economically disadvantaged individuals" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; except that women shall be presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged individuals for the purposes of this paragraph. (oo) To provide grant funds to an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) for reimbursement of costs incurred by such enterprise for infrastructure improvements in the initial phase of development of the project, upon dedication of such improvements to the appropriate public agency. (pp) In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii) for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(v); and (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (qq) (i)  To provide grant funds for the expansion of a publicly owned building for the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) for the purchase and/or relocation of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority; however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed ten (10) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear a rate of interest to be determined by the authority, and shall be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (rr) (i)  To provide grant funds to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxv) for reimbursement of costs incurred by the enterprise in reconfiguring the manufacturing plant and for the purchase of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority; (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds. (ss) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi): (i) To provide grant funds and/or loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project; (ii) To provide loan guarantees in an amount not to exceed the total cost of the project for which financing is sought or Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00), whichever is less, for the purpose of encouraging the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to the enterprise owning or operating the project; (iii) In connection with any loan guarantee made pursuant to this paragraph, to make payments to lenders providing financing to the enterprise owning or operating the project and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(y); (iv) To supervise the use of all such grant funds, loan funds or payments; and (v) To require the enterprise owning or operating the project to provide security for the repayment obligation for any loan guarantee authorized under this paragraph in an amount and in a manner as may be determined by the authority. (tt) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii): (i) To provide loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building and acquisition of equipment to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project; and (ii) To supervise the use of all such loan funds. (uu) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchase and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(aa); (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (vv) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb); (ii) To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb); (iii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed and/or loans so made; and (iv) To the extent that the authority enters into any construction or similar contract for site preparation work or for the construction of any improvements on a project site, to assign or otherwise transfer to an enterprise or affiliate thereof that owns or operates such a project on such project site any and all contractual, express or implied warranties of any kind arising from such contract or work performed or materials purchased in connection therewith, and cause any such contract to contain terms and provisions designating such enterprise as a third-party beneficiary under the contract. (ww) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for public infrastructure needs, site preparation, building improvements, purchase of launch systems, recruitment of employees to fill new full-time jobs, providing internal company training and train prospective, new and existing employees of the enterprise associated with the project, including training of company employees who will utilize such instruction to teach other prospective, new and existing employees of the company and other workforce expenses and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(cc); and (ii) To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (xx) In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(dd); (ii) To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(dd). (yy) (i)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), the authority is further authorized to provide to the enterprises operating one or more of the projects, an annual grant in an amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the additional payroll for a period of ten (10) consecutive years.  Each such aggregate annual grant amount shall be remitted to one or more of the enterprises and/or one or more of their affiliates, in such sub-amounts as the enterprises shall collectively direct, or that their common direct or indirect parent company shall direct, in writing, to the authority each year during such ten-year period.  The ten-year period for the series of ten (10) annual grants authorized by this paragraph (yy) shall commence no later than January 1, 2029. (ii) In the event that the annual number of full-time jobs maintained or caused to be maintained by the enterprises operating one or more projects and/or one or more affiliates thereof falls below the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and the enterprises and/or any affiliate thereof for one or more years, the annual grant authorized by this paragraph (yy) may be reduced or suspended by the authority until the first calendar year during which the annual number of full-time jobs maintained or caused to be maintained by the enterprises and/or their affiliates reaches the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to the written agreement. (iii) The annual grants authorized by this paragraph (yy) may be funded from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(dd); provided that the aggregate amount of the annual grants over the entire ten-year period shall not exceed Forty-five Million Dollars ($45,000,000.00). (iv) For purposes of this paragraph (yy): 1. "Additional payroll" shall mean the sum of the annual payroll amount (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation) for any calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, which is associated with full-time jobs created and maintained by all enterprises that undertake any project and/or by any affiliates thereof, in excess of the amount the annualized payroll (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation), which is associated with employees employed in the State of Mississippi by such enterprises or their affiliates as of September 30, 2022; and 2. "Base payroll level" shall mean the annualized payroll amount (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation) paid to employees employed in the State of Mississippi by all enterprises that undertake any project and/or by any affiliates thereof during the twelve-month period ending on September 30, 2022. (v) The Mississippi Development Authority may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this paragraph (yy) and may otherwise administer and prescribe rules and restrictions with respect to the annual grant authorized by this paragraph (yy) pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and any enterprises operating one or more projects and/or any affiliate thereof. (zz) In connection with a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ee); (ii) To provide loans, grants and other funds to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ee). (aaa) In connection with a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii): (i) To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ff); and (ii) To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ff). (aab) (i)  In addition to any other requirements or conditions under this chapter, the authority shall require that any application required by the authority for assistance regarding a project under this chapter include, at a minimum: 1. A two-year business plan (which shall include pro forma balance sheets, income statements and monthly cash flow statements); 2. Financial statements or tax returns for the three (3) years immediately prior to the application (if the project is a new company or enterprise, personal financial statements or tax returns will be required); 3. Credit reports on all persons or entities with a twenty percent (20%) or greater interest in the project; 4. Data supporting the expertise of the project's principals; 5. A cost-benefit analysis of the project performed by a state institution of higher learning or other entity selected by the authority; and 6. Any other information required by the authority. (ii) The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1. The applicable minimum requirements of this chapter and such other requirements as the authority considers proper shall be met; and 2. If the agreed upon commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided under this chapter as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (iii) Where appropriate, in the discretion of the authority, the authority shall acquire a security interest in or other lien upon any applicable collateral. (iv) The provisions of this paragraph (xx) shall not apply to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii). SECTION 80.  Section 57-75-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-75-37.  (1)  (a)  (i)  Any county in which there is to be constructed a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) is authorized to assist in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing such project by: 1. Contributing a sum of up to Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) to such enterprise for use in connection with the construction of the project; and/or 2. Lending a sum of up to Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) upon such terms as the board of supervisors of such county and such enterprise may agree, the proceeds of which loan shall be used by such enterprise in connection with the construction or financing of the project. (ii) In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection (1), any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds, or any combination of the foregoing.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or Section 19-5-99. (b) The board of supervisors of any county may donate real property for use in the location, construction and/or operation of a project as defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) to one or more economic development authorities, economic development districts, industrial development authorities or similar public agencies created pursuant to state law that engage in economic or industrial development in the county, and any such public agencies may accept such donation of real property from the county.  Such public agencies also may transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, real property to be used in the location, construction and/or operation of such a project, and may accept such transfers or donations. (2) Any county or municipality in which there is to be constructed a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi) or 57-75-5(f)(xxvii) is authorized to: (a) Acquire the site for such project and contribute the site to the enterprise owning or operating the project; (b) Apply for grants and loans and utilize the proceeds of such grants and loans for infrastructure related to the project; and (c) Enter into a lease agreement with the enterprise owning or operating the project for a term not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years. (3) (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Project" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii). (ii) "Public agency" means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority or similar public agency created pursuant to state law that engages in economic or industrial development in the county or a municipality in the county. (b) Any county in which there is to be located a project is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.  The county may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the board of supervisors of the county, upon such terms as the board of supervisors may agree, to the entity that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project. (c) In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds, or any combination of the foregoing.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or Section 19-5-99. (d) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authorities of any public agency may: (i) Transfer and convey to the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and the authority and the Mississippi Development Authority may accept such transfers or donations; (ii) Transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; and (iii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to one another for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds. (e) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the person, entity or other agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the person, agency or other entity seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property. (4) (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Project" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix). (ii) "Public agency" means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority or similar public agency created pursuant to state law that engages in economic or industrial development in the county or a municipality in the county. (iii) "Board of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (iv) "Superintendent of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (b) In any county in which there is to be located a project, any public agency is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and/or any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.  Any such public agency may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the governing authority of such public agency, upon such terms as the governing authority of such public agency may agree, to the entity or public agency that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, including, without limitation, to defray the costs of site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training, as well as planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other expenses approved by any such public agency. (c) In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection: (i) Any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 19-5-99 or in any other manner permitted by any local and private law or other general laws; and (ii) Any public agency may borrow or accept grants of such amounts from the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority for such duration and upon such terms and conditions approved by the governing authority of such public agency and the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable. (d) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of any public agency may: (i) Transfer and convey to the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and the authority and the Mississippi Development Authority may accept such transfers or donations; (ii) Transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; (iii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to: 1. One another for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds; and/or 2. A local water association incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and located within such county for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred thereby in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including an elevated water tank, located within the project area; and (iv) Make one or more periodic grants or other contributions of funds to an enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating a project in such amount or amounts approved by such governing authority, and enter into an agreement with such enterprise to make such periodic grants or other contributions of funds; however, the duration of any such obligation of the public agency to make such grants or other contributions shall not exceed thirty (30) years. (e) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the public agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the public agency seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property, and any such public agency is further authorized to procure an option to purchase any such real property for such purchase price authorized by this subsection for the lowest option payment at which the owner of the property is willing to grant such option. (f) In any county in which there is to be located a project, upon the sale of any sixteenth section lands for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the board of education controlling such lands, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority, on behalf of the state, may sell and convey all minerals in, on and under any such lands for such consideration determined to be adequate by, and upon such terms and conditions prescribed by, such board of education, superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority. (g) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of the applicable public agency may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities, for any period not to exceed thirty (30) years to: (i) Waive any and all fees and expenses associated with building permits and privilege licenses required for the project; (ii) Establish and/or maintain a rate structure for water supplied to the project and wastewater received from the project, which shall be no higher than the lowest tariff prices for such water and wastewater charged to any customer of equal or lesser volume located within the boundaries of the public agency; (iii) Provide firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance to the enterprise owning or operating the project; and (iv) Require any contractor hired by the public agency for purposes of entering onto the project site for such project to perform work-related to the provision of water supply or wastewater services, to procure customary liability insurance designating the enterprise owning or operating the project as an additional insured and to contractually indemnify such enterprise for any losses incurred by the enterprise as a result of such contractor's negligence and/or willful acts or omissions arising from the contractor's entry upon such project site. (5) (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Project" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi). (ii) "Public agency" means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority, port authority or airport authority or similar public agency created pursuant to state law. (iii) "Board of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (iv) "Superintendent of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (b) In any county in which there is to be located a project, any public agency is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and/or any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.  Any such public agency may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the governing authority of such public agency, upon such terms as the governing authority of such public agency may agree, to the entity or public agency that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, including, without limitation, to defray the costs of site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training, as well as planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other expenses approved by any such public agency. (c) In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection: (i) Any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 19-5-99 or in any other manner permitted by any local and private law or other general laws; and (ii) Any public agency may borrow or accept grants of such amounts from the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority for such duration and upon such terms and conditions approved by the governing authority of such public agency and the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable. (d) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authorities of public agencies may: (i) Transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; (ii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to one another for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds; and (iii) Make one or more grants or other contributions of funds to an enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating a project in such amount or amounts approved by such governing authority, and enter into an agreement with such enterprise to make such grants or other contributions of funds; however, the duration of any such obligation of the public agency to make such grants or other contributions shall not exceed thirty (30) years. (e) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the public agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the public agency seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property, and any such public agency is further authorized to procure an option to purchase any such real property for such purchase price authorized by this subsection for the lowest option payment at which the owner of the property is willing to grant such option. (f) In any county in which there is to be located a project, upon the sale of land owned by an industrial development authority, port authority or airport authority for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the governing authorities controlling such lands may sell and convey all minerals in, on and under any such lands for such consideration determined to be adequate by, and upon such terms and conditions prescribed by, such governing authority or may otherwise enter into a written agreement with the enterprise owning and/or operating such project pursuant to which such governing authority of the industrial development authority, port authority or airport authority, as the case may be, may agree to perpetually refrain from using the surface of such land upon which the project is located to access any minerals located thereunder in which such public agency has a retained ownership interest.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future governing authorities. (g) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of the applicable public agency may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities, for any period not to exceed thirty (30) years to: (i) Waive any and all fees and expenses associated with building permits and privilege licenses required for the project; (ii) Establish and/or maintain a rate structure for water supplied to the project and wastewater received from the project, which shall be no higher than the lowest tariff prices for such water and wastewater charged to any customer of equal or lesser volume located within the boundaries of the public agency; and (iii) Require any contractor hired by the public agency for purposes of entering onto the project site for such project to perform work related to the provision of water supply or wastewater services, to procure customary liability insurance designating the enterprise owning or operating the project as an additional insured and to contractually indemnify such enterprise for any losses incurred by the enterprise as a result of such contractor's negligence and/or willful acts or omissions arising from the contractor's entry upon such project site. (6)  (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Project" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii). (ii) "Public agency" means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority, port authority, airport authority, public utility or similar public agency created pursuant to state law. (b) In any county in which there is to be located a project, any public agency is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and/or any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.  Any such public agency may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the governing authority of such public agency, upon such terms as the governing authority of such public agency may agree, to the entity or public agency that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, including, without limitation, to defray the costs of site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training, as well as planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other expenses approved by any such public agency.  Any such public agency may alternatively provide such assistance by undertaking the acquisition of real and/or personal property, or interests therein, with respect to, and the design, engineering, construction and installation of, any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project regardless of whether it is authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom following the completion thereof; provided that, if the public agency is authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure following the completion thereof, such public agency may transfer, and if the public agency is not authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom following the completion thereof, the public agency shall transfer, such facilities or public infrastructure to another public agency that is authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom. (c) In order to provide the amounts or otherwise perform any permitted actions set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection: (i) Any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds or other indebtedness permitted by any local and private law or other general laws.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 19-5-99 or in any other manner permitted by any local and private law or other general laws; and (ii) Any public agency may borrow or accept grants or other funds of such amounts from the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority for such duration and upon such terms and conditions approved by the governing authority of such public agency and the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable. (iii) Any such county may enter into one or more agreements with the authority or Mississippi Development Authority approved by the board of supervisors of the county and, as applicable, to remit to the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, on an annual or other periodic basis for a duration up to thirty (30) years, a portion of any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, together with a portion of any county ad valorem taxes, derived from the project.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future boards of supervisors of the county. (d) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authorities of public agencies may: (i) Transfer and convey among themselves, or to the authority, the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Department of Transportation or any other state agency, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; (ii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to any public agency and/or any local water association incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and located within such county for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred thereby in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, and/or undertake the acquisition of real and/or personal property, or interests therein, with respect to, and the design, engineering, construction and installation of, any water or wastewater-related infrastructure, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, and thereafter transfer and convey to any other public agency and/or any local water association any real and/or personal property for use in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, in consideration solely of the acceptance by the public agency and/or the local water association, as applicable, of such improvements and its agreement to operate the improvements to provide water or wastewater-related services to the project; (iii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to a municipality located within such county for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred thereby in connection with natural gas-related infrastructure improvements related to the project, and/or undertake the acquisition of real and/or personal property, or interests therein, with respect to, and the design, engineering, construction and installation of, any natural gas-related infrastructure improvements related to the project, and thereafter transfer and convey to any such municipality any real and/or personal property for use in connection with natural gas-related infrastructure improvements related to the project, in consideration solely of the acceptance by the municipality of such improvements and its agreement to operate the improvements to provide natural gas-related services to the project; (iv) Make grants or other contributions of funds to one another, or to the authority, the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Department of Transportation or any other state agency, for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds; (v) Make one or more grants or other contributions of funds to an enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating a project in such amount or amounts approved by such governing authority, and enter into an agreement with such enterprise that is binding on future governing authorities to make such grants or other contributions of funds; however, the duration of any such obligation of the public agency to make such grants or other contributions shall not exceed thirty (30) years; and (vi) Provide firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance to the enterprise owning or operating the project, and enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities with such enterprise to provide such firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance for a term not to exceed thirty (30) years, to be determined by the governing authority of the public agency entering into such agreement. (e) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the public agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the public agency seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property, and any such public agency is further authorized to procure an option to purchase any such real property for such purchase price authorized by this subsection for the lowest option payment at which the owner of the property is willing to grant such option. (f) In any county in which there is to be located a project, upon the conveyance or other disposition of land owned by a public agency for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the governing authority of the public agency controlling such lands may enter into a written agreement with the enterprise owning and/or operating such project pursuant to which such governing authority may agree to perpetually refrain from using the surface of such land upon which the project is located to access any minerals located thereunder in which such public agency has a retained ownership interest.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future governing authorities. (g) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of the applicable public agency may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities, for any period not to exceed thirty (30) years to: (i) Waive any and all fees and expenses associated with building permits and privilege licenses required for the project; (ii) Establish and/or maintain a rate structure for water and natural gas supplied to the project and wastewater received from the project, which shall be no higher than the lowest tariff prices for such water, natural gas and wastewater charged to any customer of equal or lesser volume located within the boundaries of the public agency; and (iii) Require any contractor hired by the public agency for purposes of entering onto the project site for such project to perform work related to the provision of water or natural gas supply or wastewater services, to procure customary liability insurance designating the enterprise owning or operating the project as an additional insured and to contractually indemnify such enterprise for any losses incurred by the enterprise as a result of such contractor's negligence and/or willful acts or omissions arising from the contractor's entry upon such project site. (7) (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Project" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii). (ii) "Public agency" means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority, port authority, airport authority, public utility or similar public agency created pursuant to state law. (iii) "Board of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (iv) "Superintendent of education" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1. (b) In any county in which there is to be located a project, any public agency is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and/or any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.  Any such public agency may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the governing authority of such public agency, upon such terms as the governing authority of such public agency may agree, to the entity or public agency that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, including, without limitation, to defray the costs of site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training, as well as planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other expenses approved by any such public agency.  Any such public agency may alternatively provide such assistance by undertaking the acquisition of real and/or personal property, or interests therein, with respect to, and the design, engineering, construction and installation of, any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project regardless of whether it is the public agency authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom following the completion thereof; provided that, if the public agency is authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure following the completion thereof, such public agency may transfer, and if the public agency is not authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom following the completion thereof, the public agency shall transfer such facilities or public infrastructure to another public agency that is authorized by applicable statutes to operate such facilities or public infrastructure and/or provide any utility services therefrom. (c) In order to provide the amounts or otherwise perform any permitted actions set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection: (i) Any such county may appropriate monies from the county's general fund or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds or other indebtedness permitted by any local and private law or other general laws.  Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Title 19, Chapter 9, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 19-5-99 or in any other manner permitted by any local and private law or other general laws; (ii) Any public agency may borrow or accept grants or other funds of such amounts from the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority for such duration and upon such terms and conditions approved by the governing authority of such public agency and the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable; and (iii) Any such county and/or municipality may enter into one or more agreements with the authority or Mississippi Development Authority approved by the board of supervisors of such county and/or the governing authority of such municipality, as applicable, to remit to the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, on an annual or other periodic basis for a duration up to thirty (30) years, a portion of any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, together with a portion of any ad valorem taxes that the county and/or municipality derives from the project.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future governing authorities of the county and/or municipality, as applicable. (d) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authorities of public agencies may: (i) Transfer and convey among themselves, or to the authority, the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Department of Transportation or any other state agency, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; (ii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to any public agency and/or any local water association incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and located within such county for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred thereby in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, and/or undertake the acquisition of real and/or personal property, or interests therein, with respect to, and the design, engineering, construction and installation of, any water or wastewater-related infrastructure, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, and thereafter transfer and convey to any other public agency and/or any local water association any real and/or personal property for use in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including one or more water tanks, related to the project, in consideration solely of the acceptance by the public agency and/or the local water association, as applicable, of such improvements and its agreement to operate the improvements to provide water or wastewater-related services to the project; (iii) Make grants or other contributions of funds to one another, or to the authority, the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Department of Transportation or any other state agency, for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds; (iv) Make one or more grants or other contributions of funds to an enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating a project in such amount or amounts approved by such governing authority, and enter into an agreement with such enterprise that is binding on future governing authorities to make such grants or other contributions of funds; however, the duration of any such obligation of the public agency to make such grants or other contributions shall not exceed thirty (30) years; and (v) Provide firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance to the enterprise owning or operating the project, and enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities with such enterprise to provide such firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance for a term not to exceed thirty (30) years, to be determined by the governing authority of the public agency entering into such agreement. (e) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the public agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the public agency seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property, and any such public agency is further authorized to procure an option to purchase any such real property for such purchase price authorized by this subsection for the lowest option payment at which the owner of the property is willing to grant such option. (f) In any county in which there is to be located a project: (i) Upon the conveyance or other disposition of land owned by a public agency for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the governing authority of the public agency controlling such lands may enter into a written agreement with the enterprise owning and/or operating such project pursuant to which such governing authority may agree to perpetually refrain from using the surface of such land upon which the project is located to access any minerals located thereunder in which such public agency has a retained ownership interest.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future governing authorities. (ii) Upon the sale of any sixteenth section lands for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the board of education controlling such lands, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority, acting in concert on behalf of the state, may sell and convey all minerals in, on and under any such lands for such consideration determined to be adequate by, and upon such terms and conditions prescribed by, the board of education, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority, or may otherwise enter into a written agreement with the enterprise owning or operating such project pursuant to which the board of education, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority may agree to perpetually refrain from using the surface of such sixteenth section land upon which the project is located to access any minerals located thereunder in which the state has a retained ownership interest.  Any such written agreement shall be binding upon future governing authorities. (g) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of the applicable public agency may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities, for any period not to exceed thirty (30) years, to: (i) Waive or reduce any fees and expenses associated with building permits and privilege licenses required for the project; (ii) Establish and/or maintain a rate structure for potable water to the project, nonpotable and treated, reclaimed wastewater supplied to the project for nonpotable purposes, and wastewater received from the project, which rates shall be established and/or maintained, as applicable, in the manner prescribed by state law and the local tariffs of the public agency providing such water and accepting such wastewater; and (iii) Require any contractor hired by the public agency for purposes of entering onto the project site for such project to perform work related to the provision of water or wastewater services, to procure customary liability insurance designating the enterprise owning or operating the project as an additional insured and to contractually indemnify such enterprise for any losses incurred by the enterprise as a result of such contractor's negligence and/or willful acts or omissions arising from the contractor's entry upon such project site. (h) In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of any public agency accepting and treating wastewater from the project may provide and sell to any public agency providing water to the project treated, reclaimed wastewater supplied for nonpotable purposes for resale by such public agency providing water to the project to any enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating the project or any portion thereof for use in the operation of the project for cooling or other exclusively nonpotable purposes.  Such public agencies may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities thereof, for any period designated thereby, to memorialize the terms and conditions of the provision, sale and use of treated, reclaimed wastewater supplied for nonpotable purposes to the project, including, but not limited to, the rates applicable for such reclaimed wastewater supplied for nonpotable purposes. (8) The powers and authority granted in this section are an additional, alternative and supplemental method for doing the things authorized by this section and are additional and supplemental to, and not in derogation of, any other powers conferred by law. SECTION 81.  Section 63-3-809, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-3-809. (1)  Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle, when the driver is giving audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in such position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a law enforcement officer. (2) Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, when such vehicle is giving a signal by use of flashing, blinking, oscillating or rotating lights, as authorized under Section 63-7-19, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a) Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b) Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (3) Upon approaching a stationary recovery vehicle, utility service vehicle, sanitation vehicle, or highway maintenance vehicle, when the stationary vehicle is giving a signal by use of authorized flashing lights, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a) Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b) Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (4) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise clearly requires: (a) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used for the maintenance of highways and roadways in this state and is: (i) Owned or operated by the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or (ii) Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state. (b) "Recovery vehicle" means a truck that is specifically designed for towing a disabled vehicle or a combination of vehicles. (c) "Utility service vehicle" means a vehicle used by any person, municipality, county, electric cooperative, corporation, board, commission, district or any entity created or authorized by public act, private act or general law to provide electricity, natural gas, water, wastewater services, telecommunications services or any combination thereof, for sale to consumers in any particular service area, or by any contractor under contract with any such entity. (d) "Sanitation vehicle" means a vehicle used to collect solid waste, refuse or recyclable material that is: (i) Owned or operated by a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or (ii) Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state. (5) Upon approaching a vehicle that is marked with some combination of white flashing strobe or amber and red lights, as provided in Section 63-7-19, that is operated by a United States rural mail carrier for the purpose of delivering United States mail, and that is stationary, including when the vehicle is signaling the intention to enter the roadway, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall: (a) Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or (b) Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe. (6) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine: (a) Of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); or (b) Of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) if violation of this section results in: (i) Property damage to the emergency vehicle, sanitation vehicle, highway maintenance vehicle, utility service vehicle, recovery vehicle or rural mail carrier vehicle; or (ii) Bodily injury to the driver or a passenger of any such vehicle. (7) This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, a sanitation vehicle, a recovery vehicle, a utility service vehicle, a highway maintenance vehicle or a rural mail carrier vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the roadway. SECTION 82.  Section 77-1-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-1-11. (1)  It shall be unlawful for any public service commissioner, any candidate for public service commissioner, or any employee of the Public Service Commission or Public Utilities Staff to knowingly accept any gift, pass, money, campaign contribution or any emolument or other pecuniary benefit whatsoever, either directly or indirectly, from a covered person.  Any person found guilty of violating the provisions of this subsection shall immediately forfeit his or her office or position and shall be fined not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for not less than one (1) year, or both. (2) It shall be unlawful for a covered person to offer any gift, pass, money, campaign contribution or any emolument or other pecuniary benefit whatsoever to any public service commissioner, any candidate for public service commissioner or any employee of the Public Service Commission or Public Utilities Staff. Any party found guilty of violating the provisions of this subsection shall be fined not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for not less than one (1) year, or both. (3) For purposes of this section, the term "emolument" shall include salary, donations, contributions, loans, stock tips, vacations, trips, honorarium, directorships or consulting posts.  Expenses associated with social occasions afforded public servants shall not be deemed a gift, emolument or other pecuniary benefit as defined in Section 25-4-103(k), Mississippi Code of 1972. (4) For purposes of this section, the term "Covered Person" shall include (i) any person interested as owner, agent or legal representative of any telephone, gas, water, wastewater or electric public utility as defined in Section 77-3-3(d); (ii) any person acting at the request or direction of an owner, agent or legal representative of any telephone, gas, water, wastewater or electric public utility as defined in Section 77-3-3(d); (iii) any person, entity or any owner, agent or legal representative of such person or entity that submits any filing in a Public Service Commission proceeding in the forty-eight (48) months preceding the date of the gift, pass, money, campaign contribution or any emolument or other pecuniary benefit; or (iv) any person acting at the request or direction of any person, entity or any owner, agent or legal representative of such person or entity that submits any filing in a Public Service Commission proceeding in the forty-eight (48) months preceding the date of the gift, pass, money, campaign contribution or any emolument or other pecuniary benefit.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a person shall not be considered a "Covered Person" under this section based solely on such person submitting a customer complaint or other inquiry, formal or informal, to the Public Service Commission or Public Utilities Staff concerning service, billing or any other aspect of the service provided by a public utility to such person. (5) For purposes of this section, a person who is a member of a water, gas, electric or other cooperative association regulated by the Public Service Commission shall not, by virtue of such membership, be deemed an owner, agent or representative of such association unless such person is acting in any respect for or as an owner, agent or representative of such association; nor shall a person who owns less than one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) in stock, the value thereof not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), of any public utility that is regulated by the Public Service Commission, or of any holding company of such public utility, by virtue of such ownership, be deemed an owner, agent or representative of such public utility unless such person is acting in any respect for or as an owner, agent or representative of such public utility. (6) This section shall stand repealed on December 31, 2027. SECTION 83.  Section 77-3-97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-97. (1)  The Legislature finds that the conservation of water resources is vitally important to the future of our state, and that in order to enhance the conservation of water resources, it is necessary to grant specific authority for the provision of submetering of water and wastewater disposal service. (2) As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Apartment house" means one or more buildings containing four (4) or more dwelling units that are occupied primarily for nontransient use, including a residential condominium whether rented or owner occupied, and if a dwelling unit is rented, having rental paid at intervals of one (1) month or longer. (b) "Dwelling unit" means one or more rooms in an apartment house or condominium, suitable for occupancy as a residence, and containing kitchen and bathroom facilities, or a manufactured home in a manufactured home community. (c) "Customer" means the individual, firm or corporation in whose name a master meter has been connected by a public utility. (d) "Owner" means the legal titleholder of an apartment house or manufactured home community and any individual, firm or corporation that purports to be the landlord of tenants in the apartment house or manufactured home community. (e) "Tenant" means a person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others and who is obligated to pay for the occupancy under a written or oral rental agreement. (f) "Manufactured home community" means a property on which spaces are rented for the occupancy of:  (i) manufactured homes for nontransient residential use and for which rental is paid at intervals of one (1) month or longer; or (ii) recreational vehicles for nontransient residential use for a time period of three (3) months or longer. (g) "Submetering" means the use of a metering device by a customer who receives water and wastewater service from a public utility, which metering device measures water supplied to a tenant for the purpose of the customer's charging the tenant of a dwelling unit separately for water and wastewater usage. (3) (a)  An apartment house owner, manufactured home community owner or condominium manager may provide for submetering of each dwelling unit or rental unit for the measurement of the quantity of water consumed by the occupants of the unit.  If submetering is utilized, tenants may be charged separately for water and wastewater services on a pass through allocated basis for charges incurred by the customer.  The charges for a tenant may not exceed the tenant's pro rata share of all water and wastewater services used by all of the tenants in that apartment house, manufactured home community or condominium. (b) Any apartment house owner, manufactured home community owner or condominium manager utilizing submetering pursuant to this section shall disclose the submetering to each tenant and obtain from the tenant an acknowledgment of the submetering in a written document. (c) Submeters installed pursuant to this section must meet the American Water Works Association standards for accuracy. (d) In rendering charges to tenants pursuant to this section, the customer shall provide: (i) Beginning and ending meter reads; (ii) A statement that the bill is not from the public utility; and (iii) A telephone number for tenant inquiries on the bill. (e) Water and wastewater services utilized by the tenant may not be disconnected for nonpayment of submetered bills. SECTION 84.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.